U.S.  WEATHER  AND  ENVIRONMENTAL  SATELLITES: 

READY  FOR  THE  21ST  CENTURY? 

S.  HRG.  110–1129 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

JULY  11,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

74–320 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on July 11, 2007 
Statement of Senator Cantwell 

...............................................................................
..............................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Busalacchi,  Jr.,  Ph.D.,  Antonio  J.,  Chairman,  Climate  Research  Committee; 
Chairman,  Committee  on  Earth  Science  and  Application:  Ensuring  the 
Climate  Measurements  from  NPOES  and  GOES–R  National  Research 
Council  and  Director,  Earth  System  Science  Interdisciplinary  Center 
(ESSIC), University of Maryland  ........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Freilich,  Dr.  Michael  H.,  Director,  Earth  Science  Division,  Science  Mission 
Directorate,  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration,  Department 
of Commerce  .........................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Holland,  Ph.D.,  Greg  J.,  Director,  Mesoscale  and  Microscale  Meteorology 
Division,  Earth  Systems  Laboratory  National  Center  for  Atmospheric  Re-
search  ....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kicza,  Mary  Ellen,  Assistant  Administrator  for  Satellite  and  Information 
Services, NOAA, Department of Commerce  .......................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
.............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Powner,  David  A.,  Director,  Information  Technology  Management  Issues, 
GAO  .......................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Klein, Hon. Ron, U.S. Representative from Florida 

APPENDIX 

Inouye, Hon. Daniel K., U.S. Senator from Hawaii, prepared statement  ...........
Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Bill Nelson to: 

Antonio J. Busalacchi, Jr., Ph.D. 
....................................................................
David A. Powner  ...............................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Maria Cantwell to: 

Antonio J. Busalacchi, Jr., Ph.D. 
....................................................................
David A. Powner  ...............................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Dr. Michael H. Freilich by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Kay Bailey Hutchison  .............................................................................
Hon. Bill Nelson 
...............................................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe  ....................................................................................
..........

Snowe, Hon. Olympia J., U.S. Senator from Maine, prepared statement 

Page 
1 
65 
66 
1 
3 

52 
54 

19 
20 

42 
44 

7 
9 
3 
5 

24 
25 

77 

89 
86 

89 
87 

79 
81 
78 
83 
77 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

U.S.  WEATHER  AND  ENVIRONMENTAL 

SATELLITES:  READY  FOR  THE  21ST 

CENTURY? 

WEDNESDAY,  JULY  11,  2007 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:03  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Bill  Nelson,  pre-
siding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Good  morning.  We’re  here  to  discuss  an  issue 
that  has  captured  the  imagination  of  a  lot  of  Americans,  particu-
larly  at  this  time  of  year,  as  we  come  into  the  hurricane  season. 
Thus far, we have been mercifully spared. It didn’t seem that way, 
because  on  the  very  first  day  of  hurricane  season,  a  hurricane 
started  brewing  that  actually  got  close  to  75  miles  per  hour  before 
hitting,  fortunately;  an  unpopulated  part  of  the  Florida  Coast.  But 
a lot of the issues that we’re going to discuss today have to do with 
the  Nation’s  weather  satellites  and  also  the  satellites  that  have  to 
do with the delicate measurements of the climate. 

Naturally,  we  take  for  granted  all  our  detailed,  real-time  pieces 
of  information  about  the  weather.  We  take  that  for  granted  365 
days  a  year.  Since  the  first  weather  satellite  was  launched,  in 
1960,  we’ve  planned  our  daily  lives  informed  by  weather  forecasts 
derived,  in  large  part,  from  satellite  data.  Farmers,  mariners,  pi-
lots,  and  countless  others  depend  on  this  accurate  and  timely 
weather information. 

Naturally,  residents,  particularly  in  coastal  areas,  well  under-
stand the importance of weather satellite data. Fifty percent of the 
U.S.  population  now  lives  within  50  miles  of  the  coastline.  Hurri-
cane  losses  averaged  $36  billion  in  each  of  the  last  5  years.  The 
cost  to  the  Federal  Government  on  Katrina  alone  has  been  in  ex-
cess  of  $100  billion.  By  comparison,  we  spend  less  than  a  billion 
dollars each year on weather satellites and hurricane research. 

Uninterrupted data from our weather satellites is vital to protect 
the  lives,  property,  and  the  commerce  of  our  country.  And  yet, 
these  major  satellite  weather  programs  are  undergoing  major 
changes  and  experiencing  some  serious  problems.  We’re  going  to 
dig into those problems today. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

The  flagships  of  our  satellite  fleet  are  the  GOES  spacecraft  that 
provide a continuous view of North America from fixed positions in 
geostationary  orbits.  GOES  is  approximately  22,000  miles  out,  so 
they stay in a given fixed position over the Earth at the same level 
of the Earth’s rotation. The next-generation of GOES satellites, the 
R and S, have nearly doubled in cost from $6 billion to $11 billion, 
and a key sensor has been dropped in the effort to control the cost. 
The  R  satellite  will  now  be  the  first  GOES  spacecraft  in  30  years 
to fly without a dedicated sounder to measure the detailed profiles 
of  the  temperature  and  the  moisture  of  the  atmosphere.  This  is 
what  we’re  facing.  This  Committee  wants  to  know  why,  and  what 
are we going to do about it. 

While  the  GOES  satellites  have  provided  a  macro  view  of  our 
hemisphere  from  stationary  points  22,000  miles  out,  our  Polar-or-
biting  satellites,  the  ones  that  are  going  around  the  poles  as  the 
Earth  rotates  underneath,  they  make  lower  passes,  about  every  6 
hours  apart,  to  measure  the  atmospheric  parameters,  and  they  do 
it  in  a  lot  more  detail.  In  1993  the  NOAA  POES  program—and 
that’s  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite—was 
combined  with  the  military  satellite  to  create  another  acronym, 
NPOESS. And that’s the National Polar-orbiting Operational Envi-
ronmental Satellite Series. Its implementation has been a disaster. 
The  cost  of  NPOESS  has  doubled,  while  the  number  of  satellites 
has  been  cut  by  50  percent;  the  number  of  instruments,  cut  by  a 
third.  Many  of  the  canceled  instruments  measure  atmospheric 
properties  essential  to  understanding  global  climate  change,  and 
were to continue the long-term measurements that had been taken 
by earlier missions. 

Without  these  sensors,  this  new  generation,  a  combination  of 
NOAA  and  NPOESS,  will  be  unable  to  measure  certain  properties 
important  to  hurricane  forecasting,  including  the  sea-level  winds 
and ocean altitudes. 

The long and short of it is that NOAA has failed to capitalize on 
promising  new  technologies  that  have  already  been  demonstrated 
in NASA programs. 

QuikSCAT,  a  mission  to  measure  sea-level  winds,  has  proven 
quite  useful,  and  it’s  now  4  or  5  years  beyond  its  design  life.  It 
wasn’t  an  operational  satellite,  it  was  a  research  satellite.  While 
ACE,  an  acronym  for  the  Advanced  Composition  Explorer,  meas-
ures  solar  wind  from  its  location  in  deep  space,  about  a  million 
miles  from  the  sun.  ACE  provides,  when  there  is  a  solar  explosion 
emitting  radiation,  about  an  hour  advance  warning  when  that  ex-
plosion  occurs.  Explosions  that  may  disrupt  our  communications 
and our power grids, it may expose the astronauts in space to get-
ting  fried,  and  airline  passengers,  this  is  something  that  very  few 
people know, flying over the poles where the magnetic fields of the 
Earth  that  protect  us  from  that  radiation  are  not  present,  it  gives 
a 1-hour warning in order to respond. That satellite is 10 years old, 
with  no  replacement  in  the  pipeline.  A  possible  successor,  another 
acronym,  called  DSCOVR,  sits  unused  in  a  storage  hangar  at  the 
Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  without  the  appropriated  monies  to 
fund a launch of that completed satellite. 

Earlier  this  year,  the  National  Academy  of  Sciences  released  its 
first  Decadal  Survey  on  Earth  Science.  Our  Space  Subcommittee, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

and this Committee, have held a hearing to determine the report’s 
recommendations. We commended those recommendations from the 
National  Academy  of  Sciences  to  NASA  and  to  NOAA  for  their 
analysis.  Well,  today  we  expect  to  hear  from  those  agencies  on 
their  progress  toward  incorporating  the  priorities  of  the  survey  in 
their mission plans. 

It’s  essential  that  our  weather  and  Earth  Science  programs  re-
main  in  existence.  Since  they’re  considerably  off  track  it’s  impor-
tant  that  they  receive  adequate  resources  to  keep  the  public  in-
formed when dangerous weather threatens. 

All  right,  let  me  turn  to  our  other  colleague  on  the  Committee. 
Senator Sununu? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I’m  certainly  interested  in  the  hearing  today,  not  necessarily  in 
as direct and local way as you are. These weather satellites are ob-
viously  extremely  important  to  Florida,  and  we,  in  New  England, 
can  appreciate  that.  But,  as  you  mentioned  in  the  later  portion  of 
your  comments,  they’re  part  of  the  broader  science  mission,  our 
country’s  science  mission,  that  collects  information  and  provides 
data regarding the Earth and climate, the oceans, but also provides 
observation  and  information  regarding  solar  activity  and  observa-
tions  in  deep  space.  Whether  it’s  NOAA  or  NASA  or  the  National 
Science  Foundation,  that  broader  science  mission  is  extremely  im-
portant,  and  it’s  important  that  we  allocate  resources  effectively 
across all of those areas. 

As  you  know,  in  this  Committee  we’ve  had  hearings  on  the 
broader  NASA  science  mission,  and  I  have  been  consistently  con-
cerned  by  the  crowding  out  of  resources,  the  cost  of  our  manned 
space  effort,  some  of  the  long-term  goals  regarding  the  mission  to 
Mars.  It’s  really  put  a  great  strain  on  NASA’s  science  budget,  and 
that  remains  a  concern.  And  I  think  we  need  to  make  sure  we’re 
allocating resources effectively, whether it’s for that basic research 
or the applied science mission of these weather satellites. 

They’re all important, and I look forward to the testimony today 
from  all  of  our  witnesses,  who  are—I  hope,  will  provide  expertise 
as to what is working, what isn’t working, and where our resources 
can  be  best  applied  to  deal  with  the  problems  you  talked  about  in 
your opening statement. 

Thank you. 
Senator NELSON. Thank you, Senator. 
We’re  pleased  to  be  joined  by  our  colleague  from  the  House  of 
Representatives,  Congressman  Klein,  who  wishes  to  make  a  state-
ment because of his involvement in this area. 

So, Congressman, welcome, and thank you for coming today. 

STATEMENT OF HON. RON KLEIN, 

U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM FLORIDA 

Representative KLEIN. Thank you very much, Senator Nelson. 
I  would  like  to,  certainly,  thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye  and  Vice 
Chairman  Stevens,  for  holding  this  important  hearing  on  an  issue 
that  is  timely—unfortunately  so,  to  be  very  frank.  It’s  timely,  be-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

cause  our  Nation’s  weather  satellites  are  critical  tools  that  fore-
casters  use  during  hurricane  season,  which  we’re  in  the  middle  of, 
to  help  locate  and  track  hurricanes  and  other  deadly  storms.  And 
the  timing,  of  course,  is  also  unfortunate,  because  one  such  sat-
ellite,  the  Quick  Scatterometer,  otherwise  known  as  QuikSCAT, 
has been at the center of a controversy involving the National Hur-
ricane  Center  and  its  former  director  Bill  Proenza,  who  was  dis-
missed from his duties a few days ago. 

During  many  meetings  with  representatives  from  the  National 
Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration,  I’ve  learned  that  NASA 
originally  designed  QuikSCAT  to  provide  detailed  snapshots  of  the 
winds swirling above the world’s oceans. Launched in 1999, as Sen-
ator  Nelson  indicated,  it  was  expected  to  last  3  to  5  years.  Now  in 
its  eighth  year  of  service,  the  satellite’s  demise  is  not  a  matter  of 
‘‘if,’’  but  ‘‘when.’’  Compounding  the  problem  is  that  there  are  no 
plans to launch a replacement satellite, and launching this satellite 
when  it  does  get  commissioned  would  take  a  minimum  of  5,  and 
maybe up to 7, years. 

As  a  Member  of  Congress  with  over  75  miles  of  coastline  in  my 
district in Florida, I, along with others, have felt the responsibility 
to ask NOAA how we got to this point where a potentially valuable 
satellite  is  on  its  last  legs,  and  why  we  did  not  have  another  one 
that  was  as  good,  if  not  better,  on  the  launching  pad,  ready  to  go 
when QuikSCAT went down. I’m very pleased that my good friend 
Senator  Nelson,  Chairman  Inouye,  Vice  Chairman  Stevens,  and 
other members of this Committee share that concern and are hold-
ing  this  hearing  to  examine  QuikSCAT  and  the  status  of  our  Na-
tion’s other weather satellites. 

I  recently,  Mr.  Chairman,  had  the  opportunity  to  visit  the  Na-
tional  Hurricane  Center  in  Miami,  where  I  asked  several  fore-
casters,  independently,  the  value  of  QuikSCAT’s  data  when  it 
comes to detecting a hurricane. They showed me how the cone used 
to predict the path of a storm may be altered in a positive way and 
a more narrow way when QuikSCAT’s data is incorporated, making 
the  cone  possibly  more  narrow  and  making  the  timing  of  landfall 
more  precise.  The  loss  of  this  data,  whether  minute  or  significant, 
could cause dire consequences to residents living in Florida and the 
over  50  percent  of  Americans  who  live  within  50  miles  of  a  coast-
line  that  could  also  be  impacted  by  hurricanes  and  other  major 
weather  storms.  Longer  stretches  of  coastline  and  more  coastal 
residents  under  evacuation  warnings  place  considerable  strain  on 
the resources of coastal communities. The result is not merely aca-
demic. Even a minute or incremental loss of data can result in the 
loss  of  thousands  of  lives  and  billions  of  dollars  in  property  dam-
age, crippling local communities for decades to come. Having expe-
rienced the devastating hurricanes of 2004 and 2005, I would think 
our goal would be to alleviate the burden of local communities, not 
increase  it.  But  with  proper  warning  and  preparation,  we  stand  a 
better  chance  of  avoiding  such  future  catastrophes.  And,  of  course, 
Mr. Chairman, this should be our goal. 

This  is  not  to  say  that  QuikSCAT  is  the  only  tool  used  by  the 
National  Hurricane  Center  to  locate  and  track  hurricanes,  or  that 
the Center will be unable to perform its job. It has always been my 
understanding that QuikSCAT is one vital tool, among many, used 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

at  the  National  Hurricane  Center  to  keep  Americans  safe.  There 
are  other  weather  satellites,  such  as  the  one  that  measures  water 
temperature,  which  is  important  when  gauging  storm  intensity, 
along  with  weather  buoys,  other  types  of  equipment,  and  ‘‘Hurri-
cane Hunter’’ aircraft. 

To  me,  this  is  a  very  simple  issue.  Hurricane  forecasters  should 
have all the tools to help keep Americans safe. Any steps backward 
are  simply  not  acceptable.  If  QuikSCAT  provides  important  data 
for  our  weather  forecasters,  then  Congress  and  NOAA  should  en-
sure that they not lose their ability to collect the data. 

I  also  feel  the  need  to  dispel  a  concern  voiced  by  some  reports 
that  a  replacement  satellite  for  QuikSCAT  would  come  at  the  ex-
pense  of  ‘‘Hurricane  Hunter’’  aircraft.  Although  I  cannot  speak  for 
my  fellow  Members  of  the  Congress,  I  can  say  that  I  would  cer-
tainly  oppose,  and  join  others  in  opposing,  any  efforts  to  cut  fund-
ing for the aircraft. Having toured NOAA’s ‘‘Hurricane Hunter’’ air-
craft in May here in Washington, and having met with NOAA and 
Air Force Reserve officials in the past, I learned, firsthand, the crit-
ical  role  in  tracking  storms  that  they  play.  Robbing  Peter  to  pay 
Paul  is  not  the  case  that  we  are  going  to  follow  with  making  sure 
the  ‘‘Hurricane  Hunter’’  aircraft  are  in  place,  or  that  we  have  an 
improved QuikSCAT satellite, if that’s appropriate. 

What should be the focus is finding more ways to keep the public 
safe. Although many of us have differing opinions on the role of the 
Federal Government, I think we can all agree that the public safety 
in  the  face  of  natural  disasters  like  hurricanes,  is  a  fundamental 
duty.  And,  unfortunately,  the  public’s  confidence  has  been  shaken 
since Hurricane Andrew. 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  today 
and working with the House and the Senate in the overriding goal 
of  making  sure  that  all  the  tools  and  the  environmental  satellites 
that  are  all  of  critical  importance  are  in  place.  I  look  forward  to 
working  with  this  distinguished  Committee  to  ensure  that  Ameri-
cans  have  the  best  and  most  up-to-date  information  to  keep  them 
safe during this hurricane season and future hurricane seasons. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Representative Klein follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. RON KLEIN, U.S. REPRESENTATIVE FROM FLORIDA 
I would like to thank Senator Nelson, Chairman Inouye, and Vice Chairman Ste-
vens  for  holding  this  hearing  today  on  an  issue  that  is  timely,  unfortunately  so,  to 
be  frank.  It’s  timely  because  our  Nation’s  weather  satellites  are  critical  tools  that 
forecasters  use  during  hurricane  season  to  help  locate  and  track  hurricanes  and 
other  deadly  storms,  and  the  timing  is  unfortunate  because  one  such  satellite,  the 
Quick Scatterometer (QuikSCAT), has been at the center of a controversy involving 
the  National  Hurricane  Center  and  its  former  Director,  Bill  Proenza.  Mr.  Proenza 
who  was  dismissed  from  his  duties  at  the  National  Hurricane  Center  just  2  days 
ago. 

NASA  originally  designed  QuikSCAT  to  provide  detailed  snapshots  of  the  winds 
swirling  above  the  world’s  oceans.  Launched  in  1999,  it  was  expected  to  last  three 
to  5  years.  Now  in  its  eighth  year  of  service,  the  satellite’s  demise  is  not  a  matter 
of  if,  but  when.  Compounding  the  problem  is  that  there  are  no  plans  to  launch  a 
replacement satellite, and launching this satellite would take a minimum of 5 years. 
In  March,  Mr.  Proenza  alerted  Members  of  Congress  and  the  public  about  the 
need  to  replace  QuikSCAT  in  an  Associated  Press  article,  claiming  that  both  two- 
day  and  three-day  forecasts  would  be  affected.  According  to  a  study  cited  by  Mr. 
Proenza,  the  two-day  forecasts  would  be  up  to  10  percent  less  accurate,  and  three- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

day forecasts would be up to 16 percent less accurate. If valid, such seemingly small 
fluctuations in accuracy have great impact on hurricane forecasts. 

I  recently  visited  the  National  Hurricane  Center,  where  several  forecasters  inde-
pendently  verified  to  me  the  value  ofQuikSCAT’s  data  when  it  comes  to  detecting 
a  hurricane.  They  showed  me  how  the  cone  used  to  predict  the  path  of  a  storm  is 
altered  when  QuikSCAT’s  data  is  incorporated,  making  the  cone  more  narrow  and 
making the timing more precise. 

The  loss  of  this  data—whether  minute  or  significant—could  cause  dire  con-
sequences to residents living in South Florida, and the over 50 percent of Americans 
who live within 50 miles of a coastline. Longer stretches of coastline and more coast-
al  residents  under  evacuation  warnings  place  considerable  strain  on  the  limited  re-
sources  of  coastal  communities.  After  the  devastating  hurricanes  of  2004  and  2005, 
I would think our goal should be to alleviate their burden, not increase it. 

This is not to say that QuikSCAT is the only tool used by the National Hurricane 
Center to locate and track hurricanes, or that the Center will be unable to perform 
their  job.  It  has  always  been  my  understanding  that  QuikSCATis  one  vital  tool 
among many used at the National Hurricane Center to keep Americans safe. There 
are  other  weather  satellites,  such  as  one  that  measures  water  temperature,  which 
is important when gauging storm intensity, along with weather buoys and hurricane 
hunter aircraft. 

This  last  resource  has  interested  me  as  well.  In  May,  I  met  with  Col.  Michael 
Logrande and Lt. Col. Lou Ortiz of the Air Force Reserve to discuss the mission and 
capability  of  the  Hurricane  Hunter  aircraft.  They  informed  me  that  the  Air  Force 
Reserve  is  installing  a  new  system  to  their  aircraft  called  a  Stepped  Frequency 
Microwave  Radiometer  (SFMR).  This  system  will  accurately  measure  sea  surface 
wind  speed  and  rainfall  rates,  thereby  providing  a  more  precise  forecast  of  the  se-
verity and direction of a storm. 

This report was encouraging and the bravery of the Reserve pilots flying into the 
heart of deadly storms impressive. But the fact remains that SFMR cannot measure 
wind  direction  like  QuikSCAT,  and  only  two  of  the  ten  Hurricane  Hunter  aircraft 
operated by the Air Force Reserve are equipped with the new equipment. 

After  carefully  examining  QuikSCAT’s  background  and  the  Hurricane  Center’s 
other resources, I became concerned that the National Oceanic and Atmospheric As-
sociation  (NOAA),  which  oversees  the  National  Weather  Service  and  the  National 
Hurricane Center, lacked a coherent and decisive alternative plan when QuikSCAT 
inevitably  fails.  On  May  17,  I  sent  a  letter  to  Vice  Admiral  (Ret.)  Conrad 
Lautenbacher,  Under  Secretary  of  Commerce  for  Oceans  and  Atmosphere,  asking 
him  to  provide  me  with  both  long  and  short-term  alternative  to  address  the  inevi-
table loss of QuikSCAT. 

To me, this is a very simple issue. Hurricane forecasters should have all the tools 
to  help  them  keep  Americans  safe.  Any  steps  backward  is  simply  not  acceptable.  If 
QuikSCAT  provides  important  data  for  our  weather  forecasters,  then  Congress  and 
NOAA should ensure that they not lose their ability to collect the data. 

I also feel the need to dispel a concern voiced by some reports that a replacement 
satellite for QuikSCAT would come at the expense of hurricane hunter aircraft. Al-
though  I  cannot  speak  for  my  fellow  Members  of  Congress,  I  can  say  that  I  would 
oppose any efforts to cut funding for the aircraft. 

Having toured the aircraft in May and having met with NOAA and Air Force Re-
serve  officials  in  the  past,  I  learned  firsthand  their  critical  role  in  tracking  storms 
nearing  landfall.  Robbing  Peter  to  pay  Paul,  or  in  this  case  robbing  hurricane  hun-
ter  aircraft  to  pay  for  a  new  or  improved  QuikSCAT  satellite,  is  unacceptable  and 
should not be an option. 

What  should  be  the  focus  is  finding  more  ways  to  keep  the  public  safe.  Although 
many  of  us  have  differing  opinions  on  the  role  of  the  Federal  Government,  I  think 
we  all  can  agree  that  the  public’s  safety  in  the  face  of  natural  disasters  like  hurri-
canes  is  a  fundamental  duty.  Unfortunately,  I  think  it’s  also  safe  to  say  that  the 
public’s confidence has been shaken since Hurricane Katrina. 

It  should  be  our  goal  to  win  back  the  public’s  trust  by  doing  more,  not  less,  in 
the  way  of  storm  tracking  and  prediction.  That  means  providing  the  experts  at  the 
National  Hurricane  Center  and  the  National  Weather  Service  will  all  the  tools  and 
resources available and not sacrificing one for another. We have made great strides 
in  hurricane  research  over  the  past  twenty  years,  and  it  is  important  that  we  not 
take any steps backward. This hearing taking place today is an important first step 
in evaluating the status and usefulness of our Nation’s weather and environmental 
satellites. 

I  applaud  Senator  Nelson,  Chairman  Inouye  and  Vice  Chair  Stevens  and  this 
committee  for  their  leadership,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  them  to  ensure 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

that  Americans  have  the  best  and  most  up-to-date  information  to  keep  them  safe. 
Thank you. 

7 

Senator  NELSON.  Thank  you,  Congressman.  And  the  testimony 
from  our  experts  will  bring  out,  later  on,  that,  if  QuikSCAT  goes 
on the blink, there is a European satellite that has some ability to 
help us, although not as extensive; that the aircraft—there are two 
research  aircraft  in  NOAA  that  have  a  Doppler  radar  that  can 
gather—that fly into the hurricane, that can gather some of this in-
formation;  and  that  there  is  a  fleet  of  Air  Force  aircraft,  C–130s, 
that have a lesser technology, called ‘‘smurf’’ on it that is being in-
stalled no a series of these aircraft. And the question is, should the 
Doppler  radar  be  put  on  those,  later  on?  So,  those  are  some  of  the 
things  that  we’ll  be  discussing  here  today  in  this  testimony,  and  I 
thank you for coming in. 

And if I may call up the panel, please. 
[Pause.] 
Senator  NELSON.  We  are  pleased  to  have  Ms.  Mary  Ellen  Kicza, 
the  Assistant  Administrator  for  Satellite  and  Information  Services 
in NOAA; Dr. Michael Freilich, Director of the Earth Science Divi-
sion  of  the  Science  Mission  Directorate  of  NASA;  Mr.  David 
Powner,  Director  of  the  Information  Technology  Management 
Issues of the GAO; Dr. Greg Holland, Director of the Mesoscale and 
Microscale Meteorology Division of Earth and Sun Systems Labora-
tory, in the National Center for Atmospheric Research; and Dr. An-
tonio  Busalacchi,  Professor  and  Director  of  the  Earth  System 
Science Interdisciplinary Center at the University of Maryland. 

Now,  if  we  can’t  figure  it  out  with  all  of  you  high-powered  folks, 

I’m not sure we can figure it out. So, let’s see if we can. 

And  we’ll  go  in  the  order  in  which  I  introduced  you.  And  your 
written  testimony  will  be  put  in  as  part  of  the  record.  And  I  don’t 
want you reading it to the Committee, I want you—I mean, we can 
read it for ourselves. What I want you to do is talk to us. 

So,  Mrs.  Kicza,  we’ll  start  with  you,  as  an  Assistant  Adminis-
trator  of  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration, 
NOAA. Welcome. 

STATEMENT OF MARY ELLEN KICZA, 

ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR FOR SATELLITE AND 

INFORMATION SERVICES, NOAA, DEPARMENT OF COMMERCE 

Ms. KICZA. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  discuss  NOAA’s  environmental 
satellite programs, and to highlight their importance to the Nation, 
its  forecasting  and  warning  capabilities,  and  to  our  climate  mis-
sion, as well. 

Satellites  provide  an  unparalleled  capability  to  take  images  and 
precise  measurements  of  many  aspects  of  vast  areas  of  land,  sea, 
and  air.  Their  data  are  essential  in  our  ability  to  provide  and  un-
derstand and predict changes in the Earth’s environment. 

We  currently  have  two  major  satellite  programs  within  NOAA: 
the  geostationary  satellites,  known  as  GOES,  and  the  Polar-orbit-
ing  satellites,  known  as  POES.  I’m  pleased  to  inform  the  Com-
mittee  that  NOAA’s  fleet  operational  GOES  and  POES  satellites 
are  in  good  health  and  they’re  closely  monitoring  the  oceans  and 
atmosphere for everyday weather forecasting, including any hint of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

tropical storm activity. As you said, my written testimony has been 
submitted. 

We’re  currently  developing  our  next  generation  of  geostationary 
and polar satellites. As you had indicated, in 1994 the Federal Gov-
ernment  decided  to  merge  the  polar  satellite  programs  of  the  De-
partment of Defense and NOAA into one program, with NASA also 
providing  critical  technical  support  and  risk-reduction  activities. 
This new program, called NPOESS, is one of the most complex en-
vironmental  operational  satellite  systems  ever  developed.  And  re-
cently,  under  the  Department  of  Defense  Nunn-McCurdy  process, 
the NPOESS program was restructured, resulting in two fewer sat-
ellites,  fewer  sensors,  and  less  risk  to  the  program.  The  first 
NPOESS satellite is scheduled for 2013 launch, and the system will 
provide operational coverage through 2026. 

While  the  main  instruments  on  NPOESS  will  provide  about  50 
percent  of  the  desired  climate-related  observations  and  data,  a 
number of secondary climate sensors were removed because of cost 
and  complexity,  and  NOAA  and  NASA  are  providing  Fiscal  Year 
2007  funding  to  restore  one  of  those  sensors  to  the  NPOESS  risk- 
reduction satellite, the NPP satellite managed by NASA. 

The  White  House  has  asked  NASA  and  NOAA  to  work  together 
to  identify  what  could  be  done  to  assure  continuity  of  key  climate 
measurements. We provided a preliminary report to OSTP in Janu-
ary  of  2007,  and  an  update  is  due  this  summer.  We’ve  also  asked 
the  National  Academy  of  Sciences,  which  provided  us  the  recent 
Decadal  Survey,  to  provide  input  as  we  develop  the  path  forward. 
We  are  also  in  the  early  stages  of  the  acquisition  process  for  a 
significantly  advanced  capability  in  the  next  generation  of  GOES 
satellite,  called  GOES–R.  We’re  applying  the  lessons  learned  from 
the  NPOESS  program,  as  well  as  the  lessons  learned  from  other 
satellite programs, and, as a result, have made significant changes 
in  this  program,  both  in  terms  of  program  management  and  over-
sight,  including  the  budgeting  of  more  money  for  the  program. 
GOES–R is scheduled for a late 2014 launch and will provide oper-
ational coverage through 2026. 

I  do  want  to  talk  about  the  QuikSCAT  satellite,  but  I  also  want 

to explain the system that NOAA uses to monitor hurricanes. 

Over the open oceans, continual images from our GOES satellites 
are the first reliable indicators of any storms or inclement weather. 
GOES  provides  near-real-time  critical  data  to  help  our  forecasters 
determine  a  storm’s  location,  its  size,  its  intensity,  and  its  move-
ment.  These  satellites  are  so  important  that  we  always  keep  a 
spare  in  orbit,  and,  as  tropical  systems  come  closer  to  land,  infor-
mation  from  NOAA  and  DOD  aircraft  and  ocean  buoys  provide 
real-time  direct  measurements  of  that  storm.  Within  200  miles  of 
the  coast,  ground-based  radars  are  used  to  track  the  storm,  and 
computer  models  are  used  to  predict  storm  track  and  intensity. 
These require extensive amounts of data, and these are mostly pro-
vided  by  NOAA  and  NASA  and  DOD  polar  satellites.  Together, 
these  systems  provide  the  forecasters  with  layers  of  information 
that are critical to help them make their forecast. 

QuikSCAT  is  a  NASA  satellite.  It’s  a  research  satellite  that’s 
demonstrated  the  ability  to  measure  ocean  wind  speed  and  direc-
tion from space. And, according to forecasters at the National Hur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

ricane Center, QuikSCAT has become an important tool, especially 
for  estimating  the  intensity  and  size  of  tropical  storms  and  other 
strong marine storms. 

In most cases, however, QuikSCAT has little or no demonstrated 
impact  on  hurricane  intensity  forecasts,  because  it  usually  cannot 
distinguish  winds  above  75  miles  per  hour  in  a  hurricane,  due  to 
the effects of heavy rains. 

Track forecasts for U.S. landfalling hurricanes will not be signifi-
cantly  degraded  if  QuikSCAT  were  to  fail.  The  hurricane  fore-
casters, instead, rely heavily on the real-time data provided by the 
reconnaissance  aircraft  which  measures  the  air  column  and  other 
characteristics of the storm that are critical to forecast—track fore-
casts.  Any  degradation  would  be  most  noticeable  for  open  ocean 
storms, when aircraft data are not available. 

Although  QuikSCAT  is  past  its  design  life,  as  you  know,  NASA 
has  indicated  that  QuikSCAT  currently  appears  healthy  and  has 
fuel  to  last  until  2011.  If  QuikSCAT  were  to  fail  today,  the  Na-
tional  Hurricane  Center  would  still  receive  ocean  wind  speed  and 
direction  from  space.  We’re  now  receiving  data  from  a  new  instru-
ment  aboard  a  European  satellite.  This  is  call  the  ASCAT  instru-
ment. It has similar technology to QuikSCAT. 

We  acknowledge  that  ASCAT  will  not  provide  the  same  quality 
of  data  as  QuikSCAT,  especially  in  terms  of  coverage  and  resolu-
tion; however, we are going to—— 

Senator NELSON. We need you to wrap up. 
Ms. KICZA. OK. 
Senator  NELSON.  I  should  have  said,  at  the  outset,  I’m  going  to 

give each of you 5 minutes. We’ve got—— 

Ms. KICZA. Sure. 
Senator  NELSON.—a  big  panel.  So,  instead  of  repeating  a  lot  of 
what’s been said, just say what you want to say within the 5 min-
utes—— 

Ms. KICZA. OK. 
Senator NELSON.—and then we’ll get into extensive questions. 
Ms. KICZA. OK. What I’d like to close with is, we’ve recently held 
a  workshop  at  the  National  Hurricane  Center.  Our  hurricane  fore-
casters have indicated the value of QuikSCAT, and have also indi-
cated  where  we  need  to  improve  QuikSCAT  in  a  replacement  sat-
ellite,  and  we’re  working  very  closely  with  the  forecast  center  and 
with NASA to examine ways to do that. 

I thank you for the time. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Kicza follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARY ELLEN KICZA,  ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR, 
SATELLITE AND INFORMATION SERVICES,  NATIONAL ENVIRONMENTAL SATELLITE, 
DATA, AND INFORMATION SERVICE, NOAA, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 

Introduction 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  Mary  Kicza,  Assistant  Ad-
ministrator  for  Satellite  and  Information  Services  in  the  National  Environmental 
Satellite,  Data,  and  Information  Service  (NESDIS).  NESDIS  is  a  line  office  of  the 
National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration,  within  the  Department  of  Com-
merce (DOC). 

NOAA’s  work  touches  the  daily  lives  of  every  person  in  the  United  States  and  in 
much of the world. From hurricane forecasts to fisheries management, from remote 
sensing  to  climate  research  and  ocean  exploration,  NOAA’s  products  and  services 
contribute  to  the  foundation  of  a  healthy  economy.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

discuss  with  you  today  NOAA’s  environmental  satellite  programs  and  to  highlight 
their importance to our hurricane and other severe weather forecasting and warning 
capabilities. 

Satellites provide an unparalleled capability to take images and precise measure-
ments  of  many  aspects  of  vast  areas  of  the  land,  sea,  and  air  in  very  rapid  succes-
sion. Data obtained from these observing systems are essential to our ability to un-
derstand  and  predict  changes  in  the  Earth’s  environment.  These  data  are  key 
enablers  for  NOAA  in  meeting  its  public  safety,  economic,  and  environmental  mis-
sion requirements. 

Although  their  payoff  is  great,  satellites  are  also  an  inherently  risky  endeavor. 
Not only is there the ‘‘rocket science’’ involved, but the instruments carried on these 
satellites must be sensitive enough to measure very small differences in the charac-
teristics  of  the  oceans,  land,  and  atmosphere  while  being  able  to  withstand  the  ex-
treme vibrations of a launch and the extreme heating and cooling of the space envi-
ronment. 

NOAA  currently  operates  and  manages  two  major  satellite  programs:  the  Geo-
stationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellites  (GOES)  and  the  Polar-orbiting 
Operational Environmental Satellites (POES). 
What Are GOES Satellites? 

NOAA  has  operated  geostationary  satellites  since  the  1970s.  These  satellites,  or-
biting  22,240  miles  above  the  equator,  mirroring  the  Earth’s  rotation,  provide  con-
stant  images  and  data  on  atmospheric,  oceanic,  land,  and  climatic  conditions  over 
the Western Hemisphere with major focus on the continental United States, Hawaii, 
the  western  Atlantic  Ocean  and  the  eastern  Pacific  Ocean.  These  satellites  provide 
the  hurricane  and  other  severe  storm  moving  displays,  called  ‘‘loops,’’  that  you  see 
on  television  and  are  best  known  for  the  images  used  in  television  weather  fore-
casts. More importantly, GOES satellites often provide the first images and informa-
tion  indicating  severe  weather  is  imminent  to  the  forecasters  so  they  can  provide 
the early warnings—think of GOES satellites as sentinels in the sky. 

NOAA  operates  two  geostationary  satellites,  one  over  the  East  Coast  and  the 
other over the West Coast. Given the absolutely critical role these satellites play in 
our  Nation’s  ability  to  forecast  weather,  especially  severe  weather,  we  maintain  a 
spare satellite on-orbit that can quickly be activated should a primary satellite fail. 
We  also  have  a  fourth  GOES  satellite,  near  the  end  of  its  mission  life,  which  is 
being  used  by  South  American  nations  for  weather  forecasting  and  could  be  used 
in an emergency. The final two GOES satellites in the current GOES-N series have 
been  built  and  are  scheduled  for  launch  in  2008  and  2009;  each  of  these  satellites 
has an expected lifetime of 5 years. 

The GOES satellites have unique environmental sensors—an imager and a sound-
er—that provide a wide range of capabilities related to weather, water, and climate 
observations that include tsunami, wildland fire, volcanic ash detection, and storms. 
The  satellites  also  have  a  data  relay  function  that  is  used  for  stream  and  reservoir 
monitoring. A search and rescue instrument supports mariners and aviators in trou-
ble.  Two  of  the  GOES  satellites  have  an  additional  sensor  onboard  that  gathers  in-
formation on space weather. 

The GOES satellites provide forecasters frequent images of clouds circulation, and 
monitor  the  Earth’s  surface  temperature  and  water  vapor  fields.  In  addition,  these 
satellites  measure  the  vertical  thermal  and  moisture  structures  of  the  atmosphere. 
When  combined,  this  information  allows  forecasters  to  better  understand  and  mon-
itor  the  evolution  of  atmospheric  phenomena  and  ensure  real-time  coverage  of  dy-
namic  events  that  directly  affect  public  safety,  protection  of  property,  and  ulti-
mately, economic health and development. 

In addition, GOES satellites also transmit emergency communications for NOAA’s 
National  Weather  Service  to  the  Emergency  Managers  Weather  Information  Net-
work.  This  network  provides  emergency  management  communities,  including  the 
Department of Homeland Security, and the Federal Emergency Management Agen-
cy, with warnings, watches, and forecasts issued by NOAA’s National Weather Serv-
ice (NWS). 
The Geostationary Operational Environmental Satellite (GOES–R) 

We  are  in  the  early  stages  of  the  acquisition  process  for  the  next  generation  of 
GOES satellites, called GOES-R. Given the long lead time needed for satellite devel-
opment and launch, acquisition work has already begun to ensure continuity of sat-
ellite coverage into the future. 

All  GOES-R  instruments  are  either  on  contract  or  in  source  selection.  The  main 
sensor on GOES-R, the Advanced Baseline Imager (ABI), will fulfill NOAA’s critical 
mission requirements. This sensor will offer significant advancements over the cur-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

rent  GOES  imagers  by  providing  images  five  times  faster  and  will  have  the  ability 
to zoom in to view hurricanes and specific severe weather events, while at the same 
time continuing to monitor the rest of the United States. We currently do not have 
this  flexibility  in  our  zoom  capability  and  must  constantly  make  decisions  about 
what  to  focus  on,  which  affects  our  ability  to  forecast  weather  in  multiple  regions. 
The  space  weather  instruments  will  provide  enhanced  data  on  solar  flares  and  the 
space  radiation  environment  that  NOAA’s  Space  Environment  Center  uses  to  issue 
space weather warnings critical to all satellites, power grids, GPS users, commercial 
aviation,  and  astronauts.  The  Geostationary  Lightning  Mapper  is  a  brand  new  in-
strument,  never  before  flown  in  geostationary  orbit,  that  will  help  us  better  detect 
cloud-to-cloud  lightning,  and  early  precursor  to  a  potentially  dangerous  weather 
event, and improve our capabilities to forecast and track severe weather over broad 
areas.  Present  operational  lightning  sensors  are  ground-based  and  provide  only  lo-
calized coverage of cloud-to-ground strikes. 

NOAA  is  applying  lessons  learned  from  our  other  major  next-generation  satellite 
program,  the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System 
(NPOESS),  and  other  recent  independent  reviews  and  audits  of  national  security 
and  civil  space  system  acquisitions.  We  are  implementing  these  lessons  into  our 
management  and  acquisition  strategy.  We  have  made  significant  changes  to  our 
GOES-R  program  management  and  oversight  based  on  the  direction  and  reviews 
from  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO),  the  DOC  Inspector  General,  the 
recent  NPOESS  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  process,  external  independent  review 
teams and our own internal reviews. 

We  decided  to  remove  one  of  the  originally  planned  sensors  for  the  GOES-R  pro-
gram, the Hyperspectral Environmental Suite (HES), due to a combination of devel-
opment  challenges,  magnitude  of  required  spacecraft  accommodations,  and  ground 
product  implications  that  presented  too  much  risk  to  meet  the  operational  require-
ments  of  the  GOES-R  program.  This  included  cost  growth  and  unacceptable  delays 
in  the  launch  date.  We  also  determined  that  the  ABI  instrument  can  provide  de-
rived  sounding  products  that  will  meet  mission  continuity  requirements.  The  ABI 
has many of the same spectral bands and exceeds the spatial coverage rate and spa-
tial resolution of the current sounders. 

Historically, NOAA funds and manages the program and determines the need for 
satellite  replacement,  while  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration 
(NASA)  provides  launch  support  and  helps  design,  engineer,  and  procure  the  sat-
ellites  and  some  ground  system  elements.  After  a  satellite  is  launched  and  checked 
out  by  NASA,  it  is  turned  over  to  NOAA  for  its  operation.  For  GOES-R,  we  had 
planned to significantly alter our management strategy from that used for previous 
GOES  acquisitions.  NOAA  was  going  to  manage  the  overall  acquisition  program, 
using  technical  support  from  NASA.  Following  the  recommendations  of  our  Inde-
pendent  Review  Team,  we  decided  NASA  will  manage  the  sensor  and  the  instru-
ment  and  space  segment  acquisitions,  and  NOAA  will  manage  the  ground  system 
acquisition  and  integration  activities  while  managing  the  overall  program.  GOES- 
R  is  scheduled  for  a  late  2014  launch.  The  current  life-cycle  estimate  for  the  pro-
gram  is  roughly  $7  billion  for  two  satellites  that  will  provide  operational  coverage 
through 2026. 
GOES-R—Next Steps 

The  GOES-R  program  is  being  acquired  in  a  phased  approach.  In  April  2007  the 
second  phase  was  completed,  which  involved  multiple  contracts  with  industry.  In 
this  second  phase,  the  Program  Definition  and  Risk  Reduction  Phase,  three  prime 
contractor teams were tasked with developing the definition of system concepts and 
the  identification  and  mitigation  of  program  risks.  Additionally,  technical,  cost, 
schedule, and other information were generated. The final phase in the GOES-R ac-
quisition process is the Acquisition and Operations (A&O) phase. During this phase 
the satellite and ground designs will be completed and the development, integration, 
testing, and deployment of the space and ground elements of the system will occur. 
What Are POES Satellites? 

NOAA’s  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellites  (POES)  consist  of  a 
pair of satellites that orbit over the poles at an altitude of 540 miles approximately 
14  times  per  day,  repeating  this  same  pattern  every  24  hours  and  providing  near- 
global  coverage  every  12  hours.  The  POES  system  provides  global  imagery  and  at-
mospheric  measurements  of  temperature,  humidity,  and  stratospheric  ozone.  POES 
data are used around the world for weather monitoring and prediction, and are the 
foundation for global weather models needed for 3–7 day, and longer, weather fore-
casts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

The  launch  of  NOAA-N  (currently  operated  as  NOAA–18)  inaugurated  a  new  era 
of  international  cooperation  and  introduced  a  new  model  for  polar-orbiting  environ-
mental  satellite  systems.  Today,  the  three  satellite  constellation  consists  of  a  De-
fense Meteorological Satellite Program satellite in the early morning orbit, the Euro-
pean  Organisation  for  the  Exploitation  of  Meteorological  Satellites  (EUMETSAT) 
MetOp-A  satellite  in  the  mid-morning  orbit  and  the  NOAA–18  in  the  afternoon 
orbit. Both the NOAA and EUMETSAT satellites carry instruments that collect and 
provide global data on cloud cover; surface conditions such as ice, snow, and vegeta-
tion;  atmospheric  temperatures,  moisture,  aerosol,  and  ozone  distributions;  and  col-
lect  and  relay  information  from  fixed  and  moving  data  platforms.  As  part  of  the 
EUMETSAT–NOAA partnership, NOAA provided several key sensors that are being 
flown on the MetOp series satellites. 

NOAA  currently  has  one  additional  POES  to  launch  (NOAA–N  Prime),  which  is 
expected  to  provide  continuity  in  the  afternoon  orbit  until  NPOESS  is  launched. 
NOAA  also  has  three  additional  POES  on-orbit  that  no  longer  meet  mission  speci-
fications  due  to  orbital  drift  and  instrument  degradation  or  failures,  but  they  can 
provide limited capability and additional observations when available. Most notably 
these  degraded  satellites  are  used  to  increase  coverage  and  reduce  the  amount  of 
time it takes to receive and relay search and rescue alerts and animal tracking data. 
Their  direct  broadcast  signals  are  also  used  by  other  governments  to  detect  and 
track wildfires and other environmental events. 
The  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System 

(NPOESS) 

Since  the  early  1960s,  the  United  States  had  maintained  two  distinct  polar  sat-
ellite  programs,  one  for  military  use  and  one  for  civilian  use.  While  data  from  both 
programs  were  exchanged,  each  program  operated  independently.  In  1994,  after  a 
thorough review and serious consideration, President Clinton directed the merger of 
the military and civilian operational polar-orbiting satellite programs. This new pro-
gram,  NPOESS,  is  responsible  for  developing  the  next  generation  of  polar-orbiting 
satellites and sensors. 

NPOESS  is  a  unique  program  in  the  Federal  Government.  It  is  jointly  managed 
by the DOC, the Department of Defense (DOD), and NASA with direct funding pro-
vided by DOC and DOD. At the senior level, the program is overseen by an Execu-
tive  Committee  (EXCOM),  which  includes  VADM  Conrad  Lautenbacher,  Adminis-
trator  of  NOAA,  Dr.  Michael  Griffin,  Administrator  of  NASA,  and  Dr.  Ron  Sega, 
Under Secretary of the Air Force. The EXCOM recently assigned a Program Execu-
tive  Officer  to  provide  more  frequent  senior  oversight  of  the  program  and  reports 
back  to  the  EXCOM.  The  NPOESS  program  is  managed,  on  a  day-to-day  basis,  by 
an Integrated Program Office (with staff from all three agencies). NPOESS is being 
acquired  using  DOD  acquisition  authorities.  In  2002,  Northrop  Grumman  was  se-
lected as the NPOESS prime contractor for spacecraft development, ground systems, 
sensor integration, and operations. 

NPOESS  is  one  of  the  most  complex  operational  environmental  satellite  system 
ever developed. The NPOESS program was designed as a series of six satellites with 
new  environmental  sensors  that  represent  significant  advances  over  current  oper-
ational  satellite  technology.  The  new  NPOESS  sensors  will  provide  higher  quality 
data,  increase  our  ability  to  see  through  clouds,  and  transmit  the  information  back 
much faster than with our current polar-orbiting satellites. These improvements will 
translate into more sophisticated weather models, which will lead to better forecasts 
and  warnings.  NPOESS  also  will  enhance  the  data  and  products  used  for  climate 
and  ocean  research  and  operations  as  well  as  monitoring  space  weather.  The  first 
NPOESS  satellite  will  be  launched  in  2013,  with  an  expected  lifetime  of  7  years. 
The  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  (NPP)  is  a  risk  reduction  mission  directed  by 
NASA. NPP provides risk reduction for the NPOESS system by demonstrating sev-
eral new NPOESS sensors in space, ensuring the ground control systems work prop-
erly, and allowing us time to assimilate the new data into computer weather models 
before  launch  of  the  first  operational  NPOESS  satellite.  The  NPP  mission  will  also 
collect and distribute remotely-sensed land, ocean, and atmospheric data to the me-
teorological and global climate communities as the responsibility for these measure-
ments transitions from NASA’s existing Earth-observing missions (e.g., Aqua, Terra 
and Aura) to the NPOESS. NPP will provide atmospheric and sea surface tempera-
tures, vertical profiles of moisture, land and ocean biological productivity, and cloud 
and aerosol properties. 

The  NPOESS  program  has  presented  numerous  technical  and  management  chal-
lenges. In March 2005, the contractor informed the government NPOESS would not 
meet  cost  and  schedule,  mostly  because  of  the  technical  challenges  with  the  main 
sensor,  the  Visible  Infrared  Imager  Radiometer  Suite  (VIIRS).  In  November  2005, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

it was determined the projected cost overruns for the program would exceed the 25 
percent  threshold  triggering  a  breach  of  the  Nunn-McCurdy  statute.  This  required 
a full six-month review of the program by the DOD, with the participation of NOAA 
and NASA as full partners in the certification process. 

In June 2006, the Nunn-McCurdy certification was delivered to Congress. The re-
sulting restructure of the NPOESS program has two fewer satellites, fewer sensors, 
and  less  risk.  Because  of  our  partnership  with  EUMETSAT,  we  are  able  to  utilize 
the  MetOp  series  satellites  in  the  mid-morning  orbit  to  fulfill  U.S.  data  require-
ments. The total cost of the program increases, but so did our confidence in a timely 
delivery  of  core  weather  forecasting  capabilities.  NPP  is  now  scheduled  to  launch 
in  2009,  and  the  first  NPOESS  satellite  in  2013,  at  a  total  life-cycle  program  cost 
of $12.5 billion (FY 1995–2026). 
NPOESS and Climate Change Measurements 

While the main instruments on NPOESS will provide more than 50 percent of the 
desired  climate-related  observations  and  data,  a  number  of  secondary  sensors  were 
removed during the review process that would provide some key climate parameters 
such  as  Earth  radiation  budget,  solar  irradiance,  sea  surface  topography,  and  aer-
osol optical properties. 

NOAA  and  NASA  have  already  committed  to  provide  FY  2007  funding  to  restore 
one  of  the  sensors,  the  Ozone  Mapping  and  Profiler  Suite  (OMPS)  Limb  (OMPS- 
Limb), to the NPP satellite. By remanifesting OMPS-Limb to OMPS-Nadir, we were 
able  to  obtain  total  and  vertically  resolved  stratospheric  ozone  measurements  nec-
essary  to  better  monitor  the  Antarctic  Ozone  phenomenon  and  other  events.  At  the 
initiative  of  the  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP),  NASA  and  NOAA 
are  continuing  to  work  together  to  identify  what  may  be  done  to  assure  continuity 
of key climate measurements. NOAA and NASA provided OSTP with a preliminary 
report  in  January  2007  and  an  update  to  the  report  will  be  issued  later  this  sum-
mer. We are also asking the National Academy of Sciences, which provided us with 
the  recent  Decadal  Survey  for  Earth  Observations,  for  recommendations  on  a  path 
forward.  The  National  Academy  hosted  a  workshop  June  19–21  to  seek  input  from 
the  scientific  community  on  the  changes  to  the  NPOESS  and  GOES-R  programs. 
OSTP  will  work  with  the  agencies  and  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  on 
a plan of action to best address the National Academies’ recommendations. 

Another  of  the  sensors  demanifested  from  NPOESS  was  the  Conical  Microwave 
Imager  Sounder  (CMIS).  CMIS  was  planned  to  provide  observations  of  ocean  wind 
speed  and  direction  along  with  more  than  10  other  environmental  parameters.  The 
project  had  too  many  technical  challenges  and  risks  and  was  canceled.  However,  a 
smaller  and  less  complex  replacement  sensor  will  be  procured  and  integrated  onto 
the second satellite to be launched in 2016. 
Program Oversight 

Following the recommendations of Independent Review Teams, the GAO, and the 
Inspector General from DOC, the recent Nunn-McCurdy certification process, exter-
nal independent review teams, and our own internal reviews, we have made signifi-
cant  management  and  oversight  changes  in  the  program.  In  addition  to  personnel 
changes  in  both  government  and  contractor  management,  we  made  changes  to  the 
way the program is monitored. We have put into place much more rigorous require-
ments  to  measure  earned  value  data,  key  milestones,  dollars  spent,  and  contractor 
personnel.  We  are  now  tracking  these  metrics  on  a  regular  basis,  which  provides 
real-time health and status of the program. 
NPOESS Status Update 

The  significant  management  changes  and  the  reduced  risk  profile  resulting  from 
the Nunn-McCurdy certification and subsequent restructure have had major positive 
affects  on  the  program.  The  program  is  meeting  the  interim  budget  and  schedule. 
We  are  in  the  final  stages  of  renegotiating  the  contract,  which  should  be  complete 
this summer. 

We  are  performing  acceptance  tests  on  flight  hardware.  In  this  phase  of  develop-
ment,  we  ‘‘test,  break,  fix’’  the  hardware  on  the  ground  to  be  sure  it  will  function 
on-orbit.  This  practice  is  the  main  reason  that  our  satellites  have  historically  per-
formed for extended periods on-orbit. Each of the instruments is in a different phase 
of acceptance testing. 

There  are  still  challenges  and  risks  associated  with  the  main  instrument,  VIIRS. 
Corrective  actions  for  all  identified  VIIRS  instrument  problems  are  underway.  One 
major  technical  issue  remains  and  we  are  pursing  several  potential  solutions.  This 
key  instrument  will  continue  to  be  the  focus  of  intense  management  attention  for 
the foreseeable future. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

We have issued a request for information for a Microwave Imager/Sounder (MIS), 
a  less  complex  sensor  than  the  original  CMIS.  The  MIS  is  still  intended  to  provide 
data  for  a  variety  of  products  including  estimates  of  ocean  surface  wind  speed  and 
direction.  The  MIS  is  scheduled  to  first  fly  on  the  second  NPOESS  spacecraft  and 
then on all subsequent missions. A final acquisition strategy decision is anticipated 
by September 2007, and the contract award is anticipated in the winter of 2008. 

Our number one priority throughout the Nunn-McCurdy analysis of the NPOESS 
program has been to ensure there is continuity of our existing data and in our abil-
ity  to  do  weather  forecasting  between  the  old  and  new  systems.  To  minimize  any 
potential  gaps  in  coverage,  we  are  rescheduling  launches  of  the  remaining  NOAA 
and DOD satellites. We do not believe there will be a gap in data used for weather 
forecasting  under  this  plan.  However,  should  the  remaining  NOAA  POES  satellite 
fail  on  launch  or  in  orbit,  we  would  have  to  rely  solely  on  DOD,  European,  and 
NASA  satellites.  There  would  be  some  degradation  to  NOAA’s  weather  forecasting 
ability until NPP or the next NPOESS satellite could be launched. 
NOAA’s Hurricane Forecasting 

The National Hurricane Center (NHC), a key component of the NWS and NOAA, 
has  been  the  centerpiece  of  our  Nation’s  hurricane  forecast  and  warning  program 
for  over  50  years.  The  NHC,  working  closely  with  local  NWS  Weather  Forecast  Of-
fices (WFOs) in areas affected by hurricanes and other tropical systems, saves lives, 
mitigates property loss, and improves economic efficiency by issuing the best watch-
es,  warnings,  and  forecasts  of  hazardous  tropical  weather,  and  by  increasing  the 
public’s understanding of these hazards. 

NOAA’s  forecasts  and  warnings  for  the  2005  hurricane  season  demonstrated  the 
abilities  of  the  state-of-the-art  of  hurricane  prediction.  Our  continuous  research  ef-
forts  at  NOAA,  and  in  partnership  with  universities  and  other  Federal  agencies, 
have  led  to  our  current  predictive  capabilities  and  improved  ways  of  describing  un-
certainty  in  prediction.  The  impacts  of  hurricane  winds,  storm  surge  and  inland 
flooding  remain  major  threats  to  the  Nation.  Accurate  and  timely  hurricane  fore-
casts provide emergency managers and the public information needed to prepare for 
an approaching storm, including considering evacuations, if necessary. 

NOAA  strives  to  improve  the  reliability,  accuracy,  and  timeliness  of  our  pre-
dictions  of  hazardous  weather,  such  as  hurricanes,  to  help  society  cope  with  these 
high impact events. Over the last 15 years, hurricane track forecast errors have de-
creased by 50 percent, largely due to advances in hurricane modeling, an increased 
understanding  of  hurricane  dynamics,  improvements  in  computing  and  technology, 
and  increased  observations  from  the  region  around  the  hurricane.  Today’s  five-day 
forecasts of a hurricane track are as accurate as three-day predictions were 20 years 
ago.  Hurricane  predictions  are  better  today  than  they  have  ever  been  and  will  con-
tinue to improve in the future. 

To  help  guide  future  research  efforts  and  improvements,  NOAA  requested  that 
the  NOAA  Science  Advisory  Board  commission  a  Hurricane  Intensity  Research 
Working Group to provide recommendations to the agency on the direction of hurri-
cane intensity research. The Working Group transmitted its final report to the Advi-
sory  Board  in  October  2006  (http://www.sab.noaa.gov/reports/reports.html).  The 
Federal  Coordinator  for  Meteorological  Services  and  Supporting  Research  released 
a  report  in  February  2007,  Interagency  Strategic  Research  Plan  for  Tropical  Cy-
clones: The Way Ahead, to provide a strategy for continuing to improve the effective-
ness  of  operational  forecasts  and  warnings  through  strategic  coordination  and  in-
creased collaboration among the major players in the operational and R&D commu-
nities  (http://www.ofcm.gov/p36-isrtc/fcmp36.htm).  Both  of  these  reports  call  for  ac-
celerated research investments and a deliberate focus on moving research results to 
operations.  In  response,  NOAA  has  created  a  Hurricane  Project  Team  to  develop  a 
unified approach to define and accelerate hurricane forecast improvements over the 
next  10  years.  Objectives  will  be  focused  on  improved  tropical  cyclone  forecasting 
(intensity,  track,  precipitation,  and  uncertainty  forecasts),  storm  surge  forecasts, 
flooding  forecasts,  and  information  and  tools  to  support  community  and  emergency 
planning. 
NOAA Hurricane Observations 

NOAA uses several systems to monitor hurricanes. Over the open oceans, images 
from  the  GOES  system  are  the  first  reliable  indicators  of  any  storms  or  inclement 
weather. As hurricanes or other tropical systems come closer to land, measurements 
from  reconnaissance  and  surveillance  aircraft  provide  direct  measurements  of  the 
storm,  as  do  strategically  placed  ‘‘hurricane’’  buoys.  Within  200  miles  of  the  coast, 
radars  are  used  to  track  the  storm.  Computer  models  used  to  predict  storm  track 
and intensity require extensive amounts of data about the state of the atmosphere, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

including  wind  direction  and  speed,  temperature,  moisture,  and  air  pressure.  Over 
the open ocean, most of these data are derived from satellite ‘‘sensing’’ of the atmos-
phere.  Ships  and  other  mid-ocean  buoys  provide  some  data,  but  satellites  are  truly 
the  ‘‘eye  in  the  sky.’’  All  of  these  data  sources  are  part  of  an  integrated  observing 
system. 
Satellites 

Forecasters  at  the  Tropical  Prediction  Center/National  Hurricane  Center  (TPC/ 
NHC)  use  images  and  other  data  provided  by  the  GOES  system  to  analyze  the 
storm and its surrounding environment and help to determine the location, size, in-
tensity,  and  movement  of  the  storm.  These  images  are  also  prominently  shown  by 
the  media.  The  satellites  also  provide  data  about  every  8  minutes  during  a  hurri-
cane event. Instrumentation on the satellites (both GOES and POES) measure emit-
ted  and  reflected  radiation  from  which  atmospheric  temperature,  winds,  moisture, 
and cloud cover are derived. Satellites provide: 
• Day (visible)/night (infrared) cloud images. 
• Land surface temperatures. 
• Sea surface temperatures. 
• Cloud motion winds at several levels. 
• Rainfall estimates. 
• Cloud top heights. 

Ships and Buoys 

Ships  and  buoys,  including  drifting  buoys,  provide  information  about  wind  speed 
and direction, pressure, air and sea temperature, and wave conditions within a trop-
ical  cyclone.  Ships  and  buoys  are  the  only  routine  source  of  wave  height  and  fre-
quency  in  areas  unobstructed  by  land  and  are  often  the  only  way  to  take  direct 
measurements  near  the  storm  when  a  tropical  cyclone  is  still  at  sea.  Understand-
ably,  ships  try  to  avoid  tropical  systems  and  we  have  only  sparse  ocean  buoys  to 
provide a level of ‘‘ground truthing’’ for indirect measurements (such as satellite and 
radar) in the marine environment. 
Aircraft 

The most direct method of measuring the wind speed and direction, air pressure, 
temperature, location of the eye and other parameters in a hurricane is to send re-
connaissance  aircraft  (hurricane  hunters)  into  the  storm.  Those  measurements  are 
limited  given  the  large  size  of  a  hurricane  and  the  time  the  aircraft  can  remain  in 
flight.  Though  we  only  have  a  snapshot  of  small  parts  of  the  hurricane,  that  infor-
mation is critical in analyzing the current characteristics needed to forecast the fu-
ture  behavior  of  the  storm.  TPC/NHC  forecasters  rely  heavily  on  data  from  recon-
naissance and surveillance aircraft. 

The  U.S.  Air  Force  Reserve  uses  specially  equipped  WC–130J  aircraft  to  conduct 
these  reconnaissance  flights.  NOAA  also  flies  its  two  WP–3D  Orion  (P–3)  aircraft. 
When forecasters identify a developing tropical cyclone, WC–130J aircraft fly their 
first missions to determine if the winds near the ocean surface are blowing in a com-
plete,  counterclockwise  circle,  then  to  find  the  center  of  this  closed  circulation.  As 
the  storm  builds  in  strength,  they  fly  various  patterns  to  obtain  as  complete  a  pic-
ture as possible of the extent and strength of the winds and other parameters. The 
2005  hurricane  supplemental  budget  provided  funding  to  instrument  the  fleet  of 
WC–130J aircraft with Stepped-Frequency Microwave Radiometers (SFMRs), which 
will provide additional details on a hurricane’s wind fields. 

NOAA  WP–3D  Aircraft  also  fly  into  hurricanes  with  a  wide  variety  of  scientific 
systems  onboard  the  aircraft  providing  data  and  information  to  forecasters,  sci-
entists, and modelers. Of particular interest are the two radars which provide a full 
360° depiction of weather and three-dimensional horizontal wind vectors around the 
aircraft out to a distance of 180 nautical miles. Data from these radars, along with 
meteorological and position data from onboard sensors, are transmitted to the NHC 
in  real-time  via  high-speed  satellite  communications.  The  WP–3D  aircraft  also 
serves as a test bed for emerging technologies such as the SFMR (which now reside 
on  both  WP–3D  aircraft),  the  Imaging  Wind  and  Rain  Airborne  Profiler,  and  the 
Scanning Radar Altimeter. 

Given  the  current  limitations  in  satellite  observations,  the  only  inner-core  wind 
data  routinely  available—derived  from  the  SFMR  (surface  winds),  airborne  tail 
Doppler radar (three dimensional structure), and GPS dropwindsonde (point vertical 
profile)—are collected by aircraft reconnaissance (NOAA WP–3D and U.S. Air Force 
WC–130J).  The  combination  of  SFMR,  airborne  tail  Doppler  radar,  and  GPS 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

dropwindsonde (see below) is essential for real-time interpretation of rapidly chang-
ing events, especially near landfall. The SFMR capability is especially critical to the 
forecasters. 

In addition to the reconnaissance missions, NOAA also has a state-of-the-art Gulf-
stream-IV  (G–4)  high  altitude  jet  aircraft,  which  flies  missions  around  the  storm, 
known as surveillance missions. NOAA’s Gulfstream IV jet, which began operational 
hurricane  surveillance  missions  in  1997,  is  used  to  sample  the  physical  nature  of 
the  atmosphere  from  high  altitude  down  to  the  surface  in  the  region  surrounding 
hurricanes.  These  data  better  define  the  environmental  steering  flow  for  potential 
landfalling  storms  and  help  improve  track  forecasts.  The  data  are  transmitted  in 
real time to NOAA’s National Centers for Environmental Prediction, where they are 
assimilated into the Global Data Assimilation System. 
Dropwinsondes and Radiosondes 

A  radiosonde  is  a  small  instrument  package  and  radio  transmitter  that  is  at-
tached  to  a  large  balloon.  As  the  balloon  rises  through  the  atmosphere,  the  radio-
sonde  instrument  provides  data  on  air  temperature,  humidity,  pressure  and  wind 
speed  and  direction.  These  data  are  relayed  back  to  computers  for  use  in  forecast 
models. Radiosondes are generally only released over land, which leaves a large gap 
over  the  oceans.  That’s  where  dropwinsondes,  a  variation  on  the  radiosonde,  are 
used.  Instead  of  being  carried  aloft  by  a  balloon,  the  dropwinsondes,  which  are  at-
tached  to  a  small  parachute,  are  dropped  into  and  around  the  hurricane  from  the 
reconnaissance  and  surveillance  aircraft.  The  data 
from  radiosondes  and 
dropwinsondes provide an important vertical profile of the hurricane’s environment, 
which is critical for forecast models. These data have helped forecasters make great 
strides in understanding and predicting hurricane behavior. 
Expendable Bathythermographs 

Expendable  bathythermographs  are  instruments  dropped  into  the  water  and 
measure  water  temperature  and  other  parameters  to  a  depth  of  200  feet.  These  in-
struments  provide  us  with  an  idea  of  the  energy  content  of  the  water  which  fuels 
hurricanes. 
Surface Observations 

There are more than 950 Automated Surface Observation Systems (ASOS) across 
the country. These monitoring systems provide forecasters with surface weather ob-
servations, wind speed and direction, temperature, dewpoint (moisture), cloud cover, 
and conventional weather (e.g., rain, fog, snow) around the clock. However, because 
the  systems  are  land-based,  ASOS  data  is  mainly  useful  once  the  hurricane  has 
come  close  to  shore  or  after  it  has  made  landfall.  This  information  is  invaluable  in 
post-analysis. 
Radar 

When  a  hurricane  nears  the  coast,  typically  within  200  miles,  it  is  monitored  by 
land-based  Doppler  weather  radars.  These  radars  provide  detailed  information  on 
hurricane  wind  fields,  rain  intensity,  and  storm  movement.  As  a  result,  local  NWS 
offices are able to provide short-term warnings for floods, tornadoes, and high winds 
for  specific  areas.  In  radar  images,  the  forecaster  can  pick  out  details  about  storm 
features,  such  as  the  location  of  the  eye,  storm  motion,  and  intensity.  The  radial 
wind velocity product gives forecasters important information about wind speed and 
direction  that  was  not  available  with  the  older  style  radars.  These  tools  allow  fore-
casters to provide much more timely and accurate warnings than were possible only 
a few years ago. A limitation of these radars is they cannot ‘‘see’’ farther than about 
200 miles from the coast, and hurricane watches and warnings must be issued long 
before the storm comes into range. 

All  of  these  data  are  assimilated  into  NCEP’s  data  stream  and  incorporated  into 
computer  model  forecasts  to  provide  the  fundamental  understanding  of  the  devel-
oping  tropical  cyclonic  atmosphere  and  ocean  environment,  the  tropical  inner  and 
outer core, and the interaction among these components. But that is just part of the 
value. This information is used directly by hurricane forecasters who make the pre-
dictions of the hurricane track and intensity and the decisions for any watches and 
warnings. 
Hurricane Forecasting and Satellites 

As  I  stated  earlier,  satellites,  particularly  GOES,  provide  the  first  indications  of 
a  tropical  system.  They  are  absolutely  critical  in  our  prediction  mission.  Data  from 
GOES  help  our  forecasters  analyze  the  storms  and  its  surrounding  environment, 
and  help  determine  its  location,  size,  intensity,  and  movement.  POES,  with  the  ad-
vanced microwave-sounding unit and the advanced very high resolution radiometer, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

provide  precipitation  estimates,  qualitative  estimates  of  storm  intensity  trends,  sea 
surface  temperatures,  storm  center  position,  convective  structure  and  atmospheric 
temperature/humidity profiles. POES are not always over the storm since these sat-
ellites  orbit  the  globe.  This  is  in  contrast  to  GOES,  which  are  stationary  relative 
to the Earth’s surface. Data from these satellites play an important role in NOAA’s 
hurricane computer models, which are the backbone of our predictive capability. 

In  addition,  NOAA  uses  data  and  observations  gathered  from  several  other  low 

Earth orbiting satellites. These include: 

• The  Defense  Meteorological  Satellite  Program,  using  the  special  sensor  micro-
wave/imagery suite of instruments, provides information on ocean surface wind 
speed,  precipitation,  sea  surface  temperatures,  center  position  and  convective 
structure. 

• NASA’s Tropical Rainfall Mapping Mission (TRMM) satellites, using the TRMM 
microwave  imager,  provide  precipitation/rain  rate,  center  position,  convective 
structure, and sea surface temperatures. 

• The  NASA  AQUA  satellite  mission  using  the  moderate  resolution  imaging 
spectroradiometer,  the  advanced  microwave  scanning  radiometer  and  the  at-
mospheric infrared sounder to provide precipitable water, water vapor, sea sur-
face  temperatures,  center  position,  convective  structure  and  atmospheric  tem-
perature/humidity profiles. 

• NASA’s  Research  Satellite,  Jason  —using  an  altimeter  sensor  to  provide  the 
surface  height  of  the  oceans,  a  proxy  for  the  amount  of  heat  potentially  avail-
able to help fuel a hurricane. 

• European MetOp satellite sensor, ASCAT, using an active scatterometer to pro-
vide wind speed and direction, but at a low spatial resolution. Currently not in-
corporated into NOAA forecast models, but accessible to forecasters. 

• NASA’s  QuikSCAT,  using  the  SeaWinds  scatterometer,  provides  wind  speed, 

wind direction, center location and wind radii. 

What is QuikSCAT? 

Recently,  concerns  have  been  expressed  about  one  of  these  satellite  tools— 
QuikSCAT.  QuikSCAT  is  a  NASA  satellite  that  launched  in  1999  to  research  the 
ability  to  measure  ocean  wind  speed  and  direction.  Wind  speed  and  direction  are 
valuable  pieces  of  information  to  hurricane  forecasters.  While  data  was  available 
some  months  after  launch,  it  has  been  a  long,  ongoing  process  to  discover  how  to 
use the data optimally. The data allow for more reliable estimation of maximum in-
tensity, especially for tropical storms, but not for major hurricanes, due to the wind 
speeds  encountered  there.  QuikSCAT  provides  improved  detection  and  tracking  of 
circulation centers, and improved analysis of storm size and structure, which do af-
fect watches and warnings. 
What Is Its Limitation? 

While  the  information  from  QuikSCAT  has  proved  to  be  an  important  tool,  there 
are  several  limitations,  specifically  as  it  relates  to  hurricanes.  Since  QuikSCAT  is 
a  polar-orbiting  satellite,  and  as  with  all  such  satellites  (including  POES  and 
NPOESS), it circles the globe and may provide data about a hurricane at most twice 
a  day,  usually  only  once  a  day.  Sometimes,  it  may  not  be  at  the  right  place  at  the 
right  time.  Gaps  between  the  coverage  area,  or  swaths,  approach  1,000  kilometers 
in the deep tropics. Because hurricane wind speeds change over relatively short dis-
tances,  the  12.5-km  spatial  resolution  of  QuikSCAT’s  observation  makes  it  difficult 
to  measure  winds  faster  than  65  mph,  the  approximate  speed  at  which  a  tropical 
storm becomes a hurricane. It also has significant problems seeing through the rain, 
which  is  a  major  portion  of  the  hurricane  environment.  QuikSCAT’s  usefulness  be-
comes significantly less important as the storm gets closer to continental-U.S. land-
fall  where  forecasters  are  able  to  rely  on  data  from  the  hurricane  reconnaissance 
aircraft. 
What Is Its Status? 

While  QuikSCAT  was  launched  in  1999,  with  a  three-year  mission,  and 
consumables to last at least 5 years, it is now in its eighth year. The primary trans-
mitter  lasted  7  years  and  failed  last  year,  and  now  the  satellite  is  operating  on  its 
backup transmitter. Like any satellite, especially one past its design life, QuikSCAT 
could fail at any time. However, according to NASA, the instrument is healthy and 
should  continue  to  operate  for  several  more  years.  It  also  has  enough  fuel  to  last 
through 2011. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

What Is NOAA’s Plan? 

Since the late 1990s, NOAA has had a plan to obtain ocean wind speed and direc-
tion  data  from  NPOESS.  As  stated  previously,  during  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process 
the CMIS instrument was removed to reduce the overall risk. A replacement sensor 
will  not  be  available  until  the  launch  of  the  second  NPOESS  scheduled  for  2016. 
In June 2006, the NWS held a workshop to define new requirements for ocean sur-
face wind speed and direction. It was determined that only the active approach used 
by QuikSCAT, a scatterometer, had the potential to meet the new requirements; the 
passive  approach  used  by  the  MIS  instrument  aboard  NPOESS  did  not.  The  Admi-
ral redirected FY 2007 funds to be used to start a study with NASA’s Jet Propulsion 
Lab,  which  built  QuikSCAT,  on  building  a  satellite  to  replace  or  enhance  our  cur-
rent  capabilities.  The  results  of  that  study  are  due  in  January  2008  and  we  plan 
to  use  it  and  other  information  to  determine  the  best  way  to  provide  ocean  surface 
wind speed and direction to forecasters. 
What Will You Do If It Fails Today? 

If  QuikSCAT  were  to  fail  today,  I  want  to  assure  you  and  the  public  that  we  are 
not  blind  to  forecasting  hurricanes.  On  the  contrary,  as  stated  earlier  in  my  testi-
mony,  there  are  many  tools  and  observations  that  our  forecasters  rely  on  as  they 
make their predictions. It is the GOES satellites in particular that are the most cru-
cial  for  hurricane  forecasting.  We  have  an  on-orbit  spare  GOES  and  an  additional 
two  on  the  ground  while  we  are  developing  the  next  generation.  With  regard  to 
ocean surface wind speed and direction data, there are two other satellites, WindSat 
(a Navy research satellite with a passive system) and MetOp (the EUMESTAT sat-
ellite  carrying  the  active  ASCAT  scatterometer),  which  provide  data  similar  to,  al-
though not quite as good as, QuikSCAT. The coverage area, or swaths, of these two 
satellites are about 60 percent of QuikSCAT. 

The  European  satellite  was  launched  late  last  year  and  the  NHC  is  just  now 
starting  to  receive  the  data  and  learning  how  to  use  it  in  models  and  in  their  fore-
casts. We do not yet have any specific information on what the effect to the models 
or  the  forecasts  would  be  through  the  use  of  ASCAT.  The  good  news  about  ASCAT 
is that the Europeans plan to fly this sensor on a series of successive satellites until 
at least 2020. 

We  will  also  be  exploring  agreements  with  India  and  China  as  they  are  expected 
to launch satellites with scatterometers, with technology similar to QuikSCAT, late 
in this decade. We do not know the specifications of their satellites and historically 
these nations have not fully shared their environmental data, especially in a timely 
manner. However, we are exploring this option as well. 

Finally,  we  are  also  examining  how  to  increase  the  use  of  our  hurricane  hunter 
aircraft  through  more  flight  hours  and  outfitting  the  planes  with  more  advanced 
technologies. We are also researching the feasibility of placing scatterometers on un-
manned aircraft systems. 
Conclusion 

Satellites are very complicated and difficult systems to design, build, and operate. 
However,  their  capabilities  play  an  important  role  in  NOAA’s  mission  to  observe 
and predict the Earth’s environment and to provide critical information used in pro-
tecting  life  and  property.  Advances  in  hurricane  prediction  depend  not  only  on  im-
proved observations such as those from satellites, but also on improved data assimi-
lation,  computer  models,  and  continued  research  to  better  understand  the  inner 
workings of hurricanes. 

I  believe  we  are  making  significant  strides  in  developing  a  better  process  for  de-
signing and acquiring our satellites. We have fully functioning operational satellites 
with backup systems in place, and we are working on the next generation that will 
provide  significant  improvements  in  our  ability  to  forecast  the  weather.  I  would  be 
happy to answer any questions you may have. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Ms. Kicza. 
Dr. Freilich? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

STATEMENT OF DR. MICHAEL H. FREILICH, DIRECTOR, 

EARTH SCIENCE DIVISION, SCIENCE MISSION DIRECTORATE, 

NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE ADMINISTRATION 

Dr. FREILICH. Thank you very much. 
Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  I  welcome  this 
opportunity  to  discuss  Earth  Science  and  NASA’s  collaborations 
with NOAA. 

Data  from  NASA  research  satellites  improve  NOAA’s  forecasts. 
Accurate NOAA operational products are used in NASA research to 
advance  scientific  understanding.  Thus,  there  are  strong  reasons 
for us to collaborate; and collaborate, we do. 

We  work  in  many  ways  to  try  to  transition  NASA-proven  meas-
urements  and  capabilities  to  operations.  Among  these  are  NOAA 
researchers  that  often  serve  on  NASA  mission  science  teams;  the 
NASA–NOAA  Joint  Working  Group  provides  strategic  guidance  on 
transition  and  wider  use  of  technologies,  missions,  and  data.  Com-
mittees such as the Interagency Altimeter Working Group examine 
technical  and  programmatic  issues  for  specific  measurements. 
NASA, as the Nation’s civilian space agency, serves in development 
and  acquisition  roles,  with  reimbursable  funding  from  NOAA. 
NASA  will  continue  to  serve  in  that  capacity  for  the  space-borne 
segments of the GOES–R missions that Ms. Kicza discussed. 

Over  the  past  year,  we’ve  collaborated  very  productively  to  ad-
dress  the  challenges  of  NPOESS  and  the  Decadal  Survey.  Nunn- 
McCurdy  focused  NPOESS  on  weather  forecasting,  as  you  pointed 
out,  and  the  loss  of  NPOESS  climate  sensors  affects  researchers 
and both agencies. 

A  potentially  less  capable  microwave  instrument  on  NPOESS 
could  reduce  our  ability  to  get  measurements  of  all  weather  sea- 
surface  temperature  and  surface  wind  direction.  Together,  NASA 
and  NOAA  quantified  the  impacts  and  developed  recovery  prior-
ities, as Ms. Kicza mentioned. We’re now jointly investigating miti-
gation scenarios, examining climate freeflyers, as well as mounting 
instruments on NPOESS. 

In  April,  NASA  and  NOAA  jointly  funded  the  restoration  of  the 
OMPS  Limb  ozone  profiling  capability  onto  the  NPOESS  Pre-
paratory Program Spacecraft. 

Again,  as  both  of  you  have  mentioned,  NASA  and  NOAA  jointly 
commissioned and participated in the June NRC community work-
shop to examine the scientific impacts of the NPOESS changes and 
to consider recovery scenarios. 

Our  agency  studies,  along  with  the  workshop  inputs,  are  being 
used to inform the development of the Administration’s FY09 budg-
et request. Let me briefly discuss NPP, one of the two space-borne 
elements of NPOESS. 

NPP,  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Program,  aims  to  continue  se-
lected  climate  time  series  initiated  by  the  NASA  Earth  Observing 
System,  especially  the  MODIS  data  products  that  should  be  pro-
duced  by  the  Visible  Infrared  Image  Radiometer  Suite,  called 
VIIRS.  Flight  on  NPP  also  reduces  risk  for  the  operational 
NPOESS sensors. For NPP, NASA is responsible for the spacecraft 
plus  the  launch  vehicle,  spacecraft  integration  and  test,  and  provi-
sion  of  one  instrument,  the  Advanced  Technology  Microwave 
Sounder,  for  all-weather  global  temperature  and  humidity  profiles. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Indeed,  that  instrument  was  delivered  in  2005,  and  is  integrated 
onto the NPP spacecraft. 

NOAA  and  DOD  are  responsible  for  NPP  on-orbit  mission  oper-
ations,  the  ground  system,  the  OMPS  ozone  suite,  VIIRS,  and  the 
Cross-track Infrared Sounder instruments. Both VIIRS and the in-
frared  sounder  are  facing  significant  development  challenges. 
VIIRS measurements may be substantially less accurate than those 
obtained  presently  by  MODIS.  The  NASA  NPP  science  team  is 
working closely with NOAA and with the NPOESS project office to 
evaluate  the  effects  of  these  possible  shortfalls  on  NASA’s  Earth 
Science  objectives.  The  present  VIIRS  flight  model  probably  will 
not  support  NASA  ocean  color,  and  may  not  support  aerosol  re-
search unless some changes are made. 

Let  me  say  a  few  words  about  QuikSCAT  now.  QuikSCAT  is  a 
highly  successful  NASA  research  mission,  as  you’ve  pointed  out, 
measuring  ocean  wind  speed  and  direction  with  unprecedented  ac-
curacy, spatial resolution, and coverage. QuikSCAT data have been 
crucial  for  advancing  research  into  ocean  circulation,  air-sea  inter-
actions,  and  marine  meteorology,  and  they’ve  been  used  routinely 
by  NOAA  and  other  international  meteorological  organizations 
since early 2002. 

As  Ms.  Kicza  pointed  out,  QuikSCAT  is  old,  but  it  is  in  decent 
shape.  The  recent  NASA  senior  review  recommended  that 
QuikSCAT operations be extended at least through 2011, based on 
the  present  spacecraft  trends  and  its  high  value  for  research  and 
operations. Because scatterometry is a mature technique with oper-
ational  utility,  the  Decadal  Survey  recommended  that  NOAA  con-
tinue  QuikSCAT,  the  time  series,  and  fly  an  enhanced  so-called 
XOVWM  scatterometer,  starting  in  the  2013  time  frame.  Funded 
by NOAA, NASA’s Jet Propulsion Laboratory is conducting detailed 
technical  and  cost  studies  of  XOVWM  and  related  surface  wind 
measurement missions. 

So,  in  conclusion,  NASA  and  NOAA  are  collaborating,  and  we’re 
collaborating  well.  NASA’s  Earth  Science  research  objectives  and 
NOAA’s  prediction  objectives  both  require  reliable,  accurate  oper-
ational  satellite  systems.  NOAA’s  prediction  tasks  and  NASA’s 
science 
improved  measurements. 
Transitioning  from  research  to  operations  is  challenging,  but  the 
many joint efforts of NOAA and NASA are resulting in effective so-
lutions for the country. 

investigations  both  require 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Freilich follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR.  MICHAEL H.  FREILICH,  DIRECTOR,  EARTH SCIENCE 
DIVISION,  SCIENCE MISSION DIRECTORATE,  NATIONAL AERONAUTICS AND SPACE 
ADMINISTRATION 
Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to 
appear today to discuss how NASA partners with the National Oceanic and Atmos-
pheric  Administration  (NOAA).  As  the  Director  of  the  Earth  Science  Division,  one 
of four science divisions that make up the NASA Science Mission Directorate, I wel-
come  this  opportunity  to  discuss  the  important  area  of  Earth  Science  and  our  col-
laborations  with  NOAA.  This  discussion  is  especially  timely  in  light  of  the  recently 
released  National  Research  Council’s  (NRC’s)  Earth  Science  Decadal  Survey,  which 
outlines specific scientific priorities for both NASA and NOAA. 

Much  of  the  science  community’s  present  state  of  knowledge  about  global 
change—including many of the measurements and a significant fraction of the anal-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

yses  which  serve  as  the  foundation  for  the  recent  report  of  the  Intergovernmental 
Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC)—is  derived  from  NASA’s  Earth  Science  program. 
Using  data  from  Earth  observing  satellites,  NASA-supported  researchers  are  moni-
toring  ice  cover  and  ice  sheet  motions  in  the  Arctic  and  the  Antarctic;  quantifying 
the  short-term  and  long-term  changes  to  the  Earth’s  protective  shield  of  strato-
spheric  ozone,  including  the  positive  impacts  of  the  Montreal  protocols;  discovering 
robust  relationships  between  increasing  upper  ocean  temperature  and  decreasing 
primary  production  from  the  phytoplankton  that  form  the  base  of  the  oceans’  food 
chain;  and,  using  a  fleet  of  satellites  flying  in  formation  (the  ‘‘A-Train’’),  making 
unique,  global,  near-simultaneous  measurements  of  aerosols,  clouds,  radiative 
fluxes, and temperature and relative humidity profiles. 

NASA  researchers  codify  our  improving  understanding  of  Earth  processes  in  so-
phisticated  weather  and  climate  models  which  can  then  be  used  to  predict  natural 
and  human-caused  environmental  changes.  Researchers  often  analyze  the  gridded 
‘‘nowcast’’ output from these numerical prediction models as proxies for actual data, 
since  the  model  predictions  incorporate  all  available  observations.  Improved  oper-
ational  models  thus  aid  the  research  endeavor  as  well  as  yield  improved  forecasts. 
There  is  thus  a  strong  synergy  between  our  Nation’s  research  satellites  and  our 
operational spaceborne systems. Near-real-time measurements from NASA research 
missions  such  as  the  Tropical  Rainfall  Measuring  Mission  (TRMM),  the  Quick 
Scatterometer  (QuikSCAT),  the  Atmospheric  Infrared  Sounder  (AIRS)  instrument 
on  the  Aqua  mission,  and  others  are  used  routinely  by  NOAA  and  other  U.S.  and 
international  agencies  to  improve  weather  and  extreme  event  forecasts.  Similarly, 
high  quality  measurements  obtained  by  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  and  NOAA 
operational weather satellites provide essential context for the scientific analyses of 
the  NASA  research  mission  data.  As  the  Nation’s  civil  space  agency,  NASA  dem-
onstrates  and  refines  new  measurement  technologies  and  then  works  closely  with 
NOAA in an effort to transition these research capabilities to long-term operations. 
NASA joins with other Federal agencies to support an integrated Federal program 
of climate research. Consistent with the NASA Space Act of 1958, as amended, and 
the NASA Authorization Act of 2005 (P.L. 109–155), NASA’s role within the broader 
Federal  program  is  guided  by  the  U.S.  National  Space  Policy,  authorized  by  the 
President  on  August  31,  2006.  NASA’s  contribution  to  the  U.S.  Climate  Change 
Science Program (CCSP) is unchanged from the FY 2007 to FY 2008 budget request, 
and remains the largest single contribution to the Program. NASA, NOAA, and the 
U.S. Geological Survey (USGS) jointly requested that the National Research Council 
conduct a Decadal Survey for Earth Science. The recently completed survey outlines 
specific scientific priorities for both NASA and NOAA. 

NASA  works  closely  with  NOAA,  in  particular,  in  an  effort  to  transition  mature 
and  proven  measurement  capabilities  to  long-term  operations.  In  addition  to  the 
NASA–NOAA  Joint  Working  Group  (established  by  the  NASA  Authorization  Act  of 
2005)  which  has  addressed  a  wide  range  of  issues  related  to  transition  of  measure-
ments and data products, the two agencies also meet regularly in more focused fora 
such as the Interagency Altimeter Group (NASA, NOAA, Navy). Since early summer 
of 2006, NASA and NOAA have worked intensely with each other and with the Of-
fice  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  (OSTP)  to  document  the  impacts  of,  and  de-
velop  mitigation  strategies  for,  changes  to  the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational 
Environmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS)  made  in  relation  to  Nunn-McCurdy  re-
certification of the program. 

Below,  as  requested,  we  address  status  and  collaborative  activities  related  to  the 
three missions identified as of particular interest to the Committee: NPOESS, Geo-
stationary Operational Environmental Satellites (GOES)–R, and QuikSCAT. 
NPOESS 

NPOESS  was  established  in  1994  by  Presidential  Decision  Directive  to  combine 
the  previously  separate  operational,  Earth-observing  satellite  systems  operated  by 
DOD (the Defense Meteorological Satellite Program, (DMSP)) and NOAA (the Polar- 
orbiting Operational Environmental Satellite program, (POES)). The primary objec-
tive  of  both  DMSP  and  POES  was  to  collect  measurements  in  support  of  weather 
and  environmental  forecasting.  However,  as  noted  above,  in  many  cases  high-qual-
ity, well-validated, operational data products acquired by these systems are used ex-
tensively by the Earth Science research community as well. 

The  overall  NPOESS  program  is  composed  of  two  spaceborne  elements:  the 
NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  (NPP),  presently  scheduled  for  launch  in  September 
2009;  and,  the  NPOESS  Operational  Constellation  (NPOESS),  composed  of  a  series 
of four spacecraft, flying two at a time in coordinated morning and afternoon orbits 
(the launch of the first of these spacecraft currently is scheduled for 2013). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

NPP has two basic aims: (1) to continue the time series of selected climate science 
measurements  initiated  by  the  NASA  Earth  Observing  System  spacecraft—in  par-
ticular,  the  suite  of  data  products  generated  by  the  Moderate  Resolution  Imaging 
Spectroradiometer  (MODIS)  instrument  on  the  Terra  and  Aqua  missions  and 
planned to be produced by the Visible/Infrared Imager/Radiometer Suite (VIIRS) on 
NPP  and  NPOESS;  and  (2)  to  serve  as  risk  reduction  for  the  future  operational 
NPOESS sensors. NASA, NOAA, and DOD all participate essentially equally in the 
NPP mission. NASA is responsible for development of the spacecraft bus, launch ve-
hicle, integration and test of the instruments on the spacecraft, and provision of the 
Advanced  Technology  Microwave  Sounder  (ATMS)  instrument  that  will  provide  all- 
weather,  global  temperature  and  humidity  profiles.  Through  the  NPOESS  Inte-
grated  Program  Office  (IPO),  NOAA  and  DOD  are  responsible  for  development  and 
provision  of  the  VIIRS,  Cross-Track  Infrared  Sounder  (CrIS),  and  Ozone  Mapping 
and  Profiling  Suite  (OMPS)  instruments;  on-orbit  mission  operations;  and  the 
ground system for the generation of operational products. 

The NASA-supplied ATMS instrument was delivered in October 2005 and is pres-
ently integrated onto the NPP spacecraft. In response to the removal of the OMPS- 
Limb profiling capability from both NPP and NPOESS via the Nunn-McCurdy proc-
ess,  NASA  and  NOAA  provided  resources  from  core  programs  to  allow  the  OMPS- 
Limb instrument to be re-manifested on NPP in April 2007, thus restoring both the 
nadir  total  ozone  measurements  and  the  limb  profiling  capabilities  for  NPP.  This 
first-ever combination of total and vertically resolved ozone measurements will pro-
vide scientists unique insight into the dynamical and chemical processes that regu-
late atmospheric composition. 

Both  the  IPO-developed  VIIRS  and  CrIS  instruments  are  presenting  significant 
development challenges. The first CrIS flight unit suffered a structural failure dur-
ing testing in October 2006, requiring structural design changes and delaying deliv-
ery  of  a  flight  unit  for  integration  onto  the  NPP  satellite  until  March  2008.  Initial 
testing is indicating that the VIIRS measurements may be less accurate than those 
of the present NASA MODIS instruments. The NASA NPP Science Team is working 
closely  with  NOAA  and  IPO  personnel  to  evaluate  the  impacts  of  these  instrument 
performance  shortfalls  on  NASA’s  Earth  system  science  objectives.  Although  these 
analyses  are  in  an  early  stage,  it  is  likely  that  the  present  VIIRS  flight  model  for 
NPP will lack the accuracy and precision to support NASA research related to ocean 
color  and  aerosols  unless  significant  resources  are  applied  to  implement  sensor 
changes. 

The  future  operational  NPOESS  system  was  significantly  restructured  in  June 
2006 as a result of the Nunn-McCurdy recertification. The original series of two, 3- 
satellite  constellations  was  downsized  to  two,  2-satellite  constellations  with  meas-
urements  from  the  mid-morning  orbit  to  be  supplied  by  the  European  EUMETSAT 
MetOp  missions.  Furthermore,  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process  focused  NPOESS  on  its 
core weather forecasting objectives, removing several important climate sensors and 
degrading  the  performance  of  certain  other  instruments.  The  recertified  NPOESS 
does  not  include  total  solar  irradiance  and  Earth  radiation  budget  instruments,  an 
altimeter  to  make  accurate  global  measurements  of  sea  level,  and  the  OMPS-Limb 
capability to measure vertical profiles of tropospheric and stratospheric ozone. In ad-
dition,  the  Conically  Scanning  Microwave  Imager/Sounder  (CMIS)  was  replaced  by 
a  Microwave  Imaging  Sensor  (MIS)  whose  detailed  capabilities  have  not  yet  been 
defined.  From  the  standpoint  of  addressing  NASA  science  objectives,  this  change 
from  CMIS  to  MIS  may  substantially  reduce  our  ability  to  acquire  all-weather  sea- 
surface temperature measurements as well as information on surface wind direction 
and speed over the ice-free oceans. 

The Decadal Survey, the U.S. Climate Change Science Program, and NASA’s own 
planning in Earth Science all assume the presence of an operational system of envi-
ronmental  monitoring  satellites  that  can  make  climate-quality  measurements.  In-
deed,  that  is  a  major  reason  why  NASA,  along  with  NOAA  and  the  Air  Force,  is 
a  member  of  the  NPOESS  governing  body.  As  the  Decadal  Survey  committee  was 
finalizing  its  notional  mission  set  and  sequence,  the  full  impact  of  the  removal  of 
the climate sensors from the NPOESS program was just coming to light. Since last 
summer,  NASA  has  been  working  closely  with  NOAA,  OSTP,  and  the  scientific  re-
search  community  to  understand  and  rank  the  impacts  of  these  programmatic  per-
turbations  and  to  develop  realistic  mitigation  scenarios  for  the  most  important 
measurements.  In  addition  to  our  agency-based  technical  evaluations  and  prelimi-
nary  mitigation  strategy  designs,  NASA  and  NOAA  commissioned,  supported,  and 
participated in a National Research Council workshop held June 19–21, 2007, after 
several  weeks  of  community  planning  (including  participation  by  members  of  the 
original  Decadal  Survey  committee).  The  workshop  was  chartered  to  examine  the 
scientific  and  research-focused  impacts  of  the  programmatic  changes  to  NPOESS 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

and  to  consider  various  potential  recovery  scenarios.  NASA  and  NOAA  anticipate 
receiving the workshop report later this summer. 
GOES-R 

NASA has historically managed the development and launch of the Geostationary 
Operational  Environmental  Satellite  (GOES)  system  under  a  reimbursable  work 
agreement with and in support of NOAA. Two legacy GOES spacecraft are presently 
built  and  in  ground  storage.  Work  has  begun  on  design  and  development  for  the 
next-generation  GOES  series  known  as  ‘‘GOES-R.’’  These  spacecraft  will  fly  an  ad-
vanced  imager  capable  of  simultaneous  focused  high  resolution  measurement  and 
full-field  low  resolution  acquisition.  The  GOES-R  instrument  complement  will  also 
include  a  first-ever  lightning  sensor  capable  of  operating  from  geostationary  orbit, 
as  well  as  a  complement  of  space  weather  instrumentation.  NASA  will  manage  the 
spaceborne  hardware  portion  of  GOES-R  for  NOAA  as  a  reimbursable  project 
through  a  program  office  at  NASA’s  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  in  Greenbelt, 
Maryland. 
QuikSCAT 

Launched  on  June  19,  1999,  QuikSCAT  carries  as  its  only  science  instrument  an 
active radar scatterometer instrument that provides ocean surface vector wind data 
under  nearly  all-weather  conditions.  QuikSCAT’s  primary  mission  is  scientific  re-
search,  but  from  the  start  NASA  and  NOAA  recognized  the  value  of  the  ocean  sur-
face  vector  wind  data  for  operational  weather  and  marine  hazard  forecasting.  Prior 
to  launch,  NASA  and  NOAA  collaborated  to  assure  that  QuikSCAT  data  could  be 
downlinked  to  Earth  and  processed  sufficiently  rapidly  to  be  useful  to  NOAA  for 
weather  forecasting.  The  NASA–NOAA  collaboration  included  both  use  of  distrib-
uted ground telemetry stations, and development by NASA’s Jet Propulsion Labora-
tory (JPL) in Pasadena, California of specific computer algorithms and data formats 
to  allow  rapid  processing  by  NOAA  and  efficient  use  of  the  QuikSCAT  wind  meas-
urements  in  NOAA  weather  forecasting  models  at  the  National  Weather  Service 
(NWS)  National  Centers  for  Environmental  Prediction  and  NWS  Weather  Forecast 
Offices having coastal responsibilities. 

QuikSCAT  has  been  on  orbit  for  8  years,  5  years  beyond  its  original  three-year 
baseline mission. Although some redundant subsystems have failed or have suffered 
degradation (in particular the transmitter which allows the satellite’s measurements 
to  be  sent  to  the  ground  for  processing),  backup  systems  are  working  well,  and  the 
data  remain  of  high  quality.  The  satellite  is  clearly  aging,  but  shows  no  indication 
of imminent failure. 

NASA  has  neither  a  scientific  mandate  nor  any  near-term  plan  to  replace 
QuikSCAT’s  active  radar  scatterometry  measurements.  The  Decadal  Survey  identi-
fies  a  sea  surface  wind  vector  scatterometry  mission,  the  Extended  Ocean  Vector 
Winds  Mission  (XOVWM),  as  a  mid-decadal  priority  for  NOAA.  NASA  continues  to 
work  closely  with  NOAA  to  support  an  efficient  transition  of  ocean  surface  vector 
wind  measurements  from  research  to  operations.  NOAA  is  evaluating  a  number  of 
options  for  addressing  its  ocean  vector  wind  requirements  and  has  taken  a  number 
of  steps  including  funding  a  JPL  study  of  QuikSCAT  replacement  options.  The  re-
sults of this study are due in January 2008 and will help NOAA determine the best 
way  to  provide  accurate,  extensive,  all-weather,  surface  wind  speed  and  direction 
measurements over the global oceans. 
Conclusion 

In  summary,  NASA  and  NOAA  have  an  ongoing  and  growing  collaborative  rela-
tionship.  The  two  agencies  have  complementary  programmatic  expertise  and  objec-
tives.  Both  NASA’S  research  to  advance  Earth  system  science  and  NOAA’s  pre-
diction  objectives  require  an  operational  satellite  system  that  can  reliably  acquire 
accurate  measurements.  Both  NOAA’s  prediction  tasks  and  NASA’s  science  inves-
tigations  require  the  development  and  on-orbit  demonstration  of  new  measurement 
techniques  to  improve  the  scope  and  quality  of  measurements.  Transitioning  from 
research  to  operations  is  challenging,  but  the  ongoing  frequent  communication  be-
tween NOAA and NASA at various technical and management levels, and in a vari-
ety of fora, will result in effective solutions for the Nation. 

I  welcome  your  questions  on  NASA’s  Earth  Science  program  and  its  relationship 

to NOAA. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Dr. Freilich. 
We want to hear GAO’s point of view. Mr. Powner? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

STATEMENT OF DAVID A. POWNER, DIRECTOR, 

INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGEMENT ISSUES, GAO 
Mr. POWNER. Chairman Nelson, and members of the Committee, 
GAO  has,  for  the  past  several  years,  monitored  the  NPOESS  and 
GOES–R  programs.  As  you  mentioned,  Mr.  Chairman,  these  envi-
ronmental  satellite  programs  are  essential  to  monitoring  and  hav-
ing the continuity of critical weather data through nearly 2030, and 
they play a key role in hurricane forecasting. NPOESS is well into 
its acquisition cycle, and its life-cycle costs will now exceed $12 bil-
lion.  GOES–R  is  early  in  its  acquisition  cycle,  as  the  prime  con-
tracts are expected to be awarded next year. 

Today’s  request,  I  will  provide  a  brief  status  of  each,  highlight 

key challenges, and discuss recommendations, going forward. 

First, NPOESS: Over the past several years, NPOESS has expe-
rienced significant cost overruns and delays due to sensor develop-
ment problems, poor contractor performance and program manage-
ment,  and  inadequate  executive-level  involvement  that  led  to  a 
June  2006  decision  to  restructure  the  program.  This  decision  de-
creased the complexity of the program by reducing a number of key 
sensors,  increased  the  estimated  costs  by  $4  billion,  and  delayed 
the  launches  of  the  first  satellites.  Since  then,  the  NPOESS  pro-
gram  has  made  progress;  however,  we  remain  concerned  about  its 
remaining  risks,  the  interagency  management  of  this  tri-agency 
program, and a premature rotation of the program’s key executive. 
Before  expanding  on  each  of  these  concerns,  the  NPOESS  man-
agement team deserves credit for recently improving program over-
sight and holding NPOESS’s contractors more accountable. Despite 
these efforts, the NPOESS program is still fraught with risks. Our 
latest  report,  issued  last  month,  highlights  the  major  technical 
risks with two critical sensors known as VIIRS and CrIS. Both sen-
sors  remain  high  risk.  We  also  remain  concerned  about  the  inter-
agency  coordination  and  the  commitment  required  to  effectively 
manage  this  tri-agency  program.  The  tri-agency  management  ap-
proach has, and continues to be, a contributing factor to NPOESS’s 
problems. 

We also remain concerned about DOD’s plan to reassign the pro-
gram  executive  officer  this  month.  Having  a  seasoned  PEO  has 
streamlined executive decisionmaking and has resulted in more ag-
gressive risk management for the program. The PEO has only been 
in this position for 20 months. Given that the program is still being 
restructured, the significant challenges, and the fact that a replace-
ment  has  yet  to  be  named,  such  a  move  adds  unnecessary  risk  to 
an already risky program. 

Mr. Chairman, despite some progress, NPOESS is far from being 
out  of  the  woods.  Moving  forward,  it  is  essential  that  the  program 
aggressively  manage  its  remaining  developmental  risks,  especially 
those associated with its high-risk sensors, and quickly manage the 
transition  and  knowledge  transfer  associated  with  the  risky  deci-
sion  to  reassign  the  PEO.  Failing  to  address  these  and  other  con-
cerns will lead to additional cost increases and schedule delays. 

Turning  to  GOES–R:  As  originally  planned,  this  acquisition  was 
to  consist  of  four  satellites  that  would  each  contain  five  sensors 
that are to significantly increase the amount and precision of envi-
ronmental  data.  NOAA  had  three  vendors  working  on  preliminary 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

designs,  and  plans  to  award  prime  contracts  next  summer.  The 
first GOES–R satellite is expected to be launched in 2014. 

Regarding  costs,  Mr.  Chairman,  last  year  the  life-cycle  cost  was 
reported  to  be  $6.2  billion  for  four  satellites.  During  our  review  at 
that time, we learned that the costs could be in the $11–$12 billion 
range,  double  the  original  estimate.  This  led  the  agency  to  recon-
sider  the  program  and  re-scope  it,  reducing  the  complexity  by  re-
ducing  the  number  of  satellites  from  four  to  two,  and  canceling  a 
technically complex sensor, referred to as HES. Currently, the over-
all  scope  and  cost  of  the  program  is  in  flux,  as  the  number  of  sat-
ellites  is  being  reconsidered,  as  are  other  requirements  and  capa-
bilities. 

Our  review  also  showed  that  NOAA’s  management  team  is  tak-
ing  into  consideration  lessons  learned  from  the  recent  NPOESS 
and GOES–R programs, but that even more attention to these past 
problems is needed. 

Past  problems  experienced  with  these  acquisitions  include  poor 
cost  and  schedule  estimates,  technical  complexity  that  exceeds  the 
contractor’s  and  government’s  abilities  to  deliver,  insufficient  con-
tractor oversight, and ineffective executive involvement. 

NOAA  has  plans  to  address  many  of  these  past  problems;  how-
ever, additional actions are needed to better position NOAA for suc-
cess,  including  establishing  processes  to  ensure  that  an  accurate 
independent cost estimate is developed, and having an independent 
review  team  assess  the  adequacy  of  key  resources  needed  to  over-
see the contractor’s performance. 

In summary, Mr. Chairman, NOAA’s attention to both NPOESS’s 
challenges and incorporating lessons learned from past satellite ac-
quisitions  on  GOES–R  is  commendable,  but  continued  attention  to 
these  acquisition  risks  is  essential  to  maintain  continuity  of  our 
Nation’s warning and forecasting operations. 

This  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  pleased  to  respond  to 

questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Powner follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID A. POWNER, DIRECTOR, 
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY MANAGEMENT ISSUES, GAO 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee: 
We  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing  to  discuss  our 
work  on  two  major  operational  environmental  satellite  programs:  the  $12.5  billion 
National Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellite System (NPOESS) pro-
gram  and  the  planned  $7  billion  Geostationary  Operational  Environmental  Sat-
ellites-R (GOES-R) program. 

Operational  environmental  satellites  provide  data  and  imagery  that  are  used  by 
weather forecasters, climatologists, and the military to map and monitor changes in 
weather, climate, the oceans, and the environment. NPOESS—a tri-agency program 
managed by the Department of Commerce’s National Oceanic and Atmospheric Ad-
ministration  (NOAA),  the  Department  of  Defense/U.S.  Air  Force,  and  the  National 
Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA)—is expected to be a state-of-the-art, 
environment monitoring satellite system that will replace two existing polar-orbiting 
environmental  satellite  systems.  The  GOES-R  series,  managed  by  NOAA  with  as-
sistance  from  NASA,  is  to  replace  the  current  series  of  satellites  which  will  likely 
begin  to  reach  the  end  of  their  useful  lives  in  approximately  2012.  This  new  series 
is expected to mark the first major technological advance in GOES instrumentation 
since  1994.  The  NPOESS  and  GOES-R  programs  are  considered  critical  to  the 
United  States’  ability  to  maintain  the  continuity  of  data  required  for  weather  fore-
casting  (including  severe  weather  events  such  as  hurricanes)  and  global  climate 
monitoring through the years 2026 and 2028 respectively. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

At  your  request,  we  are  summarizing  the  results  of  our  previous  work  on  oper-
ational  environmental  satellite  programs,  including  NPOESS  and  the  GOES-R  pro-
gram.1 In  preparing  this  testimony,  we  relied  on  the  work  supporting  our  prior  re-
ports.  Those  reports  contain  detailed  overviews  of  our  scope  and  methodology.  All 
of the work on which this testimony is based was performed in accordance with gen-
erally accepted government auditing standards. 
Results in Brief 

NOAA  is  involved  in  two  major  satellite  acquisition  programs,  NPOESS  and 
GOES-R, and both are costly, technically complex, and critically important to weath-
er  forecasting  and  climate  monitoring.  NPOESS  was  originally  estimated  to  cost 
about $6.5 billion over the 24-year life of the program, with its first satellite launch 
planned  for  April  2009.  Over  the  last  few  years,  NPOESS  experienced  escalating 
costs,  schedule  delays,  and  technical  difficulties.  These  factors  led  to  a  June  2006 
decision to restructure the program thereby decreasing the program’s complexity by 
reducing the number of sensors and satellites, increasing its estimated cost to $12.5 
billion,  and  delaying  the  launches  of  the  first  two  satellites  to  2013  and  2016,  re-
spectively.  Since  that  time,  the  program  office  has  made  progress  in  restructuring 
the  satellite  acquisition  and  establishing  an  effective  management  structure;  how-
ever,  important  tasks  remain  to  be  done  and  significant  risks  remain.  Specifically, 
key  acquisition  documents  that  were  originally  due  in  September  2006  are  still  not 
completed,  the  program  office  is  not  yet  fully  staffed,  and  the  early  July  turnover 
of the program executive officer increases the program’s risk. Additionally, technical 
risks  remain  in  the  development  of  key  system  sensors  and  the  ground-based  data 
processing system. In April 2007, we made recommendations to complete key acqui-
sition  documents,  increase  staffing  at  the  program  office,  and  delay  reassignment 
of  the  program  executive.  Implementation  of  these  recommendations  should  reduce 
risk on this critical acquisition. 

The  GOES-R  acquisition,  originally  estimated  to  cost  $6.2  billion  and  scheduled 
to  have  the  first  satellite  ready  for  launch  in  2012,  is  at  a  much  earlier  stage  in 
its life cycle than NPOESS. In September 2006, we reported that NOAA had issued 
contracts for the preliminary design of the overall GOES-R system to three vendors 
and expected to award a contract to one of these vendors in August 2007 to develop 
the  satellites.  However,  analyses  of  GOES-R  cost—which  in  May  2006  was  esti-
mated to reach $11.4 billion—led the agency, in September 2006, to reduce the pro-
gram’s  scope  from  four  to  two  satellites  and  to  discontinue  one  of  the  critical  sen-
sors. Program officials now report that they are reevaluating that decision and may 
further  revise  the  scope  and  requirements  of  the  program  in  coming  months.  We 
also  reported  that  NOAA  had  taken  steps  to  implement  lessons  learned  from  past 
satellite  programs,  but  more  remained  to  be  done  to  ensure  sound  cost  estimates 
and  adequate  system  engineering  capabilities.  We  made  recommendations  to  the 
program  to  improve  its  capabilities  for  managing  this  program  and  agency  officials 
agreed  with  these  recommendations  and  initiated  efforts  to  implement  them.  We 
currently have work under way to evaluate GOES-R risks and challenges. 
Background 

Since  the  1960s,  geostationary  and  polar-orbiting  operational  environmental  sat-
ellites  have  been  used  by  the  United  States  to  provide  meteorological  data  for 
weather  observation,  research,  and  forecasting.  NOAA’s  National  Environmental 
Satellite  Data  and  Information  Service  (NESDIS)  is  responsible  for  managing  the 
existing  civilian  geostationary  and  polar-orbiting  satellite  systems  as  two  separate 
programs,  called  the  Geostationary  Operational  Environmental  Satellites  and  the 
Polar  Operational  Environmental  Satellites  (POES),  respectively.  The  Air  Force  is 
responsible  for  operating  a  second  polar-orbiting  environmental  satellite  system— 
the Defense Meteorological Satellite Program (DMSP). 

Polar-orbiting  environmental  satellites  obtain  environmental  data  that  are  proc-
essed to provide graphical weather images and specialized weather products. These 
satellite data are also the predominant input to numerical weather prediction mod-
els,  which  are  a  primary  tool  for  forecasting  weather  3  or  more  days  in  advance— 
including  forecasting  the  path  and  intensity  of  hurricanes.  The  weather  products 

1 GAO,  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellites:  Restructuring  is  Under  Way,  but 
Technical  Challenges  and  Risks  Remain,  GAO–07–498  (Washington,  D.C.:  April  27,  2007); 
Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellites: Restructuring is Under Way, but Challenges 
and  Risks  Remain,  GAO–07–910T  (Washington,  D.C.:  June  7,  2007);  Geostationary  Operational 
Environmental  Satellites:  Steps  Remain  in  Incorporating  Lessons  Learned  from  Other  Satellite 
Programs, GAO–06–993 (Washington, D.C.: Sept. 6, 2006); and Geostationary Operational Envi-
ronmental  Satellites:  Additional  Action  Needed  to  Incorporate  Lessons  Learned  from  Other  Sat-
ellite Programs, GAO–06–1129T (Washington, D.C.: Sept. 29, 2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

and models are used to predict the potential impact of severe weather so that com-
munities and emergency managers can help prevent and mitigate their effects. Polar 
satellites  also  provide  data  used  to  monitor  environmental  phenomena,  such  as 
ozone  depletion  and  drought  conditions,  as  well  as  data  sets  that  are  used  by  re-
searchers  for  a  variety  of  studies  such  as  climate  monitoring.  Figure  1  illustrates 
the current operational polar satellite configuration consisting of two POES and two 
DMSP satellites. 

Unlike  polar-orbiting  satellites,  which  constantly  circle  the  Earth  in  a  relatively 
low  polar  orbit,  geostationary  satellites  can  maintain  a  constant  view  of  the  Rarth 
from  a  high  orbit  of  about  22,300  miles  in  space.  NOAA  operates  GOES  as  a  two- 
satellite  system  that  is  primarily  focused  on  the  United  States  (see  fig.  2).  These 
satellites are uniquely positioned to provide timely environmental data to meteorolo-
gists  and  their  audiences  on  the  Earth’s  atmosphere,  its  surface,  cloud  cover,  and 
the  space  environment.  They  also  observe  the  development  of  hazardous  weather, 
such as hurricanes and severe thunderstorms, and track their movement and inten-
sity to reduce or avoid major losses of property and life. Furthermore, the satellites’ 
ability  to  provide  broad,  continuously  updated  coverage  of  atmospheric  conditions 
over land and oceans is important to NOAA’s weather forecasting operations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
1
A
O
A
G

28 

Satellite  Acquisition  Programs  Often  Experience  Technical  Problems,  Cost  Over-

runs, and Schedule Delays 

Satellite  acquisition  programs  are  often  technically  complex  and  risky  under-
takings,  and  as  a  result,  they  often  experience  technical  problems,  cost  overruns, 
and  schedule  delays.  We  and  others  have  reported  on  a  historical  pattern  of  re-
peated  missteps  in  the  procurement  of  major  satellite  systems,  including  NPOESS, 
the  GOES  I–M  series,  the  Air  Force’s  Space  Based  Infrared  System  High  Program 
(SBIRS-High),  and  the  Air  Force’s  Advanced  Extremely  High  Frequency  Satellite 
System  (AEHF).2 Table  1  lists  key  problems  experienced  with  these  programs. 
While each of the programs faced multiple problems, all of them experienced insuffi-
cient  maturity  of  technologies,  overly  aggressive  schedules,  insufficient  subcontract 
management,  and  inadequate  system  engineering  capabilities  for  overseeing  con-
tractors. 

Table 1: Key Problems Experienced on Selected Major Space Systems 

Problem 

NPOESS 

GOES I–M 

SBIRS—High 

AEHF 

Insufficient technical readiness prior to critical decision points 

Inadequate preliminary studies prior to the decision to award 
a development contract 

Insufficient technical maturity prior to the decision to move 
to production 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

2 GAO–07–498; GAO–06–993; GAO, Defense Acquisitions: Space System Acquisition Risks and 
Keys to Addressing Them, GAO–06–776R (Washington, D.C.: June 1, 2006); Polar-orbiting Oper-
ational  Environmental  Satellites:  Cost  Increases  Trigger  Review  and  Place  Program’s  Direction 
on Hold, GAO–06–573T (Washington, D.C.: Mar. 30, 2006); Polar-orbiting Operational Environ-
mental Satellites: Technical Problems, Cost Increases, and Schedule Delays Trigger Need for Dif-
ficult Trade-off Decisions, GAO–06–249T (Washington, D.C.: Nov. 16, 2005); Polar-orbiting Envi-
ronmental  Satellites:  Information  on  Program  Cost  and  Schedule  Changes,  GAO–04–1054 
(Washington,  D.C.:  Sept.  30,  2004);  Defense  Acquisitions:  Despite  Restructuring,  SBIRS  High 
Program  Remains  at  Risk  of  Cost  and  Schedule  Overruns,  GAO–04–48  (Washington,  D.C.:  Oct. 
31,  2003);  Military  Space  Operations:  Common  Problems  and  Their  Effects  on  Satellite  and  Re-
lated  Acquisitions,  GAO–03–825R  (Washington,  D.C.:  June  2,  2003);  Defense  Acquisitions:  As-
sessments of Major Weapon Programs, GAO–03–476 (Washington, D.C.: May 15, 2003); Weather 
Satellites:  Action  Needed  to  Resolve  Status  of  the  U.S.  Geostationary  Satellite  Program,  GAO/ 
NSIAD–91–252  (Washington,  D.C.:  July  24,  1991).  Defense  Science  Board/Air  Force  Scientific 
Advisory Board Joint Task Force, Report on the Acquisition of National Security Space Programs 
(May 2003). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
2
A
O
A
G

Table 1: Key Problems Experienced on Selected Major Space Systems—Continued 

Problem 

NPOESS 

GOES I–M 

SBIRS—High 

AEHF 

29 

Unrealistic cost and schedule estimates 

Optimistic assumptions including: 

• savings from heritage systems 
• readiness of technology maturity 
• constant and available industrial base 
• no weight growth 
• no requirements growth 
• savings from lot buys versus single-unit purchase 
• overly aggressive schedule 

Poor program and contractor management 

Quality and subcontractor issues 

Inadequate systems engineering capabilities 

Inadequate earned value management capabilities 

Insufficient management reserve 

Ineffective contract award fee structure 

Poor senior executive level oversight 

Infrequent meetings 

Inability to make timely decisions 

Other 

Unstable funding stream 

Unstable requirements 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

X 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  NOAA  and  DOD  data. 

NPOESS: Overview, Issues, and Prior GAO Recommendations 

With  the  expectation  that  combining  the  POES  and  DMSP  programs  would  re-
duce  duplication  and  result  in  sizable  cost  savings,  a  May  1994  Presidential  Deci-
sion Directive required NOAA and DOD to converge the two satellite programs into 
a  single  satellite  program  capable  of  satisfying  both  civilian  and  military  require-
ments.3 The  converged  program,  NPOESS,  is  considered  critical  to  the  United 
States’  ability  to  maintain  the  continuity  of  data  required  for  weather  forecasting 
and  global  climate  monitoring  through  the  year  2026.  To  manage  this  program, 
DOD,  NOAA,  and  NASA  formed  a  tri-agency  Integrated  Program  Office,  located 
within NOAA. 

Within  the  program  office,  each  agency  has  the  lead  on  certain  activities:  NOAA 
has  overall  program  management  responsibility  for  the  converged  system  and  for 
satellite  operations;  DOD  has  the  lead  on  the  acquisition;  and  NASA  has  primary 
responsibility for facilitating the development and incorporation of new technologies 
into  the  converged  system.  NOAA  and  DOD  share  the  costs  of  funding  NPOESS, 
while  NASA  funds  specific  technology  projects  and  studies.  The  NPOESS  program 
office is overseen by an Executive Committee, which is made up of the Administra-
tors of NOAA and NASA and the Under Secretary of the Air Force. 

NPOESS is a major system acquisition that was originally estimated to cost about 
$6.5  billion  over  the  24-year  life  of  the  program  from  its  inception  in  1995  through 
2018.  The  program  was  to  provide  satellite  development,  satellite  launch  and  oper-
ation,  and  ground-based  satellite  data  processing.  When  the  NPOESS  engineering, 
manufacturing,  and  development  contract  was  awarded  in  August  2002,  the  esti-
mated  cost  was  $7  billion.  Acquisition  plans  called  for  the  procurement  and  launch 
of six satellites over the life of the program, as well as the integration of 13 instru-
ments—consisting of 10 environmental sensors and 3 subsystems (see table 2). 

3 Presidential Decision Directive NSTC–2 (May 5, 1994). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

Table 2: Expected NPOESS Instruments as of August 31, 2004 (critical sensors are in italic) 

Instrument 

Description 

Advanced technology microwave 
sounder (ATMS) 

Aerosol polarimetry sensor 

Conical-scanned microwave imager/ 
sounder (CMIS) 

Cross-track infrared sounder (CrIS) 

Data collection system 

Earth radiation budget sensor 

Measures microwave energy released and scattered by the atmosphere 
and is to be used with infrared sounding data from NPOESS’s cross- 
track infrared sounder to produce daily global atmospheric tempera-
ture, humidity, and pressure profiles. 

Retrieves specific measurements of clouds and aerosols (liquid droplets 
or solid particles suspended in the atmosphere, such as sea spray, 
smog, and smoke). 

Collects microwave images and data needed to measure rain rate, 
ocean surface wind speed and direction, amount of water in the clouds, 
and soil moisture, as well as temperature and humidity at different at-
mospheric levels. 

Collects measurements of the earth’s radiation to determine the 
vertical distribution of temperature, moisture, and pressure in the at-
mosphere. 

Collects environmental data from platforms around the world and de-
livers them to users worldwide. 

Measures solar short-wave radiation and long-wave radiation released 
by the earth back into space on a worldwide scale to enhance long-term 
climate studies. 

Ozone mapper/profiler suite (OMPS) 

Collects data needed to measure the amount and distribution of ozone 
in the earth’s atmosphere. 

Radar altimeter 

Measures variances in sea surface height/topography and ocean surface 
roughness, which are used to determine sea surface height, significant 
wave height, and ocean surface wind speed and to provide critical in-
puts to ocean forecasting and climate prediction models. 

Search and rescue satellite aided 
tracking system 

Detects and locates aviators, mariners, and land-based users in dis-
tress. 

Space environmental sensor suite 

Collects data to identify, reduce, and predict the effects of space weath-
er on technological systems, including satellites and radio links. 

Survivability sensor 

Monitors for attacks on the satellite and notifies other instruments in 
case of an attack. 

Total solar irradiance sensor 

Monitors and captures total and spectral solar irradiance data. 

Visible/infrared imager radiometer 
suite (VIIRS) 

Collects images and radiometric data used to provide information on 
the earth’s clouds, atmosphere, ocean, and land surfaces. 

Source:  GAO,  based  on  NPOESS  program  office  data. 
In  addition,  a  demonstration  satellite  (called  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Project  or 
NPP)  was  planned  to  be  launched  several  years  before  the  first  NPOESS  satellite 
in  order  to  reduce  the  risk  associated  with  launching  new  sensor  technologies  and 
to ensure continuity of climate data with NASA’s Earth Observing System satellites. 
NPOESS  Experienced  Cost  Increases,  Schedule  Delays,  and  Technical  Problems 

Over Several Years 

Over the last few years, NPOESS experienced continued cost increases and sched-
ule  delays,  requiring  difficult  decisions  to  be  made  about  the  program’s  direction 
and capabilities. In 2003, we reported that changes in the NPOESS funding stream 
led  the  program  to  develop  a  new  program  cost  and  schedule  baseline.4 After  this 
new baseline was completed in 2004, we reported that the program office increased 
the  NPOESS  cost  estimate  from  about  $7  billion  to  $8.1  billion,  delaying  key  mile-
stones,  including  the  launch  of  the  first  satellite,  and  extending  the  life  of  the  pro-
gram  until  2020.5 In  mid-November  2005,  we  reported  that  NPOESS  continued  to 
experience  problems  in  the  development  of  a  key  sensor,  resulting  in  schedule 
delays and anticipated cost increases. This was due in part, to problems at multiple 
levels  of  management—including  subcontractor,  contractor,  program  office,  and  ex-
ecutive leadership. Recognizing that the budget for the program was no longer exe-
cutable, the NPOESS Executive Committee planned to make a decision in December 
2005 on the future direction of the program—what would be delivered, at what cost, 
and  by  when.  This  involved  deciding  among  options  involving  increased  costs,  de-
layed  schedules,  and  reduced  functionality.  We  noted  that  continued  oversight, 

4 GAO;  Polar-Orbiting  Environmental  Satellites:  Project  Risks  Could  Affect  Weather  Data 

Needed by Civilian and Military Users, GAO–03–987T (Washington, D.C.: July 15, 2003). 

5 GAO–04–1054. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

strong  leadership,  and  timely  decisionmaking  were  more  critical  than  ever,  and  we 
urged the Committee to make a decision quickly so that the program could proceed. 
However,  we  subsequently  reported  that,  in  late  November  2005,  NPOESS  cost 
growth exceeded a legislatively mandated threshold that requires DOD to certify the 
program  to  Congress.6 This  placed  any  decision  about  the  future  direction  of  the 
program  on  hold  until  the  certification  took  place  in  June  2006.  In  the  meantime, 
the  program  office  implemented  an  interim  program  plan  for  Fiscal  Year  2006  to 
continue  work  on  key  sensors  and  other  program  elements  using  Fiscal  Year  2006 
funding. 
Nunn-McCurdy Process Led To a Decision To Restructure the NPOESS Program 

The  Nunn-McCurdy  law  requires  DOD  to  take  specific  actions  when  a  major  de-
fense  acquisition  program  exceeds  certain  cost  increase  thresholds.7 The  law  re-
quires the Secretary of Defense to notify Congress when a major defense acquisition 
is  expected  to  overrun  its  project  baseline  by  15  percent  or  more  and  to  certify  the 
program  to  Congress  when  it  is  expected  to  overrun  its  baseline  by  25  percent  or 
more.8 In  late  November  2005,  NPOESS  exceeded  the  25  percent  threshold,  and 
DOD was required to certify the program. Certifying the program entailed providing 
a  determination  that  (1)  the  program  is  essential  to  national  security,  (2)  there  are 
no alternatives to the program that will provide equal or greater military capability 
at less cost, (3) the new estimates of the program’s cost are reasonable, and (4) the 
management  structure  for  the  program  is  adequate  to  manage  and  control  costs. 
DOD  established  tri-agency  teams—made  up  of  DOD,  NOAA,  and  NASA  experts— 
to work on each of the four elements of the certification process. 

In  June  2006,  DOD  (with  the  agreement  of  both  of  its  partner  agencies)  certified 
a  restructured  NPOESS  program,  estimated  to  cost  $12.5  billion  through  2026.9 
This decision approved a cost increase of $4 billion over the prior approved baseline 
cost  and  delayed  the  launch  of  NPP  and  the  first  two  satellites  by  roughly  3  to  5 
years. The new program also entailed establishing a stronger program management 
structure,  reducing  the  number  of  satellites  to  be  produced  and  launched  from  6  to 
4, and reducing the number of instruments on the satellites from 13 to 9—consisting 
of  7  environmental  sensors  and  2  subsystems.  It  also  entailed  using  NPOESS  sat-
ellites in the early morning and afternoon orbits and relying on European satellites 
for mid-morning orbit data.10 Table 3 summarizes the major program changes made 
under the Nunn-McCurdy certification decision. 

Table 3: Summary of Changes to the NPOESS Program 

Key area 

Program before the Nunn-McCurdy decision  Program after the Nunn-McCurdy decision 

Life cycle range 

1995–2020 

Estimated life cycle cost  $8.4 billion 

1995–2026 

$12.5 billion 

Launch schedule 

NPP by October 2006 
First NPOESS by November 2009 
Second NPOESS by June 2011 

NPP by January 2010 
First NPOESS by January 2013 
Second NPOESS by January 2016 

Management structure 

System Program Director reports to 
a tri-agency steering committee and 
the tri-agency Executive Committee 
Independent program reviews noted 
insufficient system engineering and 
cost analysis staff 

System Program Director is responsible for 
day-to-day program management and reports 
to the Program Executive Officer 
Program Executive Officer oversees program 
and reports to the tri-agency Executive Com-
mittee 

Number of satellites 

6 (in addition to NPP) 

4 (in addition to NPP) 

Number of orbits 

3 (early morning, midmorning, and 
afternoon) 

2 (early morning and afternoon; will rely on 
European satellites for midmorning orbit 
data) 

6 GAO, Polar-orbiting Operational Environmental Satellites: Cost Increases Trigger Review and 

Place Program’s Direction on Hold, GAO–06–573T (Washington, D.C.: Mar. 30, 2006). 

7 10 U.S.C § 2433 is commonly referred to as Nunn-McCurdy. 
8 10 U.S.C. § 2433(e)(2). 
9 DOD estimated that the acquisition portion of the certified program would cost $11.5 billion. 
The  acquisition  portion  includes  satellite  development,  production,  and  launch,  but  not  oper-
ations  and  support  costs  after  launch.  When  combined  with  an  estimated  $1  billion  for  oper-
ations and support after launch, this brings the program life cycle cost to $12.5 billion. 

10 The  European  Organization  for  the  Exploitation  of  Meteorological  Satellites’  MetOp  pro-
gram  is  a  series  of  three  polar-orbiting  satellites  dedicated  to  operational  meteorology.  MetOp 
satellites are planned to be launched sequentially over 14 years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

Table 3: Summary of Changes to the NPOESS Program—Continued 

Key area 

Program before the Nunn-McCurdy decision  Program after the Nunn-McCurdy decision 

Number and com-
plement of instruments 

13 instruments (10 sensors and 3 
subsystems) 

9 instruments (7 sensors and 2 subsystems); 
4 of the sensors are to provide fewer capabili-
ties 

Number of EDRs 

55 

39 (6 are to be degraded products) 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  NPOESS  program  office  data. 
The Nunn-McCurdy certification decision established new milestones for the deliv-
ery  of  key  program  elements,  including  launching  NPP  by  January  2010,11 launch-
ing the first NPOESS satellite (called C1) by January 2013, and launching the sec-
ond  NPOESS  satellite  (called  C2)  by  January  2016.  These  revised  milestones  devi-
ated  from  prior  plans  to  have  the  first  NPOESS  satellite  available  to  back  up  the 
final POES satellite should anything go wrong during that launch. 

Delaying  the  launch  of  the  first  NPOESS  satellite  means  that  if  the  final  POES 
satellite fails on launch, satellite data users would need to rely on the existing con-
stellation  of  environmental  satellites  until  NPP  data  becomes  available—almost  2 
years  later.  Although  NPP  was  not  intended  to  be  an  operational  asset,  NASA 
agreed to move it to a different orbit so that its data would be available in the event 
of  a  premature  failure  of  the  final  POES  satellite.  However,  NPP  will  not  provide 
all  of  the  operational  capability  planned  for  the  NPOESS  spacecraft.  If  the  health 
of the existing constellation of satellites diminishes—or if NPP data is not available, 
timely, and reliable—then there could be a gap in environmental satellite data. 

In  order  to  reduce  program  complexity,  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  decision 
decreased  the  number  of  NPOESS  sensors  from  13  to  9  and  reduced  the 
functionality  of  4  sensors.  Specifically,  of  the  13  original  sensors,  5  sensors  remain 
unchanged,  3  were  replaced  with  less  capable  sensors,  1  was  modified  to  provide 
less functionality, and 4 were canceled. Table 4 shows the changes to NPOESS sen-
sors, including the 4 identified as critical sensors. 

Table 4: Changes to NPOESS Instruments (critical sensors are in italic) 

Instrument 

ATMS 

Status of 
instrument 
after the Nunn- 
McCurdy 
decision 

Unchanged 

Aerosol polarimetry sensor 

Cancelled 

Replaced 

CMIS 

CrIS 

Change description 

Sensor is to be included on NPP and on the first and third 
NPOESS satellites. 

Sensor was cancelled, but could be reintegrated on future 
NPOESS satellites should another party choose to fund it.a 

CMIS sensor was cancelled, and the program office is to 
procure a less complex Microwave imager/sounder for in-
clusion on the second, third, and fourth NPOESS satellites. 

Unchanged 

Sensor is to be included on NPP and on the first and third 
NPOESS satellites. 

Data collection system 

Unchanged 

Subsystem is to be included on all four NPOESS satellites. 

Earth radiation budget sensor 

Replaced 

OMPS 

Modified 

Sensor was cancelled, and is to be replaced on the first 
NPOESS satellite (and no others) by an existing sensor 
with fewer capabilities called the Clouds and the Earth’s 
Radiant Energy System. 

One part of the sensor, called OMPS (nadir), is to be in-
cluded on NPP and on the first and third NPOESS sat-
ellites; the remaining part, called OMPS (limb), was can-
celled on the NPOESS satellites, but will be included on 
NPP a Radar altimeter Cancelled Sensor was cancelled, 
but could be reintegrated on future NPOESS satellites 
should another party choose to fund it.a 

Search and rescue satellite 
aided tracking system 

Unchanged 

Subsystem is to be included on all four NPOESS satellites. 

Space environmental sensor 
suite 

Replaced 

Sensor is to be replaced by a less capable, less expensive, 
legacy sensor called the Space Environment Monitor on the 
first and third NPOESS satellites. 

11 According  to  program  officials,  although  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  decision  specifies 
NPP  is  to  launch  by  January  2010,  NASA  plans  to  launch  it  by  September  2009  to  reduce  the 
possibility of a climate data continuity gap. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Table 4: Changes to NPOESS Instruments (critical sensors are in italic)—Continued 

33 

Instrument 

Survivability sensor 

Status of 
instrument 
after the Nunn- 
McCurdy 
decision 

Cancelled 

Total solar irradiance sensor 

Cancelled 

Change description 

Subsystem contract was cancelled, but could be re-
integrated on future NPOESS satellites should another 
party choose to fund it.a 

Sensor contract was cancelled, but could be reintegrated on 
future NPOESS satellites should another party choose to 
fund it.a 

VIIRS 

Unchanged 

Sensor is to be included on NPP and on all four NPOESS 
satellites. 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  NPOESS  program  office  data. 
a Although  direct  program  funding  for  these  instruments  was  eliminated,  the  instruments  could  be  reintegrated  on  NPOESS  sat-
ellites  should  other  parties  choose  to  fund  them.  The  Nunn-McCurdy  decision  requires  the  program  office  to  allow  sufficient  space 
on  the  spacecraft  for  these  instruments  and  to  provide  the  funding  needed  to  integrate  them. 

The changes in NPOESS sensors affected the number and quality of the resulting 
weather  and  environmental  products,  called  environmental  data  records  or  EDRs. 
In  selecting  sensors  for  the  restructured  program,  the  agencies  placed  the  highest 
priority  on  continuing  current  operational  weather  capabilities  and  a  lower  priority 
on obtaining selected environmental and climate measuring capabilities. As a result, 
the revised NPOESS system has significantly less capability for providing global cli-
mate  measures  than  was  originally  planned.  Specifically,  the  number  of  EDRs  was 
decreased  from  55  to  39,  of  which  6  are  of  a  reduced  quality.  The  39  EDRs  that 
remain  include  cloud  base  height,  land  surface  temperature,  precipitation  type  and 
rate, and sea surface winds. The 16 EDRs that were removed include cloud particle 
size and distribution, sea surface height, net solar radiation at the top of the atmos-
phere,  and  products  to  depict  the  electric  fields  in  the  space  environment.  The  6 
EDRs that are of a reduced quality include ozone profile, soil moisture, and multiple 
products depicting energy in the space environment. 
NPOESS  Acquisition  Restructuring  Is  Well  Under  Way,  but  Key  Steps  Remain  To 

Be Completed 

Since  the  June  2006  decision  to  revise  the  scope,  cost,  and  schedule  of  the 
NPOESS  program,  the  program  office  has  made  progress  in  restructuring  the  sat-
ellite  acquisition;  however,  important  tasks  remain  to  be  done.  Restructuring  a 
major acquisition program like NPOESS is a process that involves identifying time- 
critical  and  high-priority  work  and  keeping  this  work  moving  forward,  while  reas-
sessing  development  priorities,  interdependencies,  deliverables,  risks,  and  costs.  It 
also  involves  revising  important  acquisition  documents  including  the  Memorandum 
of Agreement on the roles and responsibilities of the three agencies, the acquisition 
strategy, the system engineering plan, the test and evaluation master plan, the inte-
grated master schedule defining what needs to happen by when, and the acquisition 
program baseline. Specifically, the Nunn-McCurdy certification decision required the 
Secretaries  of  Defense  and  Commerce  and  the  Administrator  of  NASA  to  sign  a  re-
vised  Memorandum  of  Agreement  by  August  6,  2006.  It  also  required  that  the  pro-
gram office, Program Executive Officer, and the Executive Committee revise and ap-
prove key acquisition documents including the acquisition strategy and system engi-
neering plan by September 1, 2006, in order to proceed with the restructuring. Once 
these are completed, the program office can proceed to negotiate with its prime con-
tractor  on  a  new  program  baseline  defining  what  will  be  delivered,  by  when,  and 
at what cost. 

The  NPOESS  program  office  has  made  progress  in  restructuring  the  acquisition. 
Specifically,  the  program  office  has  established  interim  program  plans  guiding  the 
contractor’s  work  activities  in  2006  and  2007  and  has  made  progress  in  imple-
menting these plans. The program office and contractor also developed an integrated 
master  schedule  for  the  remainder  of  the  program—beyond  Fiscal  Year  2007.  This 
integrated  master  schedule  details  the  steps  leading  up  to  launching  NPP  by  Sep-
tember 2009, launching the first NPOESS satellite in January 2013, and launching 
the  second  NPOESS  satellite  in  January  2016.  Near-term  steps  include  completing 
and testing the VIIRS, CrIS, and OMPS sensors; integrating these sensors with the 
NPP  spacecraft  and  completing  integration  testing;  completing  the  data  processing 
system and integrating it with the command, control, and communications segment; 
and  performing  advanced  acceptance  testing  of  the  overall  system  of  systems  for 
NPP. 

However,  key  steps  remain  for  the  acquisition  restructuring  to  be  completed.  Al-
though the program office made progress in revising key acquisition documents, in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

cluding  the  system  engineering  plan,  the  test  and  evaluation  master  plan,  and  the 
acquisition  strategy  plan,  it  has  not  yet  obtained  the  approval  of  the  Secretaries  of 
Commerce  and  Defense  and  the  Administrator  of  NASA  on  the  Memorandum  of 
Agreement  among  the  three  agencies,  nor  has  it  obtained  the  approval  of  the 
NPOESS  Executive  Committee  on  the  other  key  acquisition  documents.  As  of  June 
2007,  these  approvals  are  over  9  months  past  due.  Agency  officials  noted  that  the 
September  1,  2006,  due  date  for  the  key  acquisition  documents  was  not  realistic 
given the complexity of coordinating documents among three different agencies. 

Finalizing these documents is critical to ensuring interagency agreement and will 
allow  the  program  office  to  move  forward  in  completing  other  activities  related  to 
restructuring  the  program.  These  other  activities  include  completing  an  integrated 
baseline  review  with  the  contractor  to  reach  agreement  on  the  schedule  and  work 
activities,  and  finalizing  changes  to  the  NPOESS  development  and  production  con-
tract. Program costs are also likely to be adjusted during upcoming negotiations on 
contract changes—an event that the Program Director expects to occur in July 2007. 
Completion  of  these  activities  will  allow  the  program  office  to  lock  down  a  new  ac-
quisition  baseline  cost  and  schedule.  Until  key  acquisition  documents  are  finalized 
and  approved,  the  program  faces  increased  risk  that  it  will  not  be  able  to  complete 
important restructuring activities in time to move forward in Fiscal Year 2008 with 
a  new  program  baseline  in  place.  This  places  the  NPOESS  program  at  risk  of  con-
tinued delays and future cost increases. 
Progress  Has  Been  Made  in  Establishing  an  Effective  NPOESS  Management 
Structure,  but  Executive  Turnover  Increases  Risks  and  Staffing  Problems  Re-
main 

The  NPOESS  program  has  made  progress  in  establishing  an  effective  manage-
ment  structure,  but—almost  a  year  after  this  structure  was  endorsed  during  the 
Nunn-McCurdy certification process—the Integrated Program Office still faces staff-
ing  problems.  Over  the  past  few  years,  we  and  others  have  raised  concerns  about 
management  problems  at  all  levels  of  the  NPOESS  program,  including  subcon-
tractor  and  contractor  management,  program  office  management,  and  executive- 
level management.12 Two independent review teams also noted a shortage of skilled 
program staff, including budget analysts and system engineers. Since that time, the 
NPOESS  program  has  made  progress  in  establishing  an  effective  management 
structure—including  establishing  a  new  organizational  framework  with  increased 
oversight  by  program  executives,  instituting  more  frequent  subcontractor,  con-
tractor,  and  program  reviews,  and  effectively  managing  risks  and  performance. 
However, DOD’s plans for reassigning the Program Executive Officer in the summer 
of 2007 increase the program’s risks. Additionally, the program lacks a staffing proc-
ess  that  clearly  identifies  staffing  needs,  gaps,  and  plans  for  filling  those  gaps.  As 
a result, the program office has experienced delays in getting core management ac-
tivities  under  way  and  lacks  the  staff  it  needs  to  execute  day-to-day  management 
activities. 
NPOESS  Program  Has  Made  Progress  in  Establishing  an  Effective  Management 
Structure  and  Increasing  Oversight  Activities,  but  Executive  Turnover  Will  In-
crease Program Risks 

The  NPOESS  program  has  made  progress  in  establishing  an  effective  manage-
ment structure and increasing the frequency and intensity of its oversight activities. 
Over  the  past  few  years,  we  and  others  have  raised  concerns  about  management 
problems  at  all  levels  of  management  on  the  NPOESS  program,  including  subcon-
tractor  and  contractor  management,  program  office  management,  and  executive- 
level  management.  In  response  to  recommendations  made  by  two  different  inde-
pendent  review  teams,  the  program  office  began  exploring  options  in  late  2005  and 
early 2006 for revising its management structure. 

In November 2005, the Executive Committee established and filled a Program Ex-
ecutive Officer position, senior to the NPOESS Program Director, to streamline deci-
sionmaking  and  to  provide  oversight  to  the  program.  This  Program  Executive  Offi-
cer reports directly to the Executive Committee. Subsequently, the Program Execu-
tive  Officer  and  the  Program  Director  proposed  a  revised  organizational  framework 

12 GAO–06–249T;  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce,  Office  of  the  Inspector  General,  Poor  Man-
agement Oversight and Ineffective Incentives Leave NPOESS Program Well Over Budget and Be-
hind  Schedule,  OIG–17794–6–0001/2006  (Washington,  D.C.:  May  2006).  In  addition,  two  inde-
pendent teams reviewed the NPOESS program in 2005: A NASA-led Independent Review Team 
investigated  problems  with  the  VIIRS  sensor  and  the  impact  on  NPP,  and  a  DOD-led  Inde-
pendent Program Assessment Team assessed the broader NPOESS program. The teams briefed 
the  NPOESS  Executive  Committee  on  their  findings  in  August  2005  and  November  2005,  re-
spectively. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

that  realigned  division  managers  within  the  Integrated  Program  Office  responsible 
for  overseeing  key  elements  of  the  acquisition  and  increased  staffing  in  key  areas. 
In  June  2006,  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  decision  approved  this  new  manage-
ment  structure  and  the  Integrated  Program  Office  implemented  it.  Figure  3  pro-
vides  an  overview  of  the  relationships  among  the  Integrated  Program  Office,  the 
Program  Executive  Office,  and  the  Executive  Committee,  as  well  as  key  divisions 
within the program office. 

Operating under this new management structure, the program office implemented 
more  rigorous  and  frequent  subcontractor,  contractor,  and  program  reviews,  im-
proved  visibility  into  risk  management  and  mitigation  activities,  and  institutional-
ized the use of earned value management techniques to monitor contractor perform-
ance.  In  addition  to  these  program  office  activities,  the  Program  Executive  Officer 
implemented monthly program reviews and increased the frequency of contacts with 
the Executive Committee. The Program Executive Officer briefs the Executive Com-
mittee  in  monthly  letters,  apprising  committee  members  of  the  program’s  status, 
progress,  risks,  and  earned  value,  and  the  Executive  Committee  now  meets  on  a 
quarterly  basis—whereas  in  the  recent  past,  we  reported  that  the  Executive  Com-
mittee had met only five times in 2 years.13 

Although  the  NPOESS  program  has  made  progress  in  establishing  an  effective 
management structure, this progress is currently at risk. We recently reported that 
DOD  space  acquisitions  are  at  increased  risk  due  in  part  to  frequent  turnover  in 
leadership  positions,  and  we  suggested  that  addressing  this  will  require  DOD  to 
consider  matching  officials’  tenure  with  the  development  or  delivery  of  a  product.14 
In March 2007, NPOESS program officials stated that DOD is planning to reassign 
the  recently  appointed  Program  Executive  Officer  in  the  summer  of  2007  as  part 
of this executive’s natural career progression. As of June 2007, the Program Execu-
tive  Officer  has  held  this  position  for  19  months.  Given  that  the  program  is  cur-
rently  still  being  restructured,  and  that  there  are  significant  challenges  in  being 
able to meet critical deadlines to ensure satellite data continuity, such a move adds 
unnecessary risk to an already risky program. 
NPOESS  Program  Has  Filled  Key  Vacancies  but  Lacks  a  Programwide  Staffing 

Process 

The  NPOESS  program  office  has  filled  key  vacancies  but  lacks  a  staffing  process 
that identifies programwide staffing requirements and plans for filling those needed 
positions. Sound human capital management calls for establishing a process or plan 
for  determining  staffing  requirements,  identifying  any  gaps  in  staffing,  and  plan-
ning  to  fill  critical  staffing  gaps.  Program  office  staffing  is  especially  important  for 

13 GAO–06–249T. 
14 GAO, Space Acquisitions: Improvements Needed in Space Acquisitions and Keys to Achieving 

Them, GAO–06–626T (Washington, D.C.: Apr. 6, 2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.
8
A
O
A
G

36 

NPOESS,  given  the  acknowledgment  by  multiple  independent  review  teams  that 
staffing  shortfalls  contributed  to  past  problems.  Specifically,  these  review  teams 
noted shortages in the number of system engineers needed to provide adequate over-
sight  of  subcontractor  and  contractor  engineering  activities  and  in  the  number  of 
budget and cost analysts needed to assess contractor cost and earned value reports. 
To  rectify  this  situation,  the  June  2006  certification  decision  directed  the  Program 
Director to take immediate actions to fill vacant positions at the program office with 
the approval of the Program Executive Officer. 

Since  the  June  2006  decision  to  revise  NPOESS  management  structure,  the  pro-
gram  office  has  filled  multiple  critical  positions,  including  a  budget  officer,  a  chief 
system  engineer,  an  algorithm  division  chief,  and  a  contracts  director.  In  addition, 
on an ad hoc basis, individual division managers have assessed their needs and ini-
tiated  plans  to  hire  staff  for  key  positions.  However,  the  program  office  lacks  a 
programwide process for identifying and filling all needed positions. As a result, di-
vision  managers  often  wait  months  for  critical  positions  to  be  filled.  For  example, 
in  February  2006,  the  NPOESS  program  estimated  that  it  needed  to  hire  up  to  10 
new budget analysts. As of September 2006, none of these positions had been filled. 
As  of  April  2007,  program  officials  estimated  that  they  still  needed  to  fill  5  budget 
analyst  positions,  5  systems  engineering  positions,  and  10  technical  manager  posi-
tions. The majority of the vacancies—4 of the 5 budget positions, 4 of the 5 systems 
engineering  positions,  and  8  of  the  10  technical  manager  positions—are  to  be  pro-
vided  by  NOAA.  NOAA  officials  noted  that  each  of  these  positions  is  in  some  stage 
of  being  filled—that  is,  recruitment  packages  are  being  developed  or  reviewed,  va-
cancies  are  being  advertised,  or  candidates  are  being  interviewed,  selected,  and  ap-
proved. 

The program office attributes its staffing delays to not having the right personnel 
in  place  to  facilitate  this  process,  and  it  did  not  even  begin  to  develop  a  staffing 
process  until  November  2006.  Program  officials  noted  that  the  tri-agency  nature  of 
the  program  adds  unusual  layers  of  complexity  to  the  hiring  and  administrative 
functions  because  each  agency  has  its  own  hiring  and  performance  management 
rules.  In  November  2006,  the  program  office  brought  in  an  administrative  officer 
who took the lead in pulling together the division managers’ individual assessments 
of needed staff and has been working with the division managers to refine this list. 
This  new  administrative  officer  plans  to  train  division  managers  in  how  to  assess 
their  needs  and  to  hire  needed  staff,  and  to  develop  a  process  by  which  evolving 
needs  are  identified  and  positions  are  filled.  However,  there  is  as  yet  no  date  set 
for  establishing  this  basic  programwide  staffing  process.  As  a  result  of  the  lack  of 
a  programwide  staffing  process,  there  has  been  an  extended  delay  in  determining 
what staff is needed and in bringing those staff on board; this has resulted in delays 
in performing core activities, such as establishing the program office’s cost estimate 
and  bringing  in  needed  contracting  expertise.  Additionally,  until  a  programwide 
staffing  process  is  in  place,  the  program  office  risks  not  having  the  staff  it  needs 
to execute day-to-day management activities. 

In  commenting  on  a  draft  of  our  report,  Commerce  stated  that  NOAA  imple-
mented an accelerated hiring model. More recently, the NPOESS program office re-
ported  that  several  critical  positions  were  filled  in  April  and  May  2007.  However, 
we  have  not  yet  evaluated  NOAA’s  accelerated  hiring  model  and,  as  of  June  2007, 
about 10 key positions remained to be filled. 
Major Program Segments Are Under Development, but Significant Risks Remain 

Major segments of the NPOESS program—the space segment and ground systems 
segment—are  under  development;  however,  significant  problems  have  occurred  and 
risks remain. The program office is aware of these risks and is working to mitigate 
them,  but  continued  problems  could  affect  the  program’s  overall  cost  and  schedule. 
Given  the  tight  time-frames  for  completing  key  sensors,  integrating  them  on  the 
NPP spacecraft, and developing, testing, and deploying the ground-based data proc-
essing systems, it will be important for the NPOESS Integrated Program Office, the 
Program Executive Office, and the Executive Committee to continue to provide close 
oversight of milestones and risks. 
Space Segment—Progress Made, but Key Sensors Continue To Face Major Risks 

The  space  segment  includes  the  sensors  and  the  spacecraft.  Four  sensors  are  of 
critical  importance—VIIRS,  CrIS,  OMPS,  and  ATMS—because  they  are  to  be 
launched  on  the  NPP  satellite  in  September  2009.  Initiating  work  on  another  sen-
sor,  the  Microwave  imager/sounder,  is  also  important  because  this  new  sensor—re-
placing the canceled CMIS sensor—will need to be developed in time for the second 
NPOESS  satellite  launch.  Over  the  past  year,  the  program  made  progress  on  each 
of  the  sensors  and  the  spacecraft.  However,  two  sensors,  VIIRS  and  CrIS,  have  ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

perienced  major  problems.  The  status  of  each  of  the  components  of  the  space  seg-
ment is described in table 5. 

Table 5: Status of Selected Components of the Space Segment, as of April 2007 

Space segment 
component 

Risk level 

Status 

VIIRS 

High 

CrIS 

High 

OMPS 

Moderate 

ATMS 

Low 

VIIRS development has continued in 2006 and in early 2007. In Decem-
ber 2006, the contractor completed environmental tests of VIIRS’s engi-
neering design unit (a prototype) and identified three problems.a While 
these problems were being studied, the program office approved the de-
livery of the engineering unit to the subcontractor responsible for inte-
gration and testing on NPP. In late February 2007, program officials de-
termined that the contractor was able to mitigate all but one of the prob-
lems, and they approved the flight unit to proceed to system level inte-
gration with a goal of resolving the final problem before a technical read-
iness review milestone. VIIRS flight unit is scheduled to be delivered to 
NPP by July 2008. 

Development of CrIS was put on hold in October 2006 when the flight 
unit designated to go on NPP experienced a major structural failure dur-
ing its vibration testing. As of March 2007, a failure review board estab-
lished by the contractors and the NPOESS program office identified 
causes for failure and has planned an approach to completing flight unit 
development and delivery for NPP. The review board has also initiated 
inspections of all sensor modules and subsystems for damage. The pro-
gram office expects to restart acceptance testing in July 2007, and the 
CrIS flight unit is expected to be delivered to NPP by February 2008. 

As part of the Nunn-McCurdy certification in June 2006, one element of 
the OMPS sensor, called OMPS (limb), was removed from the program. 
In February 2007, program officials agreed to reintegrate OMPS (limb) 
on NPP if NOAA and NASA would fund it. This funding was approved in 
early April 2007. OMPS is currently on schedule for delivery to NPP by 
May 2008; however, there are concerns that the OMPS flight unit deliv-
ery will be so late in the integration testing process that there could be 
an insufficient schedule margin should a problem arise. 

The ATMS flight unit for NPP was developed by a NASA contractor and 
delivered to the program in October 2005. NASA integrated the flight 
unit on the spacecraft and is awaiting delivery of the other sensors in 
order to complete integration testing. 

Microwave imager/ 
sounder 

Not yet rated  A new microwave imager/sounder sensor is being planned to replace the 

cancelled CMIS sensor. It is planned to be ready for the launch on the 
second NPOESS satellite. In October 2006, the program office issued a 
request for information seeking industry ideas for the design of the new 
sensor. The program office anticipates awarding a contract to develop the 
sensor by October 2008. 

Spacecraft 

Low 

The development of the spacecrafts for NPP and NPOESS are on track. 
The NPP spacecraft was completed in June 2005. Integration testing will 
be conducted once the NPP sensors are delivered. 
Early issues with the NPOESS spacecraft (including issues with anten-
nas and a data storage unit) have been resolved; however, risks remain 
that could delay the completion of the spacecraft. A key risk involves 
delays in the delivery of the solar array, which may arrive too late to be 
included in some key testing. Other risks associated with the electrical 
power subsystem are taking longer than anticipated to resolve. 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  NPOESS  Integrated  Program  Office  data. 
a The  three  problems  are  (1)  band-to-band  co-registration,  an  issue  in  which  band  registration  shifts  with  different  temperatures; 
(2)  cross-talk,  which  involves  information  from  sensor  cells  leaking  into  other  cells;  and  (3)  line-spread  function  issues,  in  which  the 
instrument’s  focus  changes  with  changes  in  temperature. 

Managing the risks associated with the development of VIIRS and CrIS is of par-
ticular  importance  because  these  components  are  to  be  demonstrated  on  the  NPP 
satellite,  currently  scheduled  for  launch  in  September  2009.  Any  delay  in  the  NPP 
launch  date  could  affect  the  overall  NPOESS  program,  because  the  success  of  the 
program  depends  on  the  lessons  learned  in  data  processing  and  system  integration 
from the NPP satellite. Additionally, continued sensor problems could lead to higher 
final program costs. 
Ground Segment—Progress Has Been Made, but Work Remains 

Development of the ground segment—which includes the interface data processing 
system, the ground stations that are to receive satellite data, and the ground-based 
command,  control,  and  communications  system—is  under  way  and  on  track.  How-
ever, important work pertaining to developing the algorithms that translate satellite 
data  into  weather  products  within  the  integrated  data  processing  segment  remains 
to  be  completed.  Table  6  describes  each  of  the  components  of  the  ground  segment 
and identifies the status of each. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

Table 6: Status of Ground Segment Components, as of April 2007 

Ground segment 
component/description 

Risk level 

Status 

Moderate 

Interface Data Processing 
System (IDPS): 
A ground-based system that is 
to process the sensors’ data so 
that they are usable by the 
data processing centers and the 
broader community of environ-
mental data users. IDPS will 
be deployed at the four weath-
er data processing centers. 

Low 

Ground stations for receiving 
satellite data: 
15 unmanned ground stations 
around the world (called 
SafetyNetTM) are to receive sat-
ellite data and send these to 
the four data processing cen-
ters. 

IDPS is being developed in a series of builds. Currently, IDPS 
build 1.4 has been delivered for testing and recently passed two 
key data transfer tests. Contractors are currently working to de-
velop IDPS build 1.5, which is expected to be the build that will be 
used with NPP. However, work remains in three areas: system la-
tency, algorithm performance, and calibration and validation plan-
ning. 
Latency—IDPS must process volumes of data within 65 minutes to 
meet NPP requirements. The contractor has made progress in re-
ducing the latency of the system’s data handling from 93 minutes 
to 73 minutes and is working to reduce it by 8 minutes more by 
resolving data management issues, increasing the number of proc-
essors, and increasing algorithm efficiency. 
Algorithm performance—IDPS algorithms are the mathematical 
functions coded into the system software that transform raw data 
into data products, including sensor data records and environ-
mental data records. IDPS build 1.4 contains provisional algo-
rithms, which are being refined as the sensors complete various 
stages of testing. Because some sensors are delayed, full character-
ization of those sensors in order to refine the algorithms has also 
been delayed and may not be completed in time for the delivery of 
IDPS build 1.5 in early 2009. If this occurs, agency officials plan to 
improve the algorithms in build 1.5 during a planned maintenance 
upgrade prior to NPP launch. Calibration/validation—Calibration/ 
validation is the process for tweaking algorithms to provide more 
accurate observations. The contractor has documented a detailed 
schedule for calibration and validation during IDPS development 
and is developing a postlaunch task list to drive prelaunch prepa-
ration efforts. However, much work and uncertainty continue to 
exist in the calibration and validation area. A program official 
noted that, while teams can do a lot of preparation work, including 
building the infrastructure to allow sensor testing and having a 
good understanding of the satellite, sensors, and available data for 
calibration, many issues need to take place after launch. 

NOAA is working with domestic and foreign authorities to gain 
approval to operate ground stations to receive satellite data. Ac-
cording to agency officials, the full complement of ground stations 
will not be in place in time for the C1 launch: however, the ground 
stations will be phased in by the launch of C2. To date, the pro-
gram office has reached agreement with 4 of 15 ground station 
sites. 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  NPOESS  program  office  data. 
Managing the risks associated with the development of the IDPS system is of par-

ticular importance because this system will be needed to process NPP data. 
Implementation of GAO Recommendations Should Reduce Risk 

Because  of  the  importance  of  effectively  managing  the  NPOESS  program  to  en-
sure that there are no gaps in the continuity of critical weather and environmental 
observations,  in  our  April  2007  report,15 we  made  recommendations  to  the  Secre-
taries  of  Defense  and  Commerce  and  to  the  Administrator  of  NASA  to  ensure  that 
the responsible executives within their respective organizations approve key acquisi-
tion  documents,  including  the  Memorandum  of  Agreement  among  the  three  agen-
cies, the system engineering plan, the test and evaluation master plan, and the ac-
quisition  strategy,  as  quickly  as  possible  but  no  later  than  April  30,  2007.  We  also 
recommended that the Secretary of Defense direct the Air Force to delay reassigning 
the recently appointed Program Executive Officer until all sensors have been deliv-
ered to the NPOESS Preparatory Program; these deliveries are currently scheduled 
to  occur  by  July  2008.  We  also  made  two  additional  recommendations  to  the  Sec-
retary  of  Commerce  to  (1)  develop  and  implement  a  written  process  for  identifying 
and addressing human capital needs and for streamlining how the program handles 
the  three  different  agencies’  administrative  procedures  and  (2)  establish  a  plan  for 
immediately filling needed positions. 

In  written  comments,  all  three  agencies  agreed  that  it  was  important  to  finalize 
key  acquisition  documents  in  a  timely  manner,  and  DOD  proposed  extending  the 
due  dates  for  the  documents  to  July  2,  2007.  DOD  subsequently  extended  the  due 
dates  to  September  and  October  2007  and  March  2008  in  the  case  of  the  test  and 
evaluation  master  plan.  Because  the  NPOESS  program  office  intends  to  complete 

15 GAO–07–498. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

contract negotiations in July 2007, we remain concerned that any further delays in 
approving  the  documents  could  delay  contract  negotiations  and  thus  increase  the 
risk to the program. 

In addition, the Department of Commerce agreed with our recommendation to de-
velop and implement a written process for identifying and addressing human capital 
needs  and  to  streamline  how  the  program  handles  the  three  different  agencies’  ad-
ministrative  procedures.  The  Department  also  agreed  with  our  recommendation  to 
plan  to  immediately  fill  open  positions  at  the  NPOESS  program  office.  Commerce 
noted  that  NOAA  identified  the  skill  sets  needed  for  the  program  and  has  imple-
mented  an  accelerated  hiring  model  and  schedule  to  fill  all  NOAA  positions  in  the 
NPOESS  program.  Commerce  also  noted  that  NOAA  has  made  NPOESS  hiring  a 
high priority and has documented a strategy—including milestones—to ensure that 
all NOAA positions are filled by June 2007. 

DOD  did  not  concur  with  our  recommendation  to  delay  reassigning  the  Program 
Executive Officer, noting that the NPOESS System Program Director responsible for 
executing  the  acquisition  program  would  remain  in  place  for  4  years.  The  Depart-
ment  of  Commerce  also  noted  that  the  Program  Executive  Officer  position  is 
planned  to  rotate  between  the  Air  Force  and  NOAA.  Commerce  also  stated  that  a 
selection would be made before the departure of the current Program Executive Offi-
cer  to  provide  an  overlap  period  to  allow  for  knowledge  transfer  and  ensure  con-
tinuity.  However,  over  the  last  few  years,  we  and  others  (including  an  independent 
review team and the Commerce Inspector General) have reported that ineffective ex-
ecutive-level oversight helped foster the NPOESS program’s cost and schedule over-
runs. We remain concerned that reassigning the Program Executive at a time when 
NPOESS is still facing critical cost, schedule, and technical challenges will place the 
program at further risk. 

In  addition,  while  it  is  important  that  the  System  Program  Director  remain  in 
place to ensure continuity in executing the acquisition, this position does not ensure 
continuity  in  the  functions  of  the  Program  Executive  Officer.  The  current  Program 
Executive  Officer  is  experienced  in  providing  oversight  of  the  progress,  issues,  and 
challenges facing NPOESS and coordinating with Executive Committee members as 
well as the Defense acquisition authorities. Additionally, while the Program Execu-
tive  Officer  position  is  planned  to  rotate  between  agencies,  the  Memorandum  of 
Agreement  documenting  this  arrangement  is  still  in  draft  and  should  be  flexible 
enough to allow the current Program Executive Officer to remain until critical risks 
have been addressed. 

Further, while Commerce plans to allow a period of overlap between the selection 
of  a  new  Program  Executive  Officer  and  the  departure  of  the  current  one,  time  is 
running  out.  The  current  Program  Executive  Officer  is  expected  to  depart  in  early 
July 2007, and as of early July 2007, a successor has not yet been named. NPOESS 
is  an  extremely  complex  acquisition,  involving  three  agencies,  multiple  contractors, 
and  advanced  technologies.  There  is  not  sufficient  time  to  transfer  knowledge  and 
develop  the  sound  professional  working  relationships  that  the  new  Program  Execu-
tive Officer will need to succeed in that role. Thus, we remain convinced that given 
NPOESS  current  challenges,  reassigning  the  current  Program  Executive  Officer  at 
this time is not appropriate. 
GOES-R: Overview, Issues, and Prior GAO Recommendations 

To  provide  continuous  satellite  coverage,  NOAA  acquires  several  satellites  at  a 
time  as  part  of  a  series  and  launches  new  satellites  every  few  years  (see  table  7). 
To date, NOAA has procured three series of GOES satellites and is planning to ac-
quire a fourth series, called GOES-R. 

Table 7: Summary of the Procurement History of GOES 

Series name 

Original GOESb 

GOES I–M 

GOES–N 

GOES–R 

Procurement durationa 

Satellites 

1970–1987 

1985–2001 

1998–2011 

2007–2020 

1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 

8, 9, 10, 11, 12 

13, O, P, Qc 

R, S, T, Ud 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  NOAA  data. 
a Duration  includes  time  from  contract  award  to  final  satellite  launch. 
b The  procurement  of  these  satellites  consisted  of  four  separate  contracts  for  (1)  two  early  prototype  satellites  and  GOES–1,  (2) 

GOES–2  and  –3,  (3)  GOES–4  through  –6,  and  (4)  GOES–G  (failed  on  launch)  and  GOES–7. 

c NOAA  decided  not  to  exercise  the  option  for  this  satellite. 
d NOAA  recently  decided  to  drop  satellites  T  and  U  from  this  series,  but  is  now  reconsidering  that  decision. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Original GOES Satellites 

In  1970,  NOAA  initiated  its  original  GOES  program  based  on  experimental  geo-
stationary  satellites  developed  by  NASA.  While  these  satellites  operated  effectively 
for many years, they had technical limitations. For example, this series of satellites 
was ‘‘spin-stabilized,’’ meaning that the satellites slowly spun while in orbit to main-
tain  a  stable  position  with  respect  to  the  Earth.  As  a  result,  the  satellite  viewed 
the Earth only about 5 percent of the time and had to collect data very slowly, cap-
turing  one  narrow  band  of  data  each  time  its  field-of-view  swung  past  the  Earth. 
A complete set of sounding data took 2 to 3 hours to collect. 
GOES I–M Series 

In  1985,  NOAA  and  NASA  began  to  procure  a  new  generation  of  GOES,  called 
the GOES I-M series, based on a set of requirements developed by NOAA’s National 
Weather  Service,  NESDIS,  and  NASA,  among  others.  GOES  I–M  consisted  of  five 
satellites,  GOES–8  through  GOES–12,  and  was  a  significant  improvement  in  tech-
nology  from  the  original  GOES  satellites.  For  example,  GOES  I–M  was  ‘‘body-sta-
bilized,’’  meaning  that  the  satellite  held  a  fixed  position  in  orbit  relative  to  the 
Earth, thereby allowing for continuous meteorological observations. Instead of main-
taining  stability  by  spinning,  the  satellite  would  preserve  its  fixed  position  by  con-
tinuously  making  small  adjustments  in  the  rotation  of  internal  momentum  wheels 
or by firing small thrusters to compensate for drift. These and other enhancements 
meant  that  the  GOES  I–M  satellites  would  be  able  to  collect  significantly  better 
quality data more quickly than the older series of satellites. 
GOES–N Series 

In  1998,  NOAA  began  the  procurement  of  satellites  to  follow  GOES  I–M,  called 
the  GOES-N  series.  This  series  used  existing  technologies  for  the  instruments  and 
added system upgrades, including an improved power subsystem and enhanced sat-
ellite pointing accuracy. Furthermore, the GOES–N satellites were designed to oper-
ate  longer  than  its  predecessors.  This  series  originally  consisted  of  four  satellites, 
GOES–N through GOES–Q. However, the option for the GOES–Q satellite was can-
celed based on NOAA’s assessment that it would not need the final satellite to con-
tinue  weather  coverage.  In  particular,  the  agency  found  that  the  GOES  satellites 
already  in  operation  were  lasting  longer  than  expected  and  that  the  first  satellite 
in  the  next  series  could  be  available  to  back  up  the  last  of  the  GOES–N  satellites. 
As  noted  earlier,  the  first  GOES–N  series  satellite—GOES–13—was  launched  in 
May 2006. The GOES–O and GOES–P satellites are currently in production and are 
expected to be launched in July 2008 and July 2011, respectively. 
Planned GOES-R Series 

NOAA  is  currently  planning  to  procure  the  next  series  of  GOES  satellites,  called 
the  GOES-R  series.  NOAA  is  planning  for  the  GOES-R  program  to  improve  on  the 
technology  of  prior  GOES  series,  both  in  terms  of  system  and  instrument  improve-
ments.  The  system  improvements  are  expected  to  fulfill  more  demanding  user  re-
quirements  and  to  provide  more  rapid  information  updates.  Table  8  highlights  key 
system-related improvements that GOES-R is expected to make to the geostationary 
satellite program. 

Table 8: Summary of Key GOES–R System Improvements 

Key feature 

Total products 

Downlink rate of raw data collected by 
instruments (from satellite to ground stations) 

Broadcast rate of processed GOES data (from 
satellite to users) 

GOES–N (current) 

41 

2.6 Mbps 

2.1 Mbps 

Raw data storage (the length of time that raw 
data will be stored at ground stations) 

0 days 

GOES–R 
∼152 

132 Mbps 

17–24 Mbps 

30 days 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  NOAA  data. 
The  instruments  on  the  GOES-R  series  are  expected  to  increase  the  clarity  and 
precision of the observed environmental data. Originally, NOAA planned to acquire 
5 different instruments. The program office considered two of the instruments—the 
Advanced  Baseline  Imager  and  the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite—to  be  the 
most  critical  because  they  would  provide  data  for  key  weather  products.  Table  9 
summarizes the originally planned instruments and their expected capabilities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

Table 9: Expected GOES-R Series Instruments, as of June 2006 

Planned instrument 

Description 

Advanced Baseline Imager 

Hyperspectral Environmental Suite 

Space Environmental In-Situ Suite 

Solar Imaging Suite 

Geostationary Lightning Mapper 

Expected to provide variable area imagery and radiometric information 
of the earth’s surface, atmosphere, and cloud cover. Key features in-
clude 

• monitoring and tracking severe weather, 
• providing images of clouds to support forecasts, and 
• providing higher resolution, faster coverage, and broader coverage 

simultaneously. 

Expected to provide information about the earth’s surface to aid in the 
prediction of weather and climate monitoring. Key features include 
• providing atmospheric moisture and temperature profiles to sup-
• monitoring coastal regions for ecosystem health, water quality, 
• providing higher resolution and faster coverage. 

coastal erosion, and harmful algal blooms, and 

port forecasts and climate monitoring, 

Expected to provide information on space weather to aid in the pre-
diction of particle precipitation, which causes disturbance and disrup-
tion of radio communications and navigation systems. Key features in-
clude 

• measuring magnetic fields and charged particles, 
• providing improved heavy ion detection, adding low energy elec-
• enabling early warnings for satellite and power grid operation, 

trons andprotons, and 

telecom services, astronauts, and airlines. 

Expected to provide coverage of the entire dynamic range of solar X-ray 
features, from coronal holes to X-class flares, as well as estimate the 
measure of temperature and emissions. Key features include 

• providing images of the sun and measuring solar output to monitor 
• providing improved imager capability. 

solar storms and 

Expected to continuously monitor lightning activity over the United 
States and provide a more complete dataset than previously possible. 
Key features include 

• detecting lightning strikes as an indicator of severe storms and 
• providing a new capability to GOES that only previously existed on 

polar satellites. 

Source:  GAO  analysis  of  NOAA  data. 
After  our  report  was  issued,  NOAA  officials  told  us  that  the  agency  decided  to 
cancel its plans for the development of the Hyperspectral Environmental Suite, but 
expected to explore options to ensure the continuity of data provided by the current 
GOES  series.  Additionally,  NOAA  reduced  the  number  of  satellites  in  the  GOES- 
R series from four to two satellites. 
The  GOES-R  Series  Procurement  Activities  Are  Under  Way,  but  System  Require-

ments and Cost Estimates May Change 

NOAA is nearing the end of the preliminary design phase of its GOES-R system, 
which was initially estimated to cost $6.2 billion and scheduled to have the first sat-
ellite ready for launch in 2012. At the time of our most recent review in September 
2006,16 NOAA had issued contracts for the preliminary design of the overall GOES- 
R system to three vendors and expected to award a contract to one of these vendors 
in  August  2007  to  develop  the  satellites.  In  addition,  to  reduce  the  risks  associated 
with developing new instruments, NOAA issued contracts for the early development 
of two instruments and for the preliminary designs of three other instruments. 

However, analyses of the GOES-R program cost—which in May 2006 the program 
office  estimated  could  reach  $11.4  billion—led  the  agency  to  consider  reducing  the 
scope of requirements for the satellite series. In September 2006, NOAA officials re-
ported  that  the  agency  had  made  a  decision  to  reduce  the  scope  and  complexity  of 
the GOES-R program by reducing the number of satellites from 4 to 2 and canceling 
a  technically  complex  instrument—called  the  Hyperspectral  Environmental  Suite. 
As of July 2007, agency officials reported that they are considering further changes 
to the scope of the program, which are likely to affect the overall program cost. We 
have work under way to evaluate these changes. 
Steps Taken To Reduce GOES–R Risk, More Work Remains 

NOAA has taken steps to implement lessons learned from past satellite programs, 
but  more  remains  to  be  done.  As  outlined  previously,  key  lessons  from  these  pro-
grams include the need to (1) establish realistic cost and schedule estimates, (2) en-

16 GAO–06–993. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

sure sufficient technical readiness of the system’s components prior to key decisions, 
(3) provide sufficient management at government and contractor levels, and (4) per-
form  adequate  senior  executive  oversight  to  ensure  mission  success.  NOAA  estab-
lished plans to address these lessons by conducting independent cost estimates, per-
forming preliminary studies of key technologies, placing resident government offices 
at key contractor locations, and establishing a senior executive oversight committee. 
However, many steps remain to fully address these lessons. Specifically, at the time 
of  our  review,  NOAA  had  not  yet  developed  a  process  to  evaluate  and  reconcile  the 
independent  and  government  cost  estimates.  In  addition,  NOAA  had  not  yet  deter-
mined  how  it  will  ensure  that  a  sufficient  level  of  technical  maturity  will  be 
achieved in time for an upcoming decision milestone, nor had it determined the ap-
propriate  level  of  resources  it  needs  to  adequately  track  and  oversee  the  program 
using  earned  value  management.17 Until  it  completes  these  activities,  NOAA  faces 
an increased risk that the GOES–R program will repeat the increased cost, schedule 
delays, and performance shortfalls that have plagued past procurements. 
Implementation of GAO Recommendations Should Reduce GOES-R Acquisition Risk 
To improve NOAA’s ability to effectively manage the GOES-R procurement, in our 
September  2006  report,18 we  made  recommendations  to  the  Secretary  of  Commerce 
to  direct  its  NOAA  Program  Management  Council  to  establish  a  process  for  objec-
tively evaluating and reconciling the government and independent life cycle cost es-
timates once the program requirements are finalized; to establish a team of system 
engineering  experts  to  perform  a  comprehensive  review  of  the  Advanced  Baseline 
Imager  instrument  to  determine  the  level  of  technical  maturity  achieved  on  the  in-
strument  before  moving  the  instrument  into  production;  and  to  seek  assistance  in 
determining the appropriate levels of resources needed at the program office to ade-
quately  track  and  oversee  the  contractor’s  earned  value  management  data.  In  writ-
ten  comments  at  that  time,  the  Department  of  Commerce  agreed  with  our  rec-
ommendations  and  provided  information  on  its  plans  to  implement  our  rec-
ommendations. 

In  summary,  both  the  NPOESS  and  GOES-R  programs  are  critical  to  developing 
weather  forecasts,  issuing  severe  weather  warnings  for  events  such  as  hurricanes, 
and maintaining continuity in environmental and climate monitoring. Over the last 
several years, the NPOESS program experienced cost, schedule, and technical prob-
lems,  but  has  now  been  restructured  and  is  making  progress.  Still,  technical  and 
programmatic  risks  remain.  The  GOES-R  program  has  incorporated  lessons  from 
other  satellite  acquisitions,  but  still  faces  challenges  in  establishing  the  manage-
ment  capabilities  it  needs  and  in  determining  the  scope  of  the  program.  We  have 
work  under  way  to  evaluate  the  progress  and  risks  of  both  NPOESS  and  GOES- 
R in order to assist with Congressional oversight of these critical programs. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  statement.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer  any 

questions that you or members of the Committee may have at this time. 

Senator NELSON. Thanks, Mr. Powner. And we’ll have a number 
of  questions  to  follow  up  on  your  observations  of  the  system,  as 
well as the management. 

Dr. Holland, let’s hear your perspective from the National Center 

for Atmospheric Research. 

STATEMENT OF GREG J. HOLLAND, PH.D., DIRECTOR, 

MESOSCALE AND MICROSCALE METEOROLOGY DIVISION, 

EARTH SYSTEMS LABORATORY, 

NATIONAL CENTER FOR ATMOSPHERIC RESEARCH 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And,  in  particular, 
thank you for the opportunity to address the Committee on the im-
portance  of  hurricane  observations.  And  I’m  going  to  focus  on  the 
hurricane  observations,  and  I’m  going  to  take  those  as  part  of  the 
complete  forecast  process,  because  I  think  it  is  important  that  we 
do that. 

17 Earned value management is a method that compares the value of work accomplished dur-

ing a given period with that of the work expected in that period. 

18 GAO–06–993. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

As  you’ve  correctly  noted,  we  came  out  of  a  period  of  low  hurri-
cane  activity  in  the  1970s  and  1980s,  into  an  enhanced  period 
starting  in  1995.  And  looking  back  on  that  period,  it  is  now—it 
seems  inevitable  that  2004  and  2005  would  eventually  happen.  I 
think that what it has done is brought us to a position where there 
is genuinely a crisis of hurricane proportions in regard to the total 
observing and forecasting process for the country. 

And  I  might  add,  also,  that  this  affects  all  of  the  country.  New 
York—let me take New Orleans, for a start. That was an extremely 
bad disaster, but it pales in significance of what could happen with 
New  York  if  a  Category  or0hurricane  came  through  and  generated 
the storm surge that would flood the subways and the underground 
communications  and  electronics  systems.  You  could  actually  have 
the  situation  where  the  entire  city  was  essentially  uninhabitable 
for weeks, or perhaps months, without there being any real visible 
sign of damage above the ground. 

We  have—for  every  dollar  that  gets  spent  in  coastal  regions  to 
improve—to  repair  hurricane  damage,  there  are  bridges  and  other 
facilities in another part of the country that did not get built. And 
our port facilities are all—almost all located in hurricane-impacted 
areas.  So,  it’s  a  problem  that  really  does  affect  the  country  from 
Puerto Rico to Guam and from Florida to Alaska. 

It’s  also  a  problem  that  is  projected  to  continue  for  some  period. 
There  is  no  evidence  that  the  problem  is  going  to  go  away  in  the 
next  decade  or  two,  and  is,  therefore,  something  that  we  will  see 
an increasing need to address. 

So,  my  testimony  addresses  the  entire  process,  from  the  observ-

ing through to the response. 

The  observing  part  has  been  taken  up  here,  and  I  congratulate 
and thank the Committee for taking their valuable time to address 
the  hurricane—the  satellite  observing  process,  in  general—but  it 
only—also includes how we actually put those data into the numer-
ical  models  and  into  the  analysis  system.  It  includes  the  actual 
models that are actually used for the forecasting. It includes the re-
search  that  is  underpinning  all  of  the  work  that  is  happening.  It 
includes  the  communications  of  the  result  to  the  general  public. 
And it also includes us doing the work that allows us to make pro-
jections out into the future which are both rational and as accurate 
as  possible,  so  that  our  children,  and  our  children’s  children,  will 
not  have  to  live  with  some  of  the  mistakes  that  we’re  seeing  from 
our parents today. 

So,  in  specific  reference  to  satellites,  I  have  referred  to  three  or 
four different satellites in there, but I want to start by saying that 
it’s  often  easy  to  focus  on  a  satellite  and  focus  on,  say,  the  North 
Atlantic  or  a  particular  hurricane  and  say,  ‘‘What  observations 
have  we  got  on  that  hurricane?’’  But  I  put  it  to  you  that  the  real 
advantage  of  the  satellite  system  is  not  the  observations  taken  in 
the  vicinity  of  the  hurricane,  they  are  the  global  observations  for 
which  the  satellites  stand  alone  and  shine,  that  are  absolutely  es-
sential  to  the  forecast  process.  If  an  error  is  made  in  the  analysis 
in  China,  and,  7  days  later,  a  tropical  cyclone  is  coming  into  Flor-
ida, the errors from that analysis can propagate through the entire 
system so that there is actually an error in the track of the tropical 
cyclone coming into Florida simply because there were bad data in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

China.  And  that  is  just  simply  a  fact  of  life  of  the  way  in  which 
meteorology works. 

So,  I’ve  referred  to  various  instruments  in  there.  I’ll  leave  it  to 
you  and  your  colleagues  to  read  the  details.  But  I  do  want  to  go, 
in my last few minutes, to emphasize the need for a integrated ap-
proach to this problem. 

After  the  disastrous  2005  hurricane  season,  there  was—several 
peak  scientific  bodies  got  together,  of  which,  somehow,  I  was  on 
some,  and  these  included  the  Hurricane  Intensity  Research  Work-
ing  Group,  reporting  to  the  NOAA  Science  Board,  the  large  group 
of people that reported to the National Science Board on the hurri-
cane  problem,  an  AGU  meeting  of  experts,  and  a  ad  hoc  grouping 
of general experts in tropical cyclones across the whole board, that 
got together and looked at the problem. They all came to the same 
conclusions,  and  these  conclusions  are  embodied  in  the  National 
Hurricane  Research  Initiative  Act  of  2007  which  is  before  this 
Committee.  And  I  thank  Senator  Nelson  and  your  colleagues  for 
having brought it to the Committee. 

I urge that you not just address the observing problem, that you 
take  the  entire  problem  and  give  priority  attention  to  this  impor-
tant Act. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Holland follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GREG J.  HOLLAND,  PH.D.,* DIRECTOR,  MESOSCALE AND 
MICROSCALE METEOROLOGY DIVISION,  EARTH SYSTEMS LABORATORY NATIONAL 
CENTER FOR ATMOSPHERIC RESEARCH ** 

Introduction 

I thank Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and the other members of the 
Committee for the opportunity to speak with you today on the importance of obser-
vations  in  reducing  the  impacts  of  hurricanes.  My  name  is  Greg  J.  Holland  and  I 
am Director of the Mesoscale and Microscale Meteorology Division in the Earth Sun 
Systems  Laboratory  at  the  National  Center  for  Atmospheric  Research  (NCAR)  in 
Boulder, Colorado. I commenced my career as a weather forecaster and my personal 
research has centered on severe weather, especially hurricanes, and has covered all 
aspects:  basic  theory;  conduct  of  major  field  programs;  development  of  new  observ-
ing systems; computer modeling and direct operational applications. I have authored 
or  co-authored  more  than  110  peer-reviewed  scientific  journal  articles  and  book 
chapters.  I  have  given  several  hundred  invited  talks  worldwide,  as  well  as  many 
contributed  presentations  at  national  and  international  conferences  on  hurricanes 
and  related  events.  I  have  convened  several  national  and  international  workshops, 
and I have served on several national and international science-planning efforts, in-
cluding  Chairmanship  of  the  World  Meteorological  Organization’s  Tropical  Meteor-
ology Research Program. Currently, I am serving on the National Research Council 
Study  Committee:  New  Orleans  Hurricane  Protection  and  I  am  a  Lead  author  on 
the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP)  Draft  Synthesis  and  Assessment 
Product 3.3: Weather and Climate Extremes in a Changing Climate. 

The  work  in  my  division  at  NCAR  (www.mmm.ucar.edu/index.php)  includes  re-
search on the modeling and prediction of hurricanes. We developed and are continu-
ously  improving  the  Advanced  Weather  Research  and  Forecasting  (WRF)  Model, 
which  is  in  widespread  use  for  both  research  and  operations  in  over  70  countries. 
Our scientists have lead the development of innovative observing systems extending 
from  specialized  field  instruments  to  the  Constellation  Observing  System  for  Mete-
orology, Ionosphere and Climate (COSMIC) satellite system, an innovative and inex-
pensive  system  to  obtain  very  accurate  vertical  profiles  of  temperature  and  water 
vapor in the global atmosphere for use in weather forecasting. And we are currently 
collaborating  with  the  climate  community  on  bringing  the  best  of  weather  and  cli-

* Any  opinions,  findings,  conclusions,  or  recommendations  expressed  in  this  publication  are 

those of the author and do not necessarily reflect those of the National Science Foundation. 

** The National Center for Atmospheric Research (NCAR) is sponsored by the National Science 

Foundation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

mate  models  together  into  a  system  capable  of  analysis  and  prediction  across  all 
time and space scales. 

In this testimony I address observing systems as a component of a complex hurri-
cane  forecasting  and  warning  process.  The  forecast  process  is  a  delicately  balanced 
chain,  starting  with  the  observations  of  many  types,  moving  through  analysis  and 
data  assimilation,  computer  modeling,  preparation  of  forecasts  and  warnings,  and 
dissemination  to  the  public.  It  is  sometimes  unfortunate  that  debate  tends  toward 
defense  of  one  observing  instrument  over  another,  when  in  reality  it  should  be  on 
maintaining  the  best  possible  integrated  process.  All  parts  of  the  complex  forecast 
chain  are  critical  to  the  outcome,  which  must  be  focused  very  clearly  on  providing 
the best possible forecasts and warnings to the American public. 

The U.S. has never been more vulnerable to hurricanes and the scientific commu-
nity  is  of  the  strong  and  considered  view  that  this  vulnerability  will  not  decrease 
in  the  medium  term.  A  warming  climate  also  may  well  create  more  and  more  in-
tense  hurricanes,  although  this  is  not  certain.  Accurate  forecasts  and  warnings  of 
hurricanes are therefore a national priority. I urge that the Committee give the high-
est priority to the passage of the National Hurricane Research Initiative (NHRI) Act 
of  2007,  as  this  presents  an  excellent,  well-considered  plan  for  improving  hurricane 
forecasting through the entire chain from observations to warnings and reducing the 
impacts of these dangerous storms. 
Background Considerations 
U.S. Hurricane Responsibility Regions 

As  shown  in  the  accompanying  figure  from  the  Interagency  Strategic  Research 
Plan  for  Tropical  Cyclones:  The  Way  Ahead  (ISRP),  U.S.  facilities  have  responsi-
bility  for  forecasting  in  all  parts  of  the  globe  affected  by  hurricanes.  The  NOAA 
Tropical Prediction Center/National Hurricane Center (NHC) has sole responsibility 
for the North Atlantic and eastern North Pacific Basins. The NOAA Central Pacific 
Hurricane  Center  (CPHC)  has  similar  responsibilities  for  the  central  North  Pacific 
region. The remainder of the hurricane globe is routinely monitored and warned by 
the  DOD  Joint  Typhoon  Warning  Center  (JTWC).  While  this  is  done  primarily  for 
DOD  interests,  JTWC  forecasts  are  also  included  in  the  suite  of  advices  used  by 
other  domestic  forecast  services,  and  by  commercial  services  for  both  mobile  and 
fixed assets around the world. Thus the United States has global responsibilities for 
forecasting hurricanes. 

This  global  responsibility  has  important  implications  for  our  observational  prior-
ities  in  support  of  hurricane  forecasting.  Satellite  observations  are  the  foundation 
for our present global observing system. Certain regions, such as the eastern Pacific 
and North Atlantic have the additional very substantial advantage of aircraft recon-
naissance. As you are well aware, the U.S. satellite system, as described by the re-
cent  National  Research  Council  Report  Earth  Science  Applications  from  Space:  Na-
tional Imperatives for the Next Decade and Beyond, ‘‘is at risk of collapse.’’ Since ac-
curate  forecasts  of  hurricanes  beyond  a  day  or  so  depend  upon  global  observations, 
this degradation of the satellite system has significant implications for the accuracy 
of future hurricane forecasts, at a time when the U.S. has never been so vulnerable. 
Forecast System Requirements 

Hurricane observing and forecast requirements are defined by the major offshore, 

coastal and inland impacts: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
L
L
O
H
1
1
7

46 

• Offshore,  hurricanes  impact  high-seas  shipping  and  oil  and  gas  rigs  through 
high  winds,  waves  and  ocean  currents,  including  those  in  the  deep  ocean.  The 
forecast  requirements  therefore  focus  on  the  future  track,  the  intensity,  the 
overall wind structure, and the oceanic response to its passage. 
• On  approaching  a  coast,  the  scale  of  hurricanes  impacts  rise  sharply  and  now 
include communities and commercial facilities, local ecosystems, and port facili-
ties.  In  addition  to  the  high  winds,  waves  and  ocean  currents  undergo  complex 
interactions in a variable coastline to generate storm surges that can exceed 30 
ft,  be  accompanied  by  large  waves  and  remove  substantial  barrier  islands. 
Flooding and potential for landslip add to the concerns. Forecasts therefore now 
also must include details of the rain structure, including that occurring in outer 
rainbands and the amplifying effect of orography. 
• As  a  hurricane  proceeds  inland  its  high  winds  diminish  rapidly,  but  this  does 
not  completely  remove  the  danger.  Now  the  impacts  largely  arise  from  heavy 
rain  and  flooding,  with  high-winds  associated  with  squalls  and  tornadoes  also 
bringing the potential for local devastation. 

The forecast lead times vary according to the time taken to effectively respond to 
the  approaching  threat.  Most  coastal  communities  require  48  hours  notice  of  the 
onset  of  high  winds  (which  can  be  many  hours  before  the  arrival  of  the  hurricane 
core), some require 72 hours. Major port and offshore facilities can require up to 4– 
5 days to prepare for a hurricane passage. For this reason, NHC forecasts were ex-
tended  to  5  days  in  2001.  Accurate  forecasts  at  this  extended  time  period  are  de-
pendent on the global observing system, which again emphasizes the importance of 
maintaining and improving satellite observing systems. 

These long lead times place great stress on the forecast system to anticipate sud-
den  or  sharp  changes  in  hurricane  characteristics,  especially  near  vulnerable  com-
munities  and  facilities.  The  former  Director  of  the  Hurricane  Center  Max  Mayfield 
was  quite  clear  in  stating  that  the  nightmare  scenario  was  un-forecast  rapid  inten-
sification  or  decay  on  approaching  the  coast.  Rapid  intensification  leaves  commu-
nities  poorly  prepared  for  a  major  catastrophe,  whereas  rapid  decay  can  lead  to  a 
false sense of security and lack of adequate response the next time a threat is fore-
cast. 
Data Usage 

Both  the  global  and  local  data  that  are  collected  are  used  in  two  major  ways.  A 
subset  is  passed  directly  to  the  relevant  hurricane  warning  center,  where  they  are 
used  to  analyze  current  details  of  the  storm,  such  as  its  intensity,  size,  current 
track, etc. The warning center also produces local statistical forecasts of parameters 
such  as  track  and  intensity.  The  full  data  set  is  fed  into  the  computer  forecasting 
system  where  the  relevant  data  are  assimilated  into  the  suite  of  models  that 
produce both short and extended range hurricane forecasts. 

Thus,  the  observing  system  is  one  component  of  a  complex  forecasting  and  warn-
ing  process.  This  entire  process  must  be  taken  into  account  when  considering 
changes  to  the  observing  system,  as  changes  at  one  end  often  require  changes 
throughout the process to be fully effective. This system also best operates in a dy-
namic  fashion,  one  where  mobile  resources  (such  as  aircraft)  can  be  redeployed  on 
the  fly  to  cover  deficiencies  or  uncertainties  that  appear  in  the  forecast  model  cal-
culations. 
Current Deficiencies in the Forecast System 

There  is  no  doubt  that  the  quality  of  the  forecast  can  never  be  better  than  the 
observations  that  are  used  to  develop  it.  However,  before  focusing  on  the  observa-
tions  several  deficiencies  in  the  rest  of  the  forecast  system  require  consideration. 
Hurricane  track  forecasts  and  warnings  have  been  improving  rapidly  over  the  past 
25  years  due  to  (1)  improved  global  observations  from  satellites,  especially  satellite 
atmospheric temperature and water vapor sounders, (2) improved computer models, 
(3)  improved  methods  of  assimilating  the  many  observations  into  the  models,  and 
(4) improved understanding of physical processes for inclusion in the models. These 
improvements  have  undoubtedly  saved  hundreds  of  thousands  of  lives  and  billions 
of dollars of property. However, our experience here shows that all four components 
need  additional  attention  and  support  in  order  for  us  to  arrive  at  the  desired  out-
come  of  increasing  the  accuracy  of  forecasts  and  warnings.  Forecasts  of  hurricane 
intensity  have  shown  less  improvement,  but  there  are  good  scientific  reasons  for 
hope. 

Our  current  approaches  to  assimilating  the  data  into  the  forecast  models  are  not 
up  to  international  standards,  especially  for  intensity  and  structure  forecasts.  Im-
portant data, such as land-based and aircraft radar, are not used. The assimilation 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

occurs  by  collecting  all  data  over  a  time  period  into  a  single  snapshot  rather  than 
being  incorporated  at  the  time  they  are  collected.  This  deficiency  is  well-recognized 
and  is  being  addressed  in  NCAR  and  the  Joint  Center  for  Satellite  Data  Assimila-
tion.  But  the  national  investments  do  not  match  the  importance  of  this  effort.  As-
similation  research  and  application  is  relatively  inexpensive  compared  to  the  cost 
of  new  observing  systems,  and  it  is  important  that  adequate  and  stable  funding  be 
maintained  for  this  work.  A  good  working  model  should  be  that  ∼15  percent  of  all 
observing system budgets be devoted to ensuring the data are optimally used in the 
forecast models by both observing system sampling strategies and improved data as-
similation. 

Current operational forecast models and the computing facilities that they run on 
are  simply  not  adequate  for  intensity  and  hurricane  wind  and  rain  structure  fore-
casting,  as  emphasized  by  the  report  of  the  recent  NOAA  Science  Board  Hurricane 
Intensity  Research  Working  Group  (HIRWG).  Research  results  and  experimental 
forecast  trials  over  the  past  few  years  have  clearly  demonstrated  this.  An  example 
is shown in the accompanying figure (from S. Chen University of Miami). In the top 
left is a radar observation for Hurricane Floyd (1999). The other panels (in clockwise 
order)  are  forecast  precipitation  patterns  obtained  from  a  high-definition  (1.6  km) 
research  model,  from  the  typical  resolution  used  by  current  hurricane  models  (15 
km), and from current global operational models (45 km). The top right-hand corner 
of  each  panel  shows  the  scale  of  the  model  grids  relative  to  the  hurricane.  Clearly 
the  lower  resolution  models  are  incapable  of  predicting  critical  details  in  the  hurri-
cane  core  region.  The  required  computer  power  increases  by  5–10  times  for  each 
halving  of  the  grid  resolution,  so  this  requires  a  substantial  investment  in  com-
puting.  But  there  are  clever  ways  of  reducing  this.  Moving  to  fine  definition  also 
requires an investment in applied research to further develop the manner in which 
air-sea  interactions  and  the  internal  workings  of  clouds  are  incorporated.  Clearly, 
investing  in  improved  computer  models  and  hardware  is  an  investment  that  has  to 
be made if we are to make substantive progress on predicting hurricane intensity and 
structure. 
The Observing System 

A  full  analysis  of  the  observing  system  is  beyond  this  brief  testimony,  so  I  will 
concentrate  on  several  areas  of  greatest  need  and  potential  return  for  the  invest-
ment for both research and operational requirements. I will also mention promising 
new  observing  systems  that  are  in  need  of  research  investigations  for  potential  fu-
ture  use.  This  analysis  assumes  that  the  current  suite  of  operational  systems  will 
be retained. In particular the geostationary satellite coverage and the aircraft recon-
naissance programs are essential for maintaining the quality of analysis and short- 
term forecasting of hurricanes, whereas the entire satellite program including polar 
orbiters  contributes  substantially  to  the  longer-term  forecasts  that  are  critical  to 
planning and response. 

In  my  opinion,  the  areas  of  greatest  need  and  potential  return  are  for  satellite 

observations of: 

• The  full  structure  of  the  surrounding  atmosphere,  including  winds,  moisture 

and temperature; 

• The available ocean energy for hurricane development, including the manner in 

which hurricanes extract this energy from the ocean; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
L
L
O
H
1
1
7

48 

• The  surface  wind  structure  and  particularly  the  extent  of  destructive  winds  in 

hurricanes. 

Full Structure of the Surrounding Atmosphere 

Forecasts  of  hurricanes  beyond  about  a  day  relay  heavily  on  numerical  models  of 
the  atmosphere.  These  models  in  turn  are  dependent  upon  accurate  measurements 
of  atmospheric  temperatures,  winds,  pressure  and  water  vapor,  not  only  in  the  im-
mediate  vicinity  of  the  hurricane,  but  over  the  much  larger  environment  of  the 
storms, which extends thousands of miles in all direction from the hurricane center. 
The  only  feasible  way  of  obtaining  these  global  observations  is  from  satellites,  al-
though  weather  balloons,  aircraft  and  surface-based  observations  make  significant 
contributions. The U.S. has been the world leader in providing the satellites in both 
geostationary and polar orbits that contribute the vital data needed by the forecast 
models. 

However, as has been documented by the NRC Decadal Survey and other reports 
and  testimonies,  the  U.S.  satellite  system  is  in  serious  trouble—-problems  that 
threaten the number and quality of atmospheric and ocean data needed by the fore-
cast  models.  For  example,  the  future  planned  polar-orbiting  NPOESS  system  has 
been  reduced  from  six  satellites  to  four  and  from  three  orbits  to  two.  The  NPOESS 
atmospheric sounding system has been degraded, and the ocean altimeter removed. 
In  addition  to  this  degradation  of  the  NPOESS  sounding  capability,  the  planned 
Hyperspectral  Environmental  Sensor  (HES)  has  been  removed  from  the  next  geo-
stationary  satellite,  GOES-R.  Thus  the  Decadal  Survey  recommended  that  NOAA 
develop  a  strategy  to  restore  the  planned  capability  to  make  high  temporal  and 
vertical-resolution soundings from geosynchronous orbit. 

Currently,  atmospheric  wind  observations  from  satellite  are  obtained  by  meas-
uring the movement of clouds and water vapor elements. These have been a consid-
erable  boon  to  forecasting  in  general,  but  they  lack  vertical  detail  and  are  not  ob-
tainable  in  areas  where  high  cloud  obscures  the  lower  levels.  I  support  the  NRC 
Decadal Survey recommendation that NASA launch and test a lidar wind observing 
system  from  space  to  test  the  ability  to  provide  comprehensive  wind  observations  for 
the globe—such wind measurements would be expected to have a significant positive 
effect on hurricane forecasts. 

There is a new, exciting technique to make atmospheric soundings of temperature 
and water vapor from space at a relatively low cost of approximately $3 per sound-
ing. The new technique called radio occultation, or RO, uses the global GPS satellite 
signals  to  obtain  highly  accurate  vertical  profiles  of  temperature  and  water  vapor 
in  both  cloudy  and  clear  regions,  at  a  very  low  price  compared  to  other  observing 
systems. In an ongoing proof-of-operational-concept mission, COSMIC, RO data have 
been shown to have a positive impact on hurricane forecasting. The potential sound-
ing  coverage  of  a  full  system  over  the  North  Atlantic  hurricane  basin  is  shown  in 
the accompanying figure. For these, and a number of other reasons, the recent NRC 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
L
L
O
H
1
1
7

49 

Decadal  Survey  has  recommended  that  NOAA  implement  an  operational  constella-
tion of RO satellites beginning toward the end of the present research COSMIC mis-
sion,  in  2010  or  2011.  RO  data  are  also  very  useful  climate  benchmark  data  and 
contribute  to  space  weather.  As  recommended  by  the  NRC  Decadal  Study,  NOAA 
should begin planning for this operational constellation immediately, while ensuring 
that  the  COSMIC  mission  is  continued  for  as  long  as  the  satellites  are  producing 
good data. 
Ocean Energy 

The available ocean energy dictates how intense a hurricane can become. As hur-
ricanes move across changes in this ocean energy they can rapidly intensify or decay 
and  this  can  be  poorly  forecast  if  we  have  not  adequately  observed  such  changes. 
The  observing  system  must  be  able  to  include  subsurface  conditions,  as  hurricanes 
extract  energy  from  below  the  ocean  surface  and  can  mix  cold-subsurface  water  up 
to the surface. A good example was provided by Hurricane Katrina, as shown in the 
accompanying  figure  (from  ISRP).  A  deep  warm  pool  of  water  associated  with  the 
Gulf Stream Loop Current (right panel) was completely hidden below generally uni-
form  sea  surface  temperatures  (left  panel).  Katrina  developed  rapidly  on  moving 
over this deep warm pool then weakened substantially as it moved toward the coast. 

Oceanic  instruments  previously  deployed  to  drift  over  long  periods  or  expendable 
bathythermographs  targeted  to  the  expected  hurricane  track  by  hurricane  aircraft 
provide one important means of observing this structure. But these can only be ap-
plied  locally  and  in  special  circumstances  and  aircraft  reconnaissance  is  only  avail-
able routinely in the North Atlantic and eastern North Pacific, with special missions 
to  the  Central  Pacific.  A  much  more  robust  and  generally  applicable  approach  is  to 
utilize  satellite  radar  altimetry  observations.  Because  the  warm  water  expands  the 
subsurface  warm  pools  appear  as  local  bulges  in  the  sea  surface.  Observations  of 
these  bulges  can  be  used  in  ocean  models  to  provide  a  definition  of  the  subsurface 
structure that is sufficient for hurricane forecasting. 

The  loss  of  the  NPOESS  altimeter  in  recent  cutbacks  is  a  serious  step  backward 
for  observing  such  an  important  oceanic  feature.  Satellite  altimeter  measurements 
are a cost-effective method obtaining critical information on the upper-ocean energy 
storage and location of ocean currents. 
Surface Wind Structure 

Surface  wind  observations  from  conventional  data,  such  as  surface  ships,  are 
patchy  and  often  missing  from  the  vicinity  of  hurricanes,  due  to  the  ships  staying 
well  clear.  Such  surface  wind  data  are  important  for  several  reasons:  (1)  Locating 
and identifying the initial wind swirl that indicates the development of a new hurri-
cane; (2) Correctly identifying the extent of destructive winds, which is used to warn 
shipping and emergency managers of the timing of arrival of, for example, gale force 
winds  (these  winds  may  occur  many  hours  before  the  destructive  core  to  substan-
tially  disrupt  preparations  and  evacuations);  and  (3)  assimilating  of  the  correct  cy-
clone  surface  structure  in  forecast  models  impacts  the  forecasts  of  track  and  struc-
ture  over  the  full  forecast  cycle.  The  only  way  to  obtain  such  information  over  the 
global  oceans  is  via  satellite  scatterometer  observations  and  the  Sea  Winds  instru-
ment on QuickSCAT has demonstrated real skill in improving hurricane track fore-
casts as summarized by the IRSP. It is notable that this improvement occurs mostly 
2–3  days  into  the  forecast,  which  clearly  indicates  the  importance  of  the  global  na-
ture of the QuickSCAT observations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
4
L
L
O
H
1
1
7

50 

Hurricane Reconnaissance 

The requirements of an observing system are varied. I have already indicated the 
importance of global coverage by satellites, especially for the longer-range hurricane 
forecasts.  But  these  global  systems  do  not  provide  the  depth  of  detail,  spatial  den-
sity  and  time  resolution  required  in  severe  weather  systems,  such  as  tropical  cy-
clones.  Indeed,  it  would  be  a  waste  of  resources  to  provide  such  coverage  globally, 
as in many cases it is simply not needed. These data are best provided by adaptive 
and  mobile  observing  systems  that  can  go  to  the  system  of  interest  and  take  the 
required observations. 

The U.S.A. has been fortunate to have had routine aircraft reconnaissance in the 
North  Atlantic  since  soon  after  WWII.  This  reconnaissance  program  has  produced 
a  comprehensive  long-period  record  of  hurricane  structure  and  intensity  that  en-
ables current research into the impacts of climate variability and climate change on 
future  risk.  It  has  also  ensured  the  best  possible  forecast  and  warning  service  at 
a  cost  that  is  a  fraction  of  the  direct  savings.  The  reconnaissance  system  has  been 
steadily  upgraded,  with  addition  of  new  platforms  and  instrumentation.  Of  par-
ticular  importance  are:  the  Doppler  radar  capacity,  and  particularly  coordinated 
flight plans that enable dual Doppler observations of the total wind structure; GPS 
dropsondes that provide detailed vertical structure, especially in the poorly observed 
near  ocean  layer;  and  the  stepped-frequency  microwave  radiometer  (SFMR),  which 
provides  excellent  details  of  the  core  region  surface  winds.  The  addition  of  the  G4 
to  the  aircraft  suite,  together  with  GPS  dropsondes  has  provided  near  environ-
mental  information  that  has  demonstrably  improved  forecast  performance.  I  rec-
ommend  in  the  strongest  possible  terms  that  this  aircraft  reconnaissance  strategy  be 
retained and further upgraded. Initially upgrades should concentrate not on new in-
strumentation,  but  on  more  effective  utilization  of  the  data  that  are  currently  col-
lected,  through  effective  assimilation  into  computer  models,  and  on  the  design  of 
new  sampling  strategies  best  suited  to  support  the  evolving  forecast  requirement. 
In  recent  times,  adaptive  approaches  have  evolved  in  research  mode  to  a  stage 
where the computer models are used to define where the best data can be obtained, 
and  the  aircraft  are  directed  to  obtain  these  data.  An  excellent  recent  example  of 
the  effectiveness  of  this  approach  in  a  research  field  experiment  can  be  seen  in  the 
recent NSF-sponsored Hurricane Rainband Experiment (RAINEX). 

The  aircraft  reconnaissance  system  is  now  60  years  old  and  based  entirely  on 
manned  aircraft.  Recent  developments  with  Unmanned  Aerial  Vehicles  (UAVs)  and 
Autonomous  Underwater  Vehicles  (AUVs)  have  raised  the  potential  for  substantial 
supplementation  to  the  manned  aircraft  approach.  Advantages  offered  by  UAVs  is 
the very long endurance and the capacity to take observations in areas that are too 
dangerous  for  manned  aircraft  and  not  able  to  be  observed  by  remote  sensing.  An 
example is the near surface atmospheric layer. This is where the hurricane gathers 
its  energy  and  is  the  layer  that  directly  impacts  coastal  and  offshore  structures 
through  high  winds,  waves  and  storm  surge.  Yet  this  is  also  the  most  under-ob-
served part of the hurricane. There is similar capacity and need for AUVs to be tar-
geted  to  areas  of  prime  interest  for  oceanic  observations.  Such  capacity  would  com-
plement  very  nicely  the  operational  satellites  and  drifting  or  specially  deployed 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
5
L
L
O
H
1
1
7

51 

buoys. I do caution that care needs to be taken here as some UAV systems cost sub-
stantially more than equivalent manned aircraft and this additional cost would need 
to be justified in terms of the expected forecast improvements. 

I  fully  support  the  recommendations  of  an  Interagency  workshop  on  UASs,  spon-
sored  by  NOAA,  NASA,  and  the  DOE  and  held  in  Las  Vegas,  Nevada,  in  February 
2006,  that  an  initial  demonstration  should  be  conducted  for  low-level  observations, 
by  a  UAV  in  a  hurricane.  The  objective  of  the  demonstration  should  be  to  obtain 
detailed  observations  of  the  near-surface  tropical  cyclone  boundary  layer  environ-
ment  and  to  provide  information  on  key  questions  of  whether  such  observations 
could:  supply  data  that  will  improve  tropical  cyclone  intensity  forecasts;  help  im-
prove our understanding of the rarely observed tropical cyclone boundary layer envi-
ronment; and provide information that successfully fills gaps in the current observ-
ing system. 
Conclusion 

The Nation has entered a difficult and dangerous period of vulnerability to hurri-
cane  impacts  arising  from  a  combination  of  sustained  enhanced  hurricane  activity 
and  increasing  development  in  coastal  regions.  We  must  respond  and  I  thank  the 
Committee  for  taking  your  valuable  time  to  consider  an  important  part  of  this  re-
quired response. Satellites are a mainstay of the hurricane forecast process. But this 
process  extends  well  beyond  the  taking  of  observations  and  other  areas  are  also  in 
need of serious consideration. In my testimony I considered observing systems with-
in  the  overall  hurricane  forecasting  and  warning  process.  I  have  identified  several 
areas that should be given priority attention: 

• Data  Assimilation  and  Sampling  Strategies:  Every  new  instrument  should  be 
matched  with  an  appropriate  level  of  support  for  ensuring  the  data  enter  the 
forecast  process  in  an  optimal  manner.  A  good  working  model  should  be  that 
∼15 percent of all observing system budgets be devoted to both observing system 
sampling strategies and improved data assimilation; 
• Computer  Modeling  Capacity:  Without  sufficient  resources  to  improve  the  reso-
lution of hurricane forecast models and their capacity to handle cloud-scale and 
air-sea  interaction  processes,  our  capacity  to  advance  the  forecasting  of  inten-
sity and structure will be severely limited; 

• Satellite Observing Systems: I have identified three specific priority areas: 

» Lidar measurements of the complete structure of atmospheric winds; 
» Use of GPS Radio Occultation to provide comprehensive atmospheric tempera-

ture and moisture observations; 

» Radar altimetry to provide information on the ocean heat energy storage that 

is available for hurricane intensification; 

» Scatterometer observations of the surface winds to improve location and struc-

ture information on hurricanes and to improve longer range forecasts. 

• Aircraft  Reconnaissance:  I  have  stressed  the  importance  of  this  to  the  national 
warning service and have noted several instruments that have been of immense 
worth  in  improving  forecasts.  I  also  have  noted  the  promising  potential  of  new 
approaches  using  UAVs  and  AUVs  to  monitor  hitherto  unobservable  compo-
nents of the hurricane. 

Of  greatest  priority  in  my  view  is  for  there  to  be  a  coordinated,  well-funded  re-
search and system development approach focused on reducing the impacts of hurri-
canes on vulnerable communities. The review committees that were formed after the 
disastrous  2005  hurricane  season  have  gathered  views  and  information  widely  and 
across  all  components  of  the  research,  operational,  engineering,  social  science  and 
emergency  management  community.  While  there  are  differences  of  detail,  these 
groups  have  been  unanimous  in  their  call  for  urgent  action  and  in  the  general 
thrust  of  the  actions  that  are  required.  These  are  embodied  in  the  National  Hurri-
cane Research Initiative Act of 2007 that is before you for consideration. History has 
shown that a full partnership between academia and operations with adequate fund-
ing  will  result  in  substantial  forecast  advances,  including  identification  of  critical 
observing needs. I urge you to give this urgent and serious attention. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  address  the  Committee  on  the  importance  of 
hurricane  observations  as  part  of  a  complete  forecast  and  warning  process—a  topic 
that  is  has  taken  on  increasing  urgency  as  the  impact  of  hurricanes  on  our  vulner-
able communities is rising. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Dr. Holland. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

Dr.  Busalacchi,  who  is  representing  University  of  Maryland, 
where  he  is  the  director  of  the  Earth  System  Science  Interdiscipli-
nary Center, we want to hear your perspective. 

STATEMENT OF ANTONIO J. BUSALACCHI, JR, PH.D., 

CHAIRMAN, CLIMATE RESEARCH COMMITTEE; CHAIRMAN, 

COMMITTEE ON EARTH SCIENCE AND APPLICATION: 

ENSURING THE CLIMATE MEASUREMENTS FROM NPOES AND 

GOES–R, NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL; AND 

DIRECTOR, EARTH SYSTEM SCIENCE INTERDISCIPLINARY 

CENTER (ESSIC), UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND 

Dr.  BUSALACCHI.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  members  of  the 

of my own. 

Committee for this opportunity to testify. 

In  addition,  I’m  a  Professor  of  Atmospheric  and  Oceanic  Science 
in  the  University  of  Maryland,  and  past  graduate  of  Florida  State 
University.  I  also  serve  as  Chair  of  the  National  Academies’  Cli-
mate Research Committee and of the Academies’ Panel on Options 
to  Ensure  the  Climate  Record  from  the  NPOESS  and  GOES–R 
Spacecraft.  This  latter  study  is  in  response  to  a  NASA–NOAA  re-
quest to the National Research Council for a follow-on report to the 
Decadal  Survey  in  Earth  Science  that  focuses  on  recovery  of  lost 
measurement  capabilities,  especially  those  related  to  climate  re-
search  which  occurred  as  a  result  of  changes  to  the  NPOESS  and 
GOES–R satellite programs. 

Three  weeks  ago,  our  NRC  panel  convened  a  3-day  workshop  ti-
tled ‘‘Options to Ensure the Climate Record from the NPOESS and 
GOES–R  Spacecraft.’’  This  workshop  attracted  some  100  scientists 
and  engineers  from  academia,  government,  and  industry.  The 
workshop gave participants a chance to review and comment on the 
NASA–NOAA  assessments  of  the  climate  impacts  associated  with 
the  instrument  cancellations  and  de-scopes  to  NPOESS  which  oc-
curred  following  the  June  2006  Nunn-McCurdy  review,  as  well  as 
offer input on a variety of suggested mitigation strategies. A report 
of the workshop will be available later this summer. A final report, 
with findings and recommendations, will be issued in January. 

As the study is still underway, my remarks this morning will be 

The climate community has three basic observational needs. One, 
sustain  continuous  and  often  overlapping  measurements  of  certain 
key  climate  parameters  critical  to  monitoring  long-term  climate 
trends  and  to  validate  climate  models.  Two,  observations  to 
initialize  and  force  global  climate  prediction  models.  And,  three, 
new or improved measurements of additional key parameters to ad-
vance climate science and reduce uncertainty in our understanding 
of the climate system. 

It is the first and second category of needs which are now threat-
ened by the current NPOESS program, though the third category— 
indeed,  all  of  Earth  science—is  implicitly  threatened  by  the  cost 
overruns of NPOESS. 

Access  to  uninterrupted  space-based  global  observations  of  the 
atmosphere,  oceans,  and  land  surface  has  enabled  breakthroughs 
in  predicting  natural  climate  variability  beyond  the  day-to-day 
weather  time-scale.  Today’s  coupled  climate  models,  initialized  by 
global satellite observations, now routinely issue short-term climate 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

forecasts  from  seasons  out  to  a  year  in  advance,  with  the  realistic 
prospect of extension to years and decades. 

To  discriminate  between  natural  climate  variability  and  anthro-
pogenic  climate  change  requires  instrument  accuracy  and  stability 
greater  than  that  which  is  normally  required—to  support  weather 
prediction.  Interruptions  to  the  continuity  of  these  climate  data 
records without such accuracy and stability can induce uncertainty 
that  may  be  as  large  or  larger  than  the  climate  signal  being  mon-
itored. 

The  present  certified  NPOESS  program  will  mean  a  loss  or  dis-
continuity  of  critical  climate  data  records,  of  total  solar  irradiance, 
the  Earth’s  radiation  budget,  ocean  surface  topography—that  is, 
sea  level—stratospheric  ozone,  atmospheric  aerosol  properties,  and 
precise ocean wind speed and direction. These observations are es-
sential to our ability to monitor and predict climate variability and 
change,  and  will  have  a  significant  impact  on  the  goals  of  a  U.S. 
climate change research program. 

Given  the  present  NPOESS  program,  our  climate  monitoring  ca-
pabilities are neither adequate to meet the needs of the climate re-
search  community  nor  the  needs  of  decisionmakers.  The  NPOESS 
de-scopes highlight what has, for too long, been the precarious and 
loosely coordinated series of climate observations in which the long- 
term generation and support of climate data records are left out of 
key agencies’ long-term planning. 

The  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  of  NPOESS  has  exposed  the 
fact that we do not have an agreed-upon national strategy for long- 
term,  continuous,  and  stable  observations  of  the  Earth  system.  As 
the  recent  NRC  Decadal  Survey  Committee  pointed  out,  sustained 
measurements  with  both  research  and  operational  applications  do 
not  fall  clearly  into  one  agency’s  charter.  This  results  in  a  meta-
phorical  relay  race  between  NASA  and  NOAA,  where  no  runner  is 
waiting to be passed the baton. 

As it pertains to climate monitoring, then, the relative roles and 
responsibilities  of  NASA  and  NOAA  remain  uncertain.  As  a  direct 
consequence, we are faced with a likely gap in critical long-term cli-
mate  records  and  a  diminished  capability  to  understand  and  pre-
dict  climate  and  related  changes  on  our  planet  for  generations  to 
come. 

As we seek to mitigate this situation, applying a Band-Aid, if you 
will,  I  urge  members  of  this  Committee  to  carefully  consider  how 
we  might  avoid  having  a  similar  hearing  in  the  not-too-distant  fu-
ture. 

Right  now,  we  are  in  a  reactive  mode  with  respect  to  what  can 
only be referred to as the NPOESS debacle. Our Nation needs a de-
liberate,  forward-looking,  and  cost-effective  strategy  for  satellite- 
based  environmental  monitoring.  The  Nation  requires  a  coherent 
strategy  for  Earth  observations  which  provides  for  operational  cli-
mate  monitoring  and  prediction,  scientific  advances,  and  the  con-
tinuation  of  long-term  measurements.  Our  Nation  deserves  such  a 
strategy. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today,  and, 
at  the  appropriate  time,  I  will  be  prepared  to  take  any  questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Busalacchi follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ANTONIO J.  BUSALACCHI,  JR.,  PH.D.,  CHAIRMAN,  CLIMATE 
RESEARCH COMMITTEE;  CHAIRMAN,  COMMITTEE ON EARTH SCIENCE AND 
APPLICATION:  ENSURING THE CLIMATE MEASUREMENTS FROM NPOES  AND 
GOES–R,  NATIONAL RESEARCH COUNCIL;  AND DIRECTOR,  EARTH SYSTEM SCIENCE 
INTERDISCIPLINARY CENTER (ESSIC), UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND 
Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman,  and  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you 
very much for this opportunity to testify. I am Dr. Tony Busalacchi, Director of the 
Earth  System  Science  Interdisciplinary  Center  and  Professor  of  Atmospheric  and 
Oceanic Science at the University of Maryland. I also serve as the Chair of The Na-
tional Academies’ Climate Research Committee and of the Academies’ ‘‘Panel on Op-
tions  to  Ensure  the  Climate  Record  from  the  NPOESS  and  GOES-R  Spacecraft.’’ 
This  latter  study  is  in  response  to  a  NASA  and  NOAA  request  to  the  National  Re-
search Council (NRC) for a follow-on report to the Decadal Survey in Earth Science 
that  focuses  on  recovery  of  lost  measurement  capabilities,  especially  those  related 
to  climate  research,  which  occurred  as  a  result  of  changes  to  the  NPOESS  and 
GOES-R satellite programs. 

On  June  19,  2007,  our  NRC  Panel  convened  a  three-day  workshop,  ‘‘Options  to 
Ensure  the  Climate  Record  from  the  NPOESS  and  GOES-R  Spacecraft.’’  The  work-
shop  attracted  some  100  scientists  and  engineers  from  academia,  government,  and 
industry.  The  workshop  gave  the  climate  community  a  chance  to  review  and  com-
ment  on  the  NASA/NOAA  assessments  of  the  climate  impacts  associated  with 
Nunn-McCurdy  descopes  of  NPOESS,  as  well  as  offer  input  on  a  variety  of  sug-
gested  mitigation  scenarios.  A  report  of  the  workshop  will  be  available  later  this 
summer.  Presentations  from  the  workshop  are  available  for  download  at:  (http:// 
www7.nationalacademies.org/ssb/SSBlNPOESS2007lPresentations.html). A final 
report, with findings and recommendations, will be issued in January. As this study 
is still underway, the views I express today are my own. 

As requested, I will use my time this morning to summarize my views on the sta-
tus  and  direction  of  the  Nation’s  current  and  planned  constellation  of  weather  and 
environmental  satellites.  In  particular,  I  will  focus  on  your  request  for  information 
on  the  ‘‘budgetary,  management,  and  schedule  risks  of  these  [weather  and  environ-
mental]  satellite  systems,  as  well  as  the  potential  lost  capabilities  in  climate  moni-
toring, modeling, and forecasting that are possible under the current program.’’ 

This  hearing  takes  place  against  the  backdrop  of  significant  developments  in 
NOAA weather and environmental monitoring programs and NASA’s Earth Science 
Program: 

• In June 2006, the next-generation National Polar-orbiting Operational Environ-
mental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS)  completed  its  ‘‘Nunn-McCurdy’’  certifi-
cation.1 As  a  result,  the  planned  acquisition  of  six  spacecraft  was  reduced  to 
four, the launch of the first spacecraft was delayed until 2013, and several sen-
sors  were  canceled  or  descoped  in  capability  as  the  program  was  re-focused  on 
‘‘core’’  requirements  related  to  the  acquisition  of  data  to  support  numerical 
weather prediction. ‘‘Secondary’’ sensors that would provide crucial continuity to 
some long-term climate records and other sensors that would have provided new 
data are not funded in the new NPOESS program. 

• Costs for NOAA’s next generation of geostationary weather satellites, GOES-R, 
have  risen  dramatically  and  late  last  year  NOAA  canceled  plans  to  incorporate 
a key instrument on the spacecraft—HES (Hyperspectral Environmental Suite). 
HES  was  to  provide  GOES-R  spacecraft  with  significantly  advanced  three-di-
mensional vertical profiles of atmospheric temperature and humidity, and coast-
al  waters  imagery  to  help  scientists  monitor  events  like  harmful  algal  blooms 
or to assist in fisheries management. 
• The  2005  National  Research  Council  report,  Earth  Science  and  Applications 
from Space: Urgent Needs and Opportunities to Serve the Nation 2 described the 
national  system  of  environmental  satellites  as  ‘‘at  risk  of  collapse.’’  That  judg-

1 NPOESS  was  created  by  Presidential  Decision  Directive/National  Science  and  Technology 
Council  (NSTC)–2  of  May  5,  1994  wherein  the  military  and  civil  meteorological  programs  were 
merged  into  a  single  program.  Within  NPOESS,  NOAA  is  responsible  for  satellite  operations, 
the Department of Defense (DOD) is responsible for major acquisitions, and NASA is responsible 
for  the  development  and  infusion  of  new  technologies.  In  2000,  the  NPOESS  program  antici-
pated purchasing six satellites for $6.5 billion, with a first launch in 2008. Costs have since es-
calated  dramatically  and  the  expected  date  of  first  launch  slipped  to  2013.  By  November  2005, 
it became apparent NPOESS would overrun its cost estimates by at least 25 percent, triggering 
a so-called Nunn-McCurdy review by the Department of Defense. 

2 National  Research  Council,  Earth  Science  and  Applications  from  Space:  Urgent  Needs  and 

Opportunities to Serve the Nation, Washington, D.C.: The National Academies Press, 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

ment was based on the observed precipitous decline in funding for Earth-obser-
vation missions and the consequent cancellation, descoping, and delay of a num-
ber of critical missions and instruments.3 The report also identified the need to 
evaluate  plans  for  transferring  capabilities  from  some  canceled  or  scaled  back 
NASA missions to the NOAA–DOD NPOESS satellites. Since the publication of 
that  report,  NPOESS  and  NOAA  have  experienced  the  problems  noted  above 
and  NASA  has  canceled  additional  missions,  delayed  the  Global  Precipitation 
Mission  (GPM)  another  2.5  years,  and  made  substantial  cuts  in  its  Research 
and Analysis program.4 

This  hearing  also  occurs  shortly  after  the  completion  of  the  first  National  Acad-
emies Decadal Survey in Earth Science and Applications from Space and the recent 
release  by  the  Intergovernmental  Panel  on  Climate  Change  of  their  Fourth  Assess-
ment Report. In addition, as you are all aware, there have been numerous news ac-
counts  in  recent  days  regarding  the  fate  of  a  particular  spacecraft—QuikSCAT, 
which measures sea surface wind speed and direction. 
Sustained Earth Observations for Operations, Research, and Monitoring 

Scientific breakthroughs are often the result of new exploratory observations, and 
therefore  new  technology  missions  stimulate  and  advance  fundamental  knowledge 
about  the  planet.  Analysis  of  new  observations  can  both  test  hypotheses  developed 
to  elucidate  fundamental  mechanisms  and  lead  to  the  development  of  models  that 
explain  or  predict  important  Earth  processes.  The  data  from  these  new  technology 
missions  sometimes  provide  early  warning  of  changes  in  the  Earth  system  that  are 
critical to our well-being, such as declining ice cover in the Arctic Ocean, developing 
holes  in  the  protective  ozone  layer,  or  rising  sea  level.  To  determine  the  long-term 
implications  of  the  changes  or  to  uncover  slowly  evolving  dynamics,  the  measure-
ments must be continued, usually with one or more follow-on missions. 

Access  to  uninterrupted  space-based  global  observations  of  the  atmosphere, 
oceans,  and  land  surface  have  enabled  breakthroughs  in  predicting  natural  climate 
variability  beyond  the  day-to-day  weather  time  scale.  Today’s  coupled  climate  mod-
els,  initialized  by  global  satellite  observations,  now  routinely  issue  short-term  cli-
mate  forecasts  from  seasons  out  to  a  year  in  advance  with  the  realistic  prospect  of 
extension to years and decades. To discriminate between natural climate variability 
and anthropogenic climate change requires instrument accuracy and stability great-
er than is normally required to support weather prediction. Interruptions to the con-
tinuity of these climate data records without such accuracy and stability can induce 
uncertainty that may be as large, or larger, than the climate signal being monitored. 
Sometimes  data  from  a  new  technology  mission  become  critical  to  an  operational 
system,  such  as  the  wind  speed  and  direction  measurements  from  NASA’s 
QuikSCAT  mission  and  precipitation  measurements  from  NASA’s  Tropical  Rainfall 
Measurement Mission (TRMM), both of which are used in weather and climate fore-
casting.  An  obvious  but  often  difficult  consequence  is  that  these  research  measure-
ments  need  to  be  transitioned  into  operational  systems  and  continued  for  many 
years.  This  is  a  recognized  and  well-studied  challenge,  but,  the  record  of 
transitioning  new  technology  into  the  operational  system  is,  at  best,  mixed.5 More 
often  than  not,  the  operational  utility  of  data  from  these  research  missions  is  real-
ized  toward  the  end  of  the  design  life  of  the  instruments.  By  then  however,  it  is 
usually too late to begin the planning of a follow-on operational mission if continuity 
is to be maintained. 

The  difficulties  in  combining  the  climate  and  weather  requirements  on  NPOESS 
as well as the problem in executing what is sometimes referred to as the transition 
from NASA ‘‘research’’ missions to NOAA operations (which, is effectively the source 
of  the  current  controversy  surrounding  the  aging  QuikSCAT  spacecraft)  are  dif-
ferent aspects of an overarching problem: the United States lacks a coherent strategy 
to  manage  its  Earth  observation  programs  in  general  and  its  climate  observations 
in particular. The Nunn-McCurdy certification of NPOESS exposed the difficulty in 

3 Ibid, Table 3.1, p. 17. 
4 Total  R&A  for  NASA  science  missions  was  cut  by  about  15  percent  in  the  President’s  2007 
budget (relative to 2005). In addition, the cuts were made retroactive to the start of the current 
fiscal year. Over the last 6 years, NASA R&A for the Earth sciences has declined in real dollars 
by some 30 percent. 

5 Transition  failures  have  been  exhaustively  described  in  previous  NRC  reports.  See  National 
Research  Council,  Extending  the  Effective  Lifetimes  of  Earth  Observing  Research  Missions, 
Washington, D.C.: The National Academies Press, 2005 and National Research Council, Satellite 
Observations  of  the  Earth’s  Environment:  Accelerating  the  Transition  from  Research  to  Oper-
ations,  Washington,  D.C.:  The  National  Academies  Press,  2003.  These  publications  are  also 
available  on-line  at  <http://www.nap.edu/catalog/11485.html>  and  <http://www.nap.edu/ 
catalog/10658.html>, respectively. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

sustaining  long-term  climate  observations  within  a  program  managed  by  agencies 
with  different  priorities  and  missions.  Whereas  NOAA  and  DOD  have  complemen-
tary  priorities  with  respect  to  weather  prediction,  the  same  does  not  hold  for  cli-
mate.  Moreover,  the  stability,  calibration,  and  technology  refresh  requirements  for 
climate observations call for a flexible systems approach consisting of a mix of small 
climate-specific  satellites,  formation  flying,  and  single  sensor  ‘‘free  flyers’’,  as  op-
posed  to  the  (small  school  bus)  one-size  fits  all  series  of  ‘‘Battlestar  Gallactica’’ 
NPOESS platforms. 

Our ability as a nation to sustain climate observations has also been complicated 
by  the  fact  that  no  single  agency  has  the  mandate  and  requisite  budget  for  pro-
viding routine climate observations, prediction, and services. As stated in the Janu-
ary  2007  National  Research  Council  pre-publication  of  the  ‘‘Decadal  Survey,’’  Earth 
Science and Applications from Space: 6 

The  Committee  is  concerned  that  the  Nation’s  institutions  involved  in  civil 
space (including NASA, NOAA, and USGS) are not adequately prepared to meet 
society’s  rapidly  evolving  Earth  information  needs.  These  institutions  have  re-
sponsibilities that are in many cases mismatched with their authorities and re-
sources:  institutional  mandates  are  inconsistent  with  agency  charters,  budgets 
are  not  well-matched  to  emerging  needs,  and  shared  responsibilities  are  sup-
ported inconsistently by mechanisms for cooperation. These are issues whose so-
lutions will require action at high-levels of the government. 

For  example,  in  a  recent  NRC  review  of  NASA’s  2006  Draft  Science  Plan 7 the 
Committee noted that the ‘‘NASA/SMD (Science Mission Directorate) should develop 
a  science  strategy  for  obtaining  long-term,  continuous,  stable  observations  of  the 
Earth  system  that  are  distinct  from  observations  to  meet  requirements  by  NOAA 
in  support  of  numerical  weather  prediction.’’  Accordingly,  the  Decadal  Survey  com-
mittee  recommended  that,  ‘‘The  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy,  in  collabo-
ration with the relevant agencies, and in consultation with the scientific community, 
should develop and implement a plan for achieving and sustaining global Earth ob-
servations.  This  plan  should  recognize  the  complexity  of  differing  agency  roles,  re-
sponsibilities,  and  capabilities  as  well  as  the  lessons  from  implementation  of  the 
Landsat, EOS, and NPOESS programs.’’ 

I will now turn to the specific questions about the programs under consideration: 
What are the potential lost capabilities in climate monitoring, modeling, and fore-

casting? 

NPOESS: As noted in a recent NASA–NOAA report, which was performed at the 
request of the White House Office of Science and Technology Policy, ‘‘For more than 
thirty  years,  NASA  research-driven  missions,  such  as  the  EOS,  have  pioneered  re-
mote sensing observations of the Earth’s climate, including parameters such as solar 
irradiance,  the  Earth’s  radiation  budget,  ozone  vertical  profiles,  and  sea  surface 
height.  Maintaining  these  measurements  in  an  operational  environment  provides 
the  best  opportunity  for  sustaining  the  long-term,  consistent,  and  continuous  data 
records  needed  to  understand,  monitor,  and  predict  climate  variability  and 
change.’’ 8 However,  the  Nunn-McCurdy  certification  placed  a  priority  on  the  con-
tinuity  of  operational  weather  measurements  at  the  expense  of  climate  measure-
ments. In addition, the post-certification constellation eliminated the ‘‘mid-morning’’ 
orbit  and  reduced  the  planned  acquisition  of  six  spacecraft  to  four.  NASA  and 
NOAA  have  completed  their  preliminary  assessments  of  the  impacts  of  these 
changes,  focused  primarily  on  the  de-manifested  sensors.  Their  assessment  is  docu-
mented in a white paper prepared for OSTP. Rather than go into the details of their 
assessment  or  repeat  it  here,  a  brief  summary  of  the  climate  impacts  associated 
with de-manifestation of these sensors is included in the Appendix. 

QuikSCAT:  QuikSCAT  continues  to  function  well  and  provide  all-weather  obser-
vations  of  ocean  surface  wind  speed  and  direction,  although  it  is  five-years  beyond 
its  design  lifetime  and  it  is  operating  on  a  backup  communication  system.  Should 
QuikSCAT  fail,  the  United  States  would  have  to  rely  on  the  ASCAT  instrument  on 
the European MetOp system and on data currently provided by the WindSat space-
craft.  Both  of  these  systems  have  drawbacks  compared  to  QuikSCAT—ASCAT  has 

6 National Research Council, Earth Science and Applications from Space: National Imperatives 
for the Next Decade and Beyond, The National Academies Press, Washington, D.C., 2007. Avail-
able online at: <http://www.nap.edu/catalog/11820.html>. 

7 National Research Council, A Review of NASA’s 2006 Draft Science Plan: Letter Report, The 
National Academies Press, Washington, D.C., 2006. Available online at: <http://www.nap.edu/ 
catalog/11751.html>. 

8 ‘‘Impacts  of  NPOESS  Nunn-McCurdy  Certification  on  Joint  NASA-NOAA  Climate  Goals,’’ 

NOAA-NASA Draft White Paper, January 8, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

large gaps in coverage compared to QuikSCAT and analyses to date of WindSat data 
expose  serious  concerns  about  the  utility  of  passive  polarimetric  measurements  of 
surface  wind  speed  and  direction  in  low  and  high  wind  regimes  for  research  and 
operational  applications.  Further,  the  capabilities  of  the  successor  to  Windsat,  the 
MIS  instrument  planned  for  NPOESS,  are  still  unknown  and  NOAA  does  not  plan 
to  incorporate  the  instrument  on  NPOESS  until  launch  of  the  second  spacecraft  in 
2016  at  the  earliest.  The  National  Academies  Decadal  Survey  recommended  a  fol-
low-on  mission  to  QuikSCAT—XOVWM—to  be  launched  in  the  2013–2016  time 
frame.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  Survey’s  choice  of  this  time  period,  versus 
one  sooner,  was  based  on  an  examination  of  expected  resources  and  the  need  to 
launch other priority missions. 

GOES-R:  the  loss  of  HES  is  of  higher  priority  for  numerical  weather  prediction 
and  monitoring  of  coastal  waters  than  it  is  for  climate.  The  impact  to  climate  re-
search  is  the  loss  of  ability  to  track  changes  in  the  intensity  and  frequency  of  ex-
treme events such as hurricanes, floods, wildfires, and harmful algal blooms as mod-
ulated by climate variability and change. 
Overview of Climate Needs 

The climate community has three basic observational needs: (1) sustained (contin-
uous,  and  often  overlapping)  measurements  of  certain  key  climate  parameters  crit-
ical to monitor long-term climate trends and to validate climate models, (2) observa-
tions  to  initialize  and  force  coupled  climate  prediction  models,  and  (3)  new  or  im-
proved  measurements  of  additional  key  parameters  to  advance  climate  science  and 
reduce uncertainty in our understanding of climate processes and interactions with-
in  the  coupled  climate  system.  It  is  the  first  and  second  category  of  needs  which 
are now threatened by NPOESS, though the third category—and indeed all of Earth 
science—is  implicitly  threatened  by  the  cost  overruns  of  NPOESS,  which  have  had 
great  impact  on  already-tight  Earth  Science  budgets.  This  impact  will  increase  as 
the  agencies  attempt  to  assure  continuity  of  the  most  critical  of  climate  records  by 
altering  upcoming  flight  manifests,  restoring  instruments  to  NPOESS,  or  designing 
‘‘gap-filler’’ missions. 
Mitigation Challenges 

Any  strategy  to  mitigate  the  impacts  of  the  loss  of  these  sensors  begins  with  a 
prioritization of their importance and an assessment of the cost and risk of various 
recovery  options.  Such  an  assessment  is  the  subject  of  the  ongoing  National  Re-
search  Council  study  that  I  chair;  it  is  also  the  subject  of  an  Office  of  Science  and 
Technology  Policy  (OSTP)-requested  study  that  is  being  executed  by  NASA  and 
NOAA. The range of options under study include re-manifesting selected sensors to 
the  NPOESS  platforms,  making  use  of  ongoing  and  planned  missions  by  inter-
national  partners,  launching  selected  sensors  on  missions  of  opportunity  or  on  new 
spacecraft,  and  assimilating  data  from  multiple  sources  to  help  reconstruct  the  lost 
data. 

It is also important to recognize the limitations of some of the climate sensors on 
NPOESS  even  before  the  Nunn-McCurdy  actions.  For  example,  from  its  sun-syn-
chronous orbit, altimeter measurements of sea-surface height (SSH) via the ALT in-
strument would contend with the effects of tidal aliasing. The precise record of SSH 
that  began  with  the  Topex/Poseidon  mission  (and  continues  with  Jason-1  mission, 
which should overlap with the 2008 of Jason-2) derives from instruments on space-
craft  that  are  not  in  sun-synchronous  orbit.  Moreover,  as  emphasized  repeatedly  in 
recent NRC studies, the generation of credible climate records requires investments 
in  pre-launch  instrument  characterization,  on-orbit  calibration  and  validation,  and 
a  ground  support  system  that  has  the  requisite  resources  to  archive,  disseminate, 
analyze,  and  periodically  re-analyze  the  data.  Appropriate  investments  in  this  crit-
ical  part  of  the  chain  from  raw  data  to  climate  data  record  were  never  part  of  the 
NPOESS  program.  Indeed,  their  absence  is  indicative  of  the  problem  that  arises 
when the very different needs of the climate community are effectively piggybacked 
on the needs of numerical weather forecasters from both the DOD and civil commu-
nities. 

Recovery  strategies  also  must  take  account  of  plans  for  execution  of  the  NRC 
Decadal  Survey.  The  Decadal  Survey  was  sponsored  by  NASA  (Office  of  Earth 
Science), NOAA (NESDIS), and the USGS (Geography). While cognizant that space- 
based  observations  were  only  part  of  a  credible  Earth  observing  system,  it  was 
charged with: 

• Articulating  priorities  for  Earth  system  science  and  the  space-based  observa-

tional approaches to address those priorities. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

• Establishing  individual  plans  and  priorities  within  the  sub-disciplines  of  the 
Earth sciences as well as providing an integrated vision and plan for the Earth 
sciences as a whole. 

The  relevance  of  the  recommended  Decadal  Survey  missions  mapped  against  de- 
manifested NPOESS sensors is shown in Table 1 below. It is important to note that 
the decadal strategy covers all of Earth science, including but not limited to climate 
science.  Though  I  am  limiting  my  remarks  here  to  discuss  those  elements  related 
to  climate  and  of  relevance  to  the  NPOESS  and  GOES-R  considerations,  I  support 
the  report’s  call  for  a  balanced  Earth  Science  program.  Of  particular  interest  for 
NPOESS mitigation strategies in the near-term is the recommendation for an early 
start  of  the  CLARREO  radiance  mission.  A  more  capable  ocean  vector  wind  follow- 
on  to  QuikSCAT—XOVWM—is  also  called  out  to  start  in  the  period  from  2013– 
2016. 

In summary, our climate monitoring capabilities are neither adequate to meet the 
needs  of  the  climate  research  community  nor  the  needs  of  decisionmakers.  The 
NPOESS descopes highlight what has for too-long been a precarious and loosely co-
ordinated series of climate observations in which the long-term generation and sup-
port  of  climate  data  records  are  left  out  of  key  agency’s  long-term  planning.  The 
Nunn-McCurdy  certification  of  NPOESS  has  exposed  the  fact  that  we  do  not  have 
an agreed upon national strategy for long-term, continuous, and stable observations 
of the Earth system. As the recent Decadal Survey committee pointed out, sustained 
measurements  with  both  research  and  operational  applications  do  not  fall  clearly 
into  any  one  agency’s  charter.  This  results  in  a  metaphorical  relay  race  between 
NASA and NOAA, where no runner is waiting to be passed the baton. 

As  it  pertains  to  climate  monitoring,  the  relative  roles  and  responsibilities  of 
NASA  and  NOAA  remain  uncertain.  As  a  direct  consequence,  we  are  faced  with  a 
likely gap in critical long-term climate records and a diminished capability to under-
stand  and  predict  climate  and  related  changes  on  our  planet  for  generations  to 
come.  As  we  seek  to  mitigate  this  situation,  applying  a  band-aid  if  you  will,  I  urge 
members of this Committee to carefully consider how we might avoid having a simi-
lar hearing in the not too distant future. Right now, we are in a reactive mode with 
respect  to  what  can  only  be  referred  to  as  the  NPOESS  debacle.  Our  nation  needs 
a  deliberate,  forward  looking,  and  cost-effective  strategy  for  satellite-based  environ-
mental  monitoring.  The  Nation  requires  a  coherent  strategy  for  Earth  observations 
which  provides  for  operational  climate  monitoring  and  prediction,  scientific  ad-
vances, and the continuation of long-term measurements. The Nation deserves such 
a strategy. Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today on this impor-
tant topic. I am prepared to answer any questions you may have. 

Table 1. Contributions of recommended Decadal Survey missions to continuation or expansion of 
Environmental Data Records (EDRs) as defined by the NPOESS Integrated Operational Require-
ments  Document  (2001).  Current  status  of  NPOESS’s  planned  capabilities  to  obtain  the  EDRs 
is also shown. 

Descoped/degraded EDR 

NPOESS status 

Relevant decadal survey 

contribution 

Soil moisture 
Aerosol 

tering albedo and shape 
Ozone total column/profile 

refractive 

index/single-scat-

Cloud particle size distribution 
Downward LW radiation (surface) 
Downward SW radiation (surface) 
Net solar radiation at TOA 
Outgoing LW radiation (ToA) 
Solar irradiance 
Ocean  wave  characteristics/significant 

wave height 

Sea  surface  height/topography—basin 

scale/global scale/mesoscale 

Degraded 
Demanifested 

Reduced Capability 
(Column only) 
Demanifested 
Demanifested 
Demanifested 
Demanifested 
Demanifested 
Demanifested 
Reduced Capability 

SMAP 
ACE 

GACM 

ACE 
CLARREO 
CLARREO 
CLARREO 
CLARREO 
CLARREO 
XOVWM 

Demanifested 

SWOT 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

EDR dependent on CMIS replacement 

NPOESS sensor 

Relevant ESAS contribution 

Atmospheric vertical moisture profile 

Atmospheric  vertical  temperature  pro-

file 

Global sea surface winds 
Imagery 

Sea surface temperature 

Precipitable  water/Integrated  water 

vapor 

Precipitation type/rate 
Pressure (surface/profile) 

Total water content 
Cloud ice water path 
Cloud liquid water 
Snow cover/depth 

Global sea surface wind stress 
Ice surface temperature 

Sea ice characterization 

CrIS/ATMS/CMIS 
(replacement) 
CrIS/ATMS/CMIS 
(replacement) 
CMIS (replacement) 
VIIRS/CMIS 
(replacement) 
VIIRS/CMIS 
(replacement) 
CMIS (replacement) 

CMIS (replacement) 
CrIS/ATMS/CMIS 
(replacement) 
CMIS (replacement) 
CMIS (replacement) 
CMIS (replacement) 
VIIRS/CMIS 
(replacement) 
CMIS (replacement) 
VIIRS/CMIS 
(replacement) 
VIIRS/CMIS 
(replacement) 

PATH, GPSRO, 

CLARREO 

PATH, GPSRO, 

CLARREO 

XOVWM 
HyspIRI 

PATH 

ACE 

PATH 
GPSRO, CLARREO 

ACE 
ACE 
ACE 
SCLP 

XOVWM 

SCLP, ICESat–II 

NOTE: MetOp contributions to EDRs and space weather-related EDRs are not listed here. 

APPENDIX: BRIEF SUMMARY OF CLIMATE IMPACTS DUE TO 

DE-MANIFESTED NPOESS SENSORS 9 

The  certification  eliminated  five  key  NPOESS  ‘‘climate’’  sensors—TSIS,  ERBS, 
ALT,  OMPS-Limb,  and  APS.  Either  as  result  of  an  instrument  descope  or  as  a  re-
sult of the reduction from three orbits to two, the certification also impacted the ca-
pability of CMIS, VIIRS, and CrIS measurements that support climate research. 

1. Total Solar Irradiance Sensor (TSIS), a de-manifested sensor: 
Impact:  These  measurements  monitor  the  energy  of  the  sun  incident  on  Earth. 
Measurements  of  TSI  are  essential  to  discriminate  between  natural  and  anthropo-
genic  causes  of  climate  change.  Further,  these  measurements  can  be  accurately  de-
termined  only  above  the  atmosphere.  Any  interruption  of  the  28-year  data  record 
of Total Solar Irradiance jeopardizes our ability to confidently resolve small changes 
in  this  most  fundamental  variable  and  adds  uncertainty  to  climate  change  attribu-
tion. 

2. Earth Radiation Budget Sensor (ERBS), a de-manifested sensor: 
Impact:  This  measurement  monitors  the  incoming  and  outgoing  energy  to  the 
Earth-atmosphere  system  that  maintains  climate  and  it  can  be  accurately  deter-
mined  only  above  the  atmosphere.  Overlap  between  space-based  sensors  is  critical 
to confidently detect and monitor the small changes in the Earth’s radiation balance 
capable of affecting climate. 

3. OCEAN Altimeter (ALT), a de-manifested sensor: 
Impact:  Ocean  topographical  data  are  vital  to  study  the  role  of  ocean  circulation 
and the associated thermal transport in the climate system, sea level rise, assessing 
the  severity  of  hurricanes,  tracking  costal  ocean  currents,  and  aiding  in  the  fore-
casting of natural disasters. Sea level measurements are the climate change indica-
tors  of  most  direct  concern  for  a  substantial  proportion  of  the  U.S.  and  the  world’s 
population,  most  of  whom  live  near  the  coast.  These  observations  provide  critical 
input to El Nin˜ o and short-term climate forecasts. 

4.  Ozone  Mapping  and  Profiler  Suite  Limb  Subsystem  (OMPS-Limb),  a 

demanifested sensor: 

Impact:  Stratospheric  ozone  absorbs  incoming  solar  ultraviolet  radiation  that  can 
be  harmful  to  humans  and  other  organisms.  Anthropogenic  emissions  of  halogen- 

9 Adapted  from  ‘‘Impacts  of  NPOESS  Nunn-McCurdy  Certification  on  Joint  NASA-NOAA  Cli-

mate Goals,’’ NOAA-NASA Draft White Paper, January 8, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

containing  gases  (e.g.,  Freon)  are  now  known  to  destroy  stratospheric  ozone.  The 
Montreal Protocol on Substances Depleting the Ozone Layer has resulted in success-
ful international actions to reduce atmospheric concentrations of halogen-containing 
gases. The continuation of stratospheric ozone observations is crucial to monitor and 
evaluate the recovery of the ozone layer. 

5. Aerosol Polarimetry Sensor (APS), a de-manifested sensor: 
Impact: Aerosol properties are a high priority in the U.S. Climate Change Science 
Program. The effects of aerosols on global temperature and cloud properties are sig-
nificant  and  may  be  comparable  in  importance  to  the  role  played  by  ‘‘greenhouse’’ 
gases, such as carbon dioxide and methane, which contribute to the warming of the 
Earth’s  surface.  Given  the  expected  continued  industrialization  of  developing  na-
tions  such  as  China  and  India,  aerosol  observations  are  a  critical  climate  variable. 

6. Conical Microwave Imaging Scanner (CMIS), a de-scoped sensor: 
Impact: The original CMIS design was to provide information on the following es-
sential  climate  variables:  sea  surface  temperature  (SST),  sea  ice  and  snow  cover 
extents,  vegetation,  ocean  surface  wind  speed,  water  vapor,  and  precipitation  rates. 
Specifications  for  the  reduced  capability  MIS  will  not  be  available  until  September. 
Serious  concern  exists  regarding  the  SST  and  wind  vector  retrievals  from  such  an 
instrument. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Dr. Busalacchi. 
Senator Sununu, you have to leave, so you are recognized. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  Well,  I’ll  start  with  you,  Dr.  Busalacchi.  You 
talk about the need for a more integrated strategy, better coordina-
tion  between  NASA  and  NOAA,  but  in  your  statement  you  didn’t 
actually  make  any  recommendations  as  to  how  the  system  or  the 
approach  can  be  improved.  Do  you  have  any  recommendations  for 
us as to specific changes, modifications in either the planning proc-
ess or the technology use? 

Dr. BUSALACCHI. That is what our Committee is going to be tak-
ing  on  over  the  next  6  months.  Among  the  issues  are:  How  do  you 
maintain  the  long-term  climate  record  and  insert  new  technology? 
And  so,  there  needs  to  be  a  phasing  and  better  collaboration  be-
tween  the  two  agencies,  where  we  can  insert  new  technology  into 
the data stream while maintaining the current record. 

This  also  requires  us—that  we  start  looking  at,  in  advance—the 
issue  we  have  right  now  is—once  the  research  satellite  is  up,  and 
is  proven  valuable—even  though  it’s  a  research  satellite,  by  the 
time  that  satellite  passes  its  design  lifetime,  it’s  almost  too  late  to 
start  planning  the  replacement  operations.  And  so,  at  the  very  be-
ginning  of  the  research  satellite  mode,  NASA  and  NOAA  need  to 
be  getting  together—and  that’s  begun  within  the  past  2  years  as 
a  result  of  a  working  group  between  the  two  agencies—to  start 
looking  at  the  follow-on  before  the  data  record  is  broken;  start 
planning, where appropriate, the follow-on operational sensor. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Well,  I  hope  your  Committee  will  forward  its 

recommendations when you have them. Thank you. 

Dr.  Freilich,  you  talked  a  little  bit  about  the  VIIRS  sensor, 
maybe  some  of  the  problems  that  you’ve  had  with  that  sensor.  I 
missed  that  part  of  your  testimony,  or—you  know,  I  don’t  know  a 
great  deal  about  the  technology.  Could  you  describe,  in  a  little  bit 
more detail, what the issues are with the VIIRS? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  The  primary  outstanding  issue—and  there  have 
been  many  issues  that  have  been  solved  so  far—the  primary  out-
standing  issue  is,  one,  related  to  the  accuracy  of  the  radiometer 
measurements  at  high  spatial  resolution  that  are  specifically  used 
to measure ocean color and productivity near the coast. And it’s es-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

pecially  clear  near  the  coastline.  It’s  called  ‘‘optical  crosstalk.’’ 
And—— 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Well,  will  that—will  those  issues  be  resolved, 

or will that capability not be included in the final product? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  At  present,  we  are  testing  the  first  flight  unit, 
which  is  to  fly  on  NPP,  the  NPOESS  Preparatory  Program.  That 
test is being done in the Integrated Project Office. NOAA–DOD are 
providing  that  instrument.  Based  on  those  tests,  and  NASA, 
NOAA,  and  IPO  analyses  of  those  tests,  we  are  moving  forward— 
or  they  are  moving  forward  to  try  and  find  mitigation  strategies. 
Some  may  involve  changes  to  the  design  of  the  instrument,  some 
may involve smaller changes. At the moment, that’s where we are, 
though, we’re testing the first flight—— 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Understood.  Do  you  think  that  the  GAO  as-
sessment  was  a  fair  assessment?  And  was  there  anything  in  the 
GAO study that you think either overstated problems or were—was 
there anything left out of the GAO evaluation that you would have 
liked to have seen? 

Dr. FREILICH. I thought that it—overall, that it was a fair assess-

ment of the NPOESS program. 

Senator SUNUNU. You talked a little bit about QuikSCAT in your 
statement. I think you indicated that there was a proposal, at this 
point,  for  a  2013  mission  to  replace,  or  build  on,  some  of  these  ca-
pabilities.  Does  a  sensor  for  these  wind  currents  at  ocean  level 
need  its  own  platform,  or  could  sensing  equipment  for  that—those 
parameters be included on other platforms in the future? 

Dr. FREILICH. Let me clarify, sir. The Decadal Survey recommen-
ded  two  things  for  NOAA.  One  of  them  is  that  they—that  NOAA 
continue the QuikSCAT-level time series of measurements of ocean 
surface wind speed and direction over the ocean under all weather 
conditions.  And  the  second  recommendation  was  that,  starting  in 
the  2013–2016  time  frame,  the  NRC  recommended,  that  NOAA 
operationalize an advanced scatterometer instrument. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  And  my  question  is,  would  that  advanced 
scatterometer  equipment  need  its  own  platform,  or  could  it  be  in-
corporated onto another platform? 

Dr. FREILICH. It does not need its own platform. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  QuikSCAT  is  an  independent  platform  right 

now, correct? 

Dr.  FREILICH.  It  is.  Actually,  I  was  the  principal  investigator 
for—mission  principal  investigator  for  QuikSCAT.  I  also  helped  to 
design  NASA’s  other  two  recent  scatterometers.  Those  other  two— 
NSCAT  and  SeaWinds—were  instruments  that  were  provided  to 
another  platform,  and  QuikSCAT  is  its  own  integrated  single  mis-
sion.  So,  we’ve  actually  flown  scatterometers  both  as  instruments 
on other platforms and as a dedicated mission, like QuikSCAT. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  One  final  question  for,  Dr.  Holland.  You  just 
made  a  reference  that  I  didn’t  quite  understand.  You  said,  in  your 
statement, that if there was a tropical storm off the coast of Florida 
today,  and  we  were  trying  to  predict  its  path,  the  forecast  of  that 
path  would  be  dependent  on  observations  in  China  from  7  days 
ago. That doesn’t seem to make sense to me. It seems that the pro-
jection  of  its  path  today,  for  the  coming  days,  would  be  dependent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

on  existing  conditions,  not  just  in  Florida,  but  around  the  world 
today, but not on conditions from 7 days ago. 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  The  problem  is—and  we  found  this  out  very  early 
on,  when  we  started  doing  computer-based  modeling  of  the  atmos-
phere—that  if  there  is—an  error  gets  into  the  modeling  system, 
when that error is in there, and we bring new data into the system, 
the  data  are  used  to  modify  the  monitoring  system.  And  let’s  take 
an  almost  trivial  example.  Say  there  was  no  data  between  where 
that error occurred—no additional data brought in—and, when you 
got  the  hurricane,  an  error  would  still  be  there  by  the  time  it  got 
there. There are other data along the way, and there are modifica-
tions  to  that  error.  But  the  point,  nevertheless,  remains  that  you 
can’t  have  a  significant—significant  error  in  the  analysis—not  just 
the  forecast,  the  analysis  and  the  ongoing  forecast  over  Florida  or 
over  the  East  Coast  or  in  other  parts  of  the  North  Atlantic,  based 
on  problems  that  have  occurred  earlier  on  in  the  forecast  analysis 
process. 

A  good  example  of  this  is  that  when  we  first  started  computer- 
based  modeling  of  the  atmosphere  here,  we  started  doing  it  on  a 
regional basis. We found that didn’t work. We then went to a hemi-
spheric basis, and we found that didn’t work. And we found we ac-
tually had to go to a global basis even just to run the regional mod-
els for the Florida region. 

And  I  think  it’s  an  important  point  that  is  often  overlooked  in 
this,  this  overall  process.  The  local  observations  in  the  vicinity  of 
the hurricane are extremely important, but so are the observations 
taken elsewhere in the globe over the longer periods, and especially 
as you go out to 4 or 5 day time periods. 

Senator SUNUNU. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator NELSON. Thank you, Senator. 
Would you put up this chart, please? 
This  is  what  has  happened  to  the  sensors  that  were  originally 
planned  on  the  combination  NOAA  and  DOD,  (Department  of  De-
fense)  satellite,  called  NPOESS.  Several  of  the  sensors  that  were 
canceled, four that were canceled. We had four that were degraded. 
There  are  only  5  remaining  sensors  that  will  go  on  the  new 
NPOESS. 

The  aerosol  polarimetry  sensor,  radar  altimeter,  survivability 
sensor,  total  solar  irradiance  sensor—they’re  gone.  The  conical 
scan,  the  microwave,  the  Earth  radiation  belt  sensor,  the  ozone 
mapper, the space environmental sensor—they’re degraded. 

Now, if the community—between the Defense establishment and 
the weather establishment, thinks that all of these things are need-
ed,  but  we  are  down  to  the  point  at  which  we’re  canceling  two- 
thirds  of  the  sensors  on  this  thing,  I  want  to  ask  Dr.  Holland  and 
Dr.  Busalacchi,  what’s  going  to  be  the  impact  to  weather  fore-
casting if those de-manifested sensors are not restored to NPOESS? 

Dr. HOLLAND. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  NELSON.  And  then,  I  want  you  to  answer,  what’s  going 

to be the impact on climate study? 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  I  will  address  the  impact  on  the  weather  sensors. 

I’ll leave it to my colleague to address the climate study. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

Senator  NELSON.  OK.  And  let  me  just  say,  I’ve  got  to  end  this 
hearing  at  11:30,  because  we’ve  got  a  major  vote  that’s  going  to 
occur at that point. So, if you will keep your answers very concise. 
Dr.  HOLLAND.  I’ll  be  very  brief.  I  can  say  that  there  have  been 
a  number  of  peak  bodies  that  have  met  and  discussed  this  topic 
from  the  weather  perspective.  The  impact  will  be  substantial.  I 
don’t  want  to  go  into  the  details  of  the  substantial  nature  of  that. 
To  some  extent,  the  current  observing  system  can  be  stretched  to 
accommodate some of the impact. It cannot accommodate all of the 
impact. And the reality is that there will be forecasts and warnings 
of  severe  weather  and  other  atmospheric  phenomena  that  are  not 
as good as they should be; indeed, not even up to the—to what we 
would  have  expected  to  be  happening  in  the  future.  And,  as  some 
research  instruments  degrade  and  disappear,  that  problem  will 
only get worse. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Busalacchi? 
Dr.  BUSALACCHI.  With  respect  to  climate,  that  chart  up  there 
really  illustrates—to  abuse  the  words  of  Neil  Armstrong—right 
now  we’re  taking  one  giant  leap  backward  for  mankind.  Five  of 
those  sensors—total  solar  irradiance,  the  major  driving  energy 
force  for  the  planet—we’d  be  breaking  a  20  year  record.  In  terms 
of  the  debate  between  anthropogenic  forcing  and  natural  varia-
bility, we’ve seen that these changes are small. They actually have 
been decreasing, but we still need to continually monitor. 

Earth  radiation  budget,  we  need  to  monitor  what’s  coming  into 
our planet, what’s going out, so we can, again, understand how the 
temperature is rising on our planet. 

Ocean surface topography, we need to monitor, globally, sea-level 
rise. And these observations are the major input that drives short- 
term  climate  forecasts  and  our  ability  to  predict  the  El  Nin˜ o  phe-
nomenon. 

Stratospheric  ozone  looks  at  the  vertical  resolution  of  strato-
spheric ozone, the depletion of the ozone layer, and now the recov-
ery,  post-Montreal  Protocol.  Without  that  Limb  sounder,  we  will 
not have that ability to resolve the vertical abundance of ozone. 

Atmospheric  aerosol  properties  is  another—once  you  get  beyond 
greenhouse  gases,  one  of  the  largest  uncertainties  is—in  the  cou-
pled climate system is atmospheric aerosols. With the continued in-
dustrialization of China and India, as a Nation we need to be moni-
toring  and  understanding,  What  are  these  direct,  and  these  indi-
rect, effects of aerosols? 

And  we’ve  already  discussed  the  issue  of  surface  winds  from 
scatterometry. From the climate perspective, the surface winds are 
the  major  forcing  function  that  moves  heat  around  the  ocean,  and 
that’s what modulates the coupled climate system and allows us to 
have this predictive capability. 

So, without those five sensors, we’re going to be going blind with 
respect  to  our  ability  to  monitor  and  predict  climate  in  the  years 
to come. 

Senator NELSON. All right. 
Ms.  Kicza,  you’ve  heard  the  statements  of  these  two  gentlemen. 
Why did we let our—do you agree with those statements? And why 
did NOAA and NASA let it get into this condition? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

Ms.  KICZA.  Yes,  sir,  I  do  agree  with  the  statements,  in  terms  of 
the severity of the impact of the decisions, relative to the NPOESS 
Nunn-McCurdy  certification.  What  I  will  also  acknowledge  is  that 
it  is  critically  important  that  we  maintain  continuity  with  the 
NPOESS platform. And the tri-agency Executive Committee jointly 
came  to  the  conclusion  that,  in  order  to  preserve  weather  con-
tinuity  and  to  maintain  a  technical  complexity  of  the  system  to 
allow  us  to  deliver  in  the  2013  time  frame,  that  we  had  to  reduce 
the number of sensors on the platform. 

In the wake of that decision, NOAA and NASA, with the Admin-
istration, have been actively engaged in identifying options to miti-
gate  this  current  situation.  And,  in  fact,  as  Dr.  Busalacchi  had  in-
dicated,  we’re  working  closely  with  the  research  community  to  ex-
amine those options so that, as we move forward, we move forward 
with the right decisions. 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  the  bottom-line  answer  is,  we  let  ourselves 
get  into  this  position,  there  is  no  way  out,  except  to  cancel  these 
and then try to make up for lost time later. 

Ms.  KICZA.  We  got  into  a  position,  with  the  NPOESS  program, 
where we could not meet the continuity objective. That was due, in 
large part, to the maturity of the instruments, not being as mature 
as had been anticipated, and to the late understanding of that situ-
ation. As David Powner has indicated, that was recognized, as part 
of  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process,  and  we  have  put  steps  in  place,  on 
both NPOESS and lessons learned in GOES–R, to avoid that situa-
tion  in  the  future.  That  does  not  suggest  that  the  decisions  that 
were  made  do  not  have  significant  impact,  and  that’s  why  we’re 
also  working  very  closely  to  identify  how  to  mitigate  the  impacts 
of those decisions. 

Senator  NELSON.  The  Administration  comes  out  with  5  year 
plans.  Do  we  have,  in  the  next  5  years,  the  plan  to  start  the  res-
toration of these instruments that have been canceled or degraded? 
Ms.  KICZA.  Sir,  as  we  indicated  in  the  FY07  budget,  we’ve  al-
ready  made  decisions  to  begin  to  restore  those  capabilities.  NASA 
and  NOAA  have  jointly  funded  the  OMPS-Limb  sensors  so  that  a 
full  ozone  suite  can  be  available  on  the  NPP  spacecraft,  which  is 
scheduled for launch in 2009. As an integral part of the 2009 budg-
et,  we’re  actively  engaged  in  looking  at  every  one  of  those  sensors, 
to identify options to either re-manifest them on the NPOESS plat-
form or to look to other platforms where those sensors can be mani-
fested so as to maintain the continuity of the climate record. 

Senator NELSON. So, in the next 5 years, are we going to see all 

of those start to be restored? 

Ms.  KICZA.  Those  are  the  decisions  that  are  being  discussed,  as 

we speak, as part of the 2009 budget development process. 

Senator  NELSON.  I’m  going  to  turn  to  my  colleague  here,  but  let 
me  just  ask  this.  The  GAO  has  reported  that  there  are  too  many 
cooks in the kitchen. You’ve got a hydra-headed monster here who 
can’t  decide  which  way  it  wants  to  go.  What  is  your  proposal  for 
that? 

Ms. KICZA. I can provide you my personal observations. I’ve been 
in this position a relatively short time, but what I have seen is, in 
the  wake  of  the  Nunn-McCurdy  decision,  the  level  of  management 
attention and the level of agreement and cooperation and rapid re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

sponse  to  any  issues  that  have  been  brought  forward  with  NOAA 
has been quite impressive. The Executive Committee, consisting of 
Dr.  Sega,  Dr.  Griffin,  and  Vice  Admiral  Lautenbacher,  meet  on  a 
regular basis formally, and they have teleconference discussions in 
between  those  formal  discussions  in  order  to  make  sure  that  deci-
sions are made in a timely fashion. 

Senator  NELSON.  It’s  been  said,  in  NASA  circles,  that  NASA 
knows  how  to  design,  build,  launch,  and  operate  satellites,  and 
NOAA  doesn’t,  but  NOAA  was  given  this  responsibility.  What  do 
you say to that? 

Ms.  KICZA.  I  say  that  we  have  taken  close  heed  to  the  lessons 
learned with the NPOESS program, and we’ve recently made deci-
sions  on  the  forward  strategy  for  the  GOES–R  program,  in  terms 
of  the  management  and  acquisition,  in  which  each  of  us  relies  on 
our inherent strengths and competencies. As a result of that, we’ve 
made  the  decision  to  have  NASA  be  responsible  for  the  develop-
ment  of  the  instruments,  the  development  of  the  spacecraft,  and 
the support of the launch vehicle systems. NOAA, that has an oper-
ational  record  for  ground  systems  since  the  early  1960s,  as  you’ve 
identified, has responsibility for the ground segment. 

So,  yes,  we  are  paying  attention  to  the  concerns  that  have  been 

expressed about falling back on where our strengths are. 

Senator NELSON. So, the long and short of that is, NASA’s going 
to take back the building and launching of the satellite, and NOAA 
is going to operate it. 

Ms. KICZA. In the GOES–R arena, yes, that is the direction we’ve 

moved to. 

Senator NELSON. How about the follow-on to NPOESS? 
Ms.  KICZA.  In  terms  of  the  follow-on  to  NPOESS,  that’s  a  future 

discussion, sir. We have not yet addressed that. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  it  might  be  instructive  to  hear,  then,  if 
you’ve  decided  that  on  GOES–R,  are  you  going  to  do  that  on 
NPOESS? 

OK, Senator Cantwell? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  thank  you 
for  holding  this  hearing  and  conducting  such  a  thorough  review  of 
such an important area. I know that it’s of specific interest to your 
region of the country. It is not of any less significance in our region, 
as  weather  and  climate  play  an  incredible  role  in  everything  from 
our hydro system to our coastline to a variety of things. So, getting 
this information right is important. 

I hope I can enter a longer statement in the record. 
Senator NELSON. Without objection. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  I  also  am  concerned  today,  I  don’t  know 
where,  in  this  short  period  of  time  we  have  left,  to  dig  in,  because 
I think that this is an issue of management and management over-
sight,  or  failure  of  management  oversight.  Maybe  even  from  the 
pure  structural  level;  failure  in  oversight  on  this  budget  as  it  re-
lates  to  this  contractor  and  the  way  the  contract  is  run,  and  the 
cost  overrun  on  this  contract.  The  fact  that  a  recent  reassessment 
in  baseline  is  now  being  moved  away  from,  and  it  was  just  done 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

last month, shows me that people haven’t come with a realistic cer-
tainty  here  about  what  it’s  going  to  take  to  get  this  right.  And 
then, there is the science itself. I could launch into the whole ques-
tion  of  whether  the  Administration  is  even  serious  about  getting 
access to this information, given what I think it means, and the im-
portance of what it means in climate change. But I’ll try to be more 
specific,  because,  first  of  all,  I  don’t  want  anybody  out  there  to  get 
lost in all our acronyms. 

And  I  want  to  start  with  you,  Dr.  Busalacchi,  is  that  correct, 
Busalacchi?  Thank  you.  About  these  national  polar  environmental 
satellites.  They’re  there  for  a  reason.  And  my  understanding  is, 
we’re  trying,  on  the  climate  side,  I’ll  leave  the  other  assessments 
to  my  colleague  from  Florida,  but  we’re  trying  to  assess,  through 
these  various  sensors  that  are  now  not  being  funded,  the  change 
in  sea-surface  temperature  that  we  know  has  been  linked  to  cli-
mate  change,  and  it  also  has  been  correlated  with  the  intensity  of 
hurricanes. Is that not correct? I mean, I don’t know if it’s all con-
clusive  yet,  but  we’re  trying  to  understand  that  correlation.  The 
reason  why  we’re  trying  to  understand  that,  and  that  the  sensors 
that we now won’t have, to better understand it, is that these sea- 
surface changes have dramatic impacts on the intensity, or the po-
tential  intensity,  of  hurricanes.  And  that’s  what  we  want  to  study 
and understand. Is that correct? 

[The prepared statement of Senator Cantwell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL, U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
Our Nation’s climate and weather satellites are among the most vital services our 

government provides. 

By supplying critical data, satellites allow forecasters to predict dangerous weath-
er  and  enable  climate  scientists  to  foresee  dangerous  long-term  trends  like  global 
warming. 

The bottom line is, satellites help protect us all. 
Hurricanes  threaten  the  Southeast  and  Gulf  of  Mexico  regions.  Tornados  tear 
through towns and cities in the Midwest. And dangerous coastal storms frequent my 
home State of Washington. 

Because  of  moments  like  these,  we  rely  on  our  climate  and  weather  satellites 

every day. 

Our  Nation’s  fleet  of  climate  and  weather  satellites  should  be  the  best  in  the 

world, and maintaining that fleet is essential. Our citizens deserve no less. 
The Problem 

We  are  not  here  today,  however,  to  simply  praise  the  importance  of  our  climate 

and weather satellites. That fact is self-evident. 

We are here because the future of our climate and weather satellites is in serious 

Faced  with  massive  cost  overruns  and  schedule  delays,  it  is  uncertain  which  sat-
ellite capabilities our government will be providing in the future. It is also uncertain 
whether the satellites of the future will protect us as much as our current satellites. 
I believe that in order to fix a problem, we must first agree on what that problem 

doubt. 

is—and precisely how serious it is. 
Climate Change Sensors Cut 

From  an  initial  look  at  the  satellite  program,  I  am  particularly  concerned  about 

the elimination of key climate sensors vital to our national interest. 

During  a  recent  review  of  the  NPOESS  satellite  system,  most  of  the  climate  sen-

sors were eliminated because of the program’s multi-billion dollar cost overruns. 

I understand that for both the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration 
(NOAA) and the Department of Defense, maintaining the weather sensors is a high-
er priority than climate sensors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

grams. 

67 

I  am  extremely  concerned  to  see,  however,  that  we  are  cutting  our  climate  moni-

toring capabilities at the exact moment when we should be increasing them. 

Climate change is a dangerous threat with enormous implications for our Nation. 
The notion that we are cutting sensors that monitor climate change—precisely when 
we need them the most—is unacceptable. 
Poor Program Management 

I  am  also  extremely  concerned  about  the  poor  management  of  our  satellites  pro-

Our  climate  and  weather  satellites  were  being  bought  under  a  system  called 
‘‘Shared System Program Responsibility’’. Under this system, responsibility for over-
sight was given to a single lead private contractor. 

Senator  Snowe  and  I  have  extensive  experience  with  this  type  of  management 
system through our oversight of the Coast Guard. The Coast Guard’s troubled Deep-
water program used a similar management system called a lead systems integrator. 

The parallels between these programs’ failures are extremely troubling. 
For example, in both programs the lead contractors consistently received massive 

award fees despite repeated failures. 

In  the  case  of  the  NPOESS  satellite  program,  the  lead  contractor  has  received 
over  $123  million  in  award  fees  for  ‘‘success,’’  despite  running  the  program  billions 
of dollars over-budget and years behind schedule. 

If that is success, I would hate to see what failure looks like. 

Conclusion 

When  dealing  with  precious  taxpayer  dollars  and  the  safety  of  our  citizens,  we 

have an obligation to do far better. 

optimism can also be very dangerous. 

I  appreciate  the  optimistic  assessments  put  forth  by  the  satellite  programs,  but 

I  believe  that  in  this  circumstance,  what  we  need  most  is  a  candid  discussion 
about  the  realities  of  where  we’re  at  and  where  we’re  headed.  Only  by  directly  and 
aggressively facing problems up-front, can we move forward successfully and respon-
sibly. 

I thank you all for being here and I look forward to your testimony. 

Dr.  BUSALACCHI.  That  is  correct.  And  that’s  why  it’s  so  impor-
tant—that’s  why  it’s  so  important  we  not  have  a  break  in  the 
record, because continuity is so important, because we’re looking at 
the  time  rate  of  change,  how  these  extreme  events  may  be  chang-
ing  on  the  time  scales  from  years  to  decades.  And  so,  that’s  why, 
again,  it’s  so  important  that  we  not  have  these  breaks  in  the 
record. And, as that chart shows, that’s what we’re up against. 

And  with  respect  to  the  previous  discussion,  as  it  pertains  to 
NPOESS,  the  NPOESS  priority  ended  up  being  weather.  What 
we’ve learned for climate, we need more of an adaptive systems ap-
proach,  a  much  more  flexible  approach,  where  we  not  rely  on  the 
one-size-fits-all  Battlestar  Galactica  sorts  of  platforms  that  have 
really boxed us into and reduced our flexibility to continue some of 
these sensors. 

Senator CANTWELL. But we’re cutting that now. Is that—— 
Dr. BUSALACCHI. That’s correct. 
Senator CANTWELL.—right? We’re cutting that information avail-

Dr. BUSALACCHI. That—we’re cutting that. But then, we—— 
Senator CANTWELL. But—— 
Dr. BUSALACCHI.—don’t know what we’re replacing it with. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  For  us  in  the  Northwest,  we  know  that—we 
know that every 300 years we’re going to have a tsunami. To know 
that,  analyze  it,  study  that,  study  that  impact  and  have  plans  in 
our community, is critically important. to not have continuity in cli-
mate  change  information,  to  me  it  is  shortsighted  and  absurd,  to 
be throwing out this information at a time when we know that cli-

ability. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

mate  change  is  having  an  impact  and  that  we  need  to  understand 
its impact on our weather. 

Now, to the contract, because I think this is very important. This 
contract included an award fee incentive making it possible for con-
tractors to earn up to 20 percent of the total estimated cost. Is that 
not correct, Mr. Powner or Ms. Kicza? 

Ms.  KICZA.  Yes,  the  contract,  prior  to  the  Nunn-McCurdy,  did 

have a 20 percent total fee. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  And  usually,  I  think  GAO,  you  did  an  anal-
ysis that determined that less than 1 percent of DOD-awarded con-
tracts provided award fees in excess of 15 percent? 

Mr. POWNER. Yes, there was also—if you look at this, the IG ac-
tually  did  some  very  detailed  work  on  this  award  fee  structure. 
And  the  bottom  line  on  all  this,  Senator  Cantwell,  is  that  the  con-
tractor was receiving award fees at a time when this program was 
performing quite poorly. And that since has changed, but there was 
a  long  stretch  where  award  fees  were  paid  when  performance  was 
quite poor. 

Senator CANTWELL. How is that possible? 
Mr. POWNER. One item that we pointed out in our many reviews 
of  NPOESS  is  the  lack  of  contractor  oversight.  When  you  start 
looking  at  oversight  of  contractors  and  oversight  of  subcontractors 
below prime—below the prime contractor, there were a lot of issues 
there, from the oversight of the prime contractor all the way down 
to subs. 

Senator CANTWELL. Well, I might come to this hearing with a lit-
tle  less  anger  about  that  situation  if  I  hadn’t  sat  through  so  many 
Deepwater  oversight  hearings  about  lead  systems  integrators,  and 
lead  system  integrators  writing  their  own  ticket.  To  me,  this 
shared  system  performance  responsibility  is  very  similar  to  a  lead 
systems  integrator.  The  fact  that  we  awarded  bonus  contracts  on 
top  of  the  nonperformance,  in  addition  to  the  nonperformance,  in 
and  of  itself,  that  is  now  leading  us  to  this  conclusion  that  we  are 
going  to  cut  sensors  on  vital  climate  change  information,  is  just  a 
failure. And we need to correct this. 

I  want  to  get  back  to  the  agency  individuals  who  are  testifying 
here  today.  Do  you  believe  that  the,  either  Dr.  Freilich  or  Ms. 
Kicza,  do  you  believe  the  agency,  in  light  of  the  Northrop  Grum-
man  performance,  profit  award  fee  of  $123  million,  was  justified? 
Do you believe that was justified, the award bonus? 

Ms.  KICZA.  Ma’am,  I  believe  that  there  were  failures  in  the 
award  fee  process.  And,  in  fact,  in  response  to  recommendations 
from  both  the  GAO  and  IG,  we  have  changed  both  the  structure 
of  the  award  fee  process,  as  well  as  the  Fee-Determining  Official. 
And,  in  fact,  the  last  two  award  fees  for  the  contractor  have  been 
substantially less, and/or zero, as a direct result of the failures that 
resulted in the Nunn-McCurdy process. 

Senator CANTWELL. But there was a profit award fee of $123 mil-

lion. 

Ms.  KICZA.  I  acknowledge  that  that  fee  was  paid,  yes.  And—— 
Senator CANTWELL. Was that justified, yes or no? 
Ms.  KICZA.  Ma’am,  I  would  have  to  defer  that  to  the  Air  Force 

that has the acquisition responsibility. 

Senator  NELSON.  But  you  all  have  a  responsibility  for  NPOESS. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

Ms.  KICZA.  And,  as  I  indicated,  in  response  to  the  failures  that 
were  recognized  and  that  led  to  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process,  the 
last  two  award  fees  have  been  reduced  and—and,  in  fact  the  last 
one has been zero—— 

Senator NELSON. But the—— 
Ms. KICZA.—in direct response—— 
Senator NELSON.—original one that—— 
Ms. KICZA.—to the failure. 
Senator NELSON.—Senator Cantwell brought up was paid. 
Ms. KICZA. That is correct. 
Senator  NELSON.  Even  though  this  thing  was  a  disaster,  they 

still got, how much, Senator Cantwell? $123—— 

Senator CANTWELL. $123 million. 
Senator NELSON.—million award fee. 
Senator  CANTWELL.  We  started  at  a  $6.5  billion  cost  estimate, 
and  then  it  went  to  $12.5  billion.  And  I  think,  in  and  of  itself,  we 
could  digest  that.  But  I  think  we  are  far  from  understanding,  in 
addition  to  the  fact  that  we  aren’t  going  to  get  sensors  on  climate 
change,  that  costs  are  going  to  be  contained  at  this  level.  Are  you 
willing  to  guarantee  that  this  new  baseline  cost  estimate  is  the 
true  cost  estimate  and  we’re  not  going  to  see  any  additions  in  an 
increase in that? Do you think that’s a realistic estimate? 

Ms.  KICZA.  Ma’am,  what  I  can  tell  you,  is  that,  in  the  last  18 
months, the NPOESS program has significantly increased the gov-
ernment  oversight.  In  fact,  we’ve  added  a  32  percent  larger  staff, 
both  technical  and  program  control  staff.  And  in  the  past  18 
months, this program has been on budget and on schedule. 

Now,  as  Mr.  Powner  acknowledged,  we  have  significant  risk 
ahead. We are not through this yet. But I will assure you that con-
tinued  vigilance  in  management  oversight  and  in  technical  over-
sight will be applied to this program. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I’m  looking  for  information  here,  but  it  ap-
pears  that,  even  though  you  had  new  deadlines  that  were  just  set 
recently,  I  think,  in  the  last  month,  that  those  deadlines  won’t  be 
met, that the DOD Under Secretary for Acquisition issued a memo 
extending  these  deadlines  from  a  few  months  to  even  a  year  past 
the new targets. Is that correct, from the June date? 

Ms.  KICZA.  Ma’am,  you’re  referring  to  some  deadlines  for  docu-
ments,  and  the  Defense  Acquisition  Executive  within  the  DOD  did 
recently  extend  those  documents  to  a  later  due  date.  And  the  fact 
of the matter is that the program was focusing on dealing with the 
issues,  and  the  Defense  Acquisition  Executive  acknowledged  that, 
and, as a result, extended the due date for specific key documents. 

Senator CANTWELL. And what do those documents entail? 
Ms.  KICZA.  If  I  could  take  that  question  for  the  record,  I  have  it 
here,  but  I’d  have  to  search  through  my  things.  One  is  the  MOU. 
There are four key documents, and I’ll provide that information for 
the record. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  I  think  that’ll  be  very  important,  because  it 
appears  to  me  that  several  deadlines  are  going  to  be  revised,  only 
from  a  month  ago,  and  that  we  are  already  behind  schedule.  Now, 
I’m  happy  to  see  those  documents,  and  happy  to  see,  but  I  think 
you can see where my concern is, is that, what safeguards we have 
in  place  now  that  we  are  going  to  prevent  further  cost  overruns, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

that are going to have the program on target and on budget. I don’t 
know, Mr. Powner, if you have ideas about the additional risk and 
oversight that we should be implementing. 

Mr.  POWNER.  One  comment  about  those  documents.  We’re 
about—we’re getting ready to ink a new contract on NPOESS, and 
some of those documents include an integrated master schedule, an 
overall  testing  plan.  Those  are  types  of  things  you  want  solidified 
before  you  enter  into  a  new  contract,  because  what  does  that 
mean?  That  means  that  there  are  likely  contract  mods,  and  that 
typically  equates  to  cost  increases.  So,  if  you  look  at  our  latest  re-
port, we think it’s very important that they actually get those docu-
ments  approved  as  quickly  as  possible.  In  fact,  we  recommended 
that  they  be  approved  in  April.  And,  as  you’re  pointing  out,  it’s 
been extended even further. 

Senator CANTWELL. But you want those documents to be correct, 

as well—— 

Mr. POWNER. Absolutely. 
Senator  CANTWELL.—correct?  So,  basically,  submitting  a  sched-
ule that’s not realistic or hasn’t answered the questions about tech-
nology, simply for the purposes of saying that you have a schedule, 
is not valid, as well as maybe not even just having done the home-
work, in and of itself. 

Mr. POWNER. And if you look at the approval of those documents, 
it’s basically just calling for an adherence to DOD policy. When you 
come  out  of  a  Nunn-McCurdy  review,  it—those  dates  were  set,  ba-
sically,  on  a  template  that’s  followed  based  on  other  DOD  pro-
grams.  So,  that’s  one  of  the  concerns  we  have  about  this  inter-
agency  cooperation,  because  if  we  can’t  agree  to  a  simple  Memo-
randum  of  Understanding  on  how  the  program’s  going  to  be  run, 
going forward, that’s an issue. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Senator  Nelson,  if  you  would  like,  I’m  sorry, 

thank you, I know I was over my limit. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  you’re  welcome.  And  you  brought  out 
very,  very  important  information  here.  I  am  mindful  of  the  fact 
that we’re supposed to have this vote at 11:30. 

I  want  to  put  into  the  record,  following  up  your  conversation 
from  the  Department  of  Defense  Acquisition,  Technology,  and  Lo-
gistics,  Kenneth  Krieg,  a  memo  dated  June  2007,  of  which  all  of 
the  Nunn-McCurdy  replanned  dates  for  various  action  items  for 
this  NPOESS  satellite  that  have  already  been  late,  every  one  of 
them  have  been  given  a  new  date  that  is  further  delayed  by  at 
least  a  year,  and,  in  most  cases—in  some  cases,  a  one-year  delay. 
The  most  recent  document,  which  we  will  enter  into  the  record, 
on the status of the acquisition decision, memorandum documents, 
also  from  Mr.  Krieg’s  office,  that’s  pointing  out  that  three  of  those 
that  were  given  a  September  2007  completion  date,  that  are  now 
behind schedule in their work. 

[The information previously referred to follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

THE UNDER SECRETARY OF DEFENSE 
Washington, DC. 
Memorandum  for  Program  Executive  Officer  for  Environmental  Satellites 
Subject:  National  Polar-orbiting  Operation  Environmental  Satellite  System 

(NPOESS) Acquisition Decision Memorandum (ADM) Amendment 

After  considering  your  April  2,  2007,  request  for  an  amendment  to  the  June  5, 
2006, NPOESS ADM, I am resetting the delivery date for selected acquisition docu-
ments to the following: 

June 7, 2007 

Action item 

Original date 

New date 

#1 Alternate Management Plan 
#3 Award Fee Plan 
#7 Acquisition Program Baseline 
#7 Acquisition Strategy Report 
#7 Test and Evaluation Master Plan 
#7 Systems Engineering Plan 
#8 Two Orbit Plan 
#10 Fill IPO Vacancies 
#15 LSP/PMSP COORD 
#16 DMS/POI Plan COORD 
#17 Tri-Agency MOA Coord 
#18 SME Review of IMP/IMP 
#19  Quarterly  IBR  Status  Report  to 

MDA 

June 2007 
Unspecified 
Sept. 1, 2006 
Sept. 1, 2006 
Sept. 1, 2006 
Sept. 1, 2006 
Nov. 15, 2006 
Aug. 4, 2006 
Sept. 2006 
Sept. 2006 
Aug. 4, 2006 
Apr. 2007 
Sept. 2006 

Sept. 1, 2007 
Oct. 1, 2007 
Dec. 1, 2007 
Sept. 1 2007 
Mar. 1, 2008 
Sept. 1, 2007 
Oct. 1, 2007 
Sept. 1, 2007 
Sept. 1, 2007 
Sept. 1, 2007 
Sept. 1, 2007 
Sept. 1, 2007 
Sept. 1, 2007 

As  provided  above,  the  Acquisition  Program  Baseline  must  be  completed  and 
signed by December 1, 2007, to support the annual delivery of the Selected Acquisi-
tion Report. The Test and Evaluation Master Plan (TEMP) shall complete coordina-
tion  and  be  signed  by  March  1,  2008.  To  ensure  that  this  March  I,  2008,  due  date 
is  satisfied,  a  draft  submission  of  the  TEMP  should  be  provided  to  DOT&E  and 
NSSO DT for review and comment by September 1, 2007. 

Under Secretary of Defense for Acquisition, Technology and Logistics. 

KENNETH J. KRIEG, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
g
e
i
r
k
1
1
7

72 

Senator  NELSON.  So,  if  it  is  this  hydra-headed  monster  that  the 
GAO tells us is unable to crack the whip and keep this going, we’d 
like  you  all  to  come  back  to  us  with  additional  information  as  to 
how you’re going to get it on schedule. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  think  we  should  go  even 
further,  having  a  second  to  look  over  these  memorandum  docu-
ments, I think you’re pointing to the very issue, the fact that there 
are several agencies involved here. 

But,  now  that  there  has  been  intensity  and  light  shown  on  this 
issue, I would hate to see the agencies continue to try to post dates 
that aren’t realistic. And there is just something striking about the 
fact  that  we  are  less  than  30  days  from  when  the  plan  was  origi-
nally  made,  and  we’re  already  submitting  date  changes  to  that 
plan.  It  says  to  me  the  original  plan  and  proposal  wasn’t  accurate 
or  thought  out  in  the  details,  to  say  nothing  of  the  larger  discus-
sion,  which  I  think  we  should  be  having  in  the  U.S.  Senate,  and 
that  is,  do  we  want  to  do  without  these  sensors?  I  would  say  no. 
I  would  say  that  we  need  to  find  a  way  to  move  forward  on  these 
climate change sensors, particularly to the continuity and the vital 
information that we are getting from this. 

I  think  that  we,  and  the  Nation,  have  all  been  shocked  by  the 
impact  that  Hurricanes  Rita  and  Katrina  had  on  our  coastal  re-
gions,  and  the  significant  amount  of  damage  and  impact  of  storm 
intensity. And to have good data about correlations and impacts of 
that, the difference between the various causes of those issues, are 
vitally important. So, I would hope, besides just scrubbing the over-
sight  and  management  and  delivery  dates  of  the  current  contract, 
we’d look at this larger issue. 

Senator NELSON. Before we have to adjourn I will submit, for the 
record,  on  my  behalf  and  on  other  members  of  the  Committee  be-
half,  detailed  questions  that  we  would  like  you  to  respond  in  writ-
ing. 

But before we have to adjourn because of the vote, I want to get 
into  the  loss  of  climate  monitoring  capability.  The  downgrading  of 
this  monitoring  of,  not  only  NPOESS,  but  also  the  GOES–R,  this 
is  occurring,  very  interestingly,  at  a  time  when  the  international 
scientific community has reached a consensus that: human activity 
is  the  cause  for  increasing  atmospheric  carbon  dioxide  concentra-
tions,  and  that  these  elevated  CO2 concentrations  have  resulted  in 
significant global warming. 

It’s interesting that all this is going on at the same time that this 
is  happening  with  these  satellites.  From  these  assessments,  it’s 
clear that continued research and monitoring, as well as aggressive 
action  to  limit  greenhouse  gases,  is  needed.  We’re  going  through 
this  daily.  We  just  went  through  it  last  month  with  regard  to  the 
energy  bill.  But,  at  the  same  time,  the  Administration  has  refused 
to  limit  these  greenhouse  gases.  And  the  decreases  in  the  Federal 
climate  science  budget,  reports  of  political  appointees  that  are 
interfering  with  dissemination  and  discussion  of  Federal  climate 
science, and the lack of an effective national assessment of climate 
change  impacts,  point  to  an  Administration’s  silence  in  this  global 
climate  change  debate.  And  so,  the  decommissioning  of  these  cli-
mate  sensors  scheduled  for  NPOESS  and  the  GOES–R  satellite  is 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

another  indication  of  the  lack  of  interest  in  the  Administration  or 
the political will to deal with this. 

So,  I  want  to  ask  some  questions.  The  National  Research  Coun-
cil,  the  American  Association  for  the  Advancement  of  Science,  and 
NOAA and NASA raise concerns about the loss of climate data and 
climate  monitoring  capability  as  a  result  of  decommissioning  of 
these  sensors.  So,  other  than  what  you’ve  already  told  us  on  a 
budget  issue,  what’s  going  on  here?  Were  these  sensors  cut  from 
these  programs  because  of  a  lack  of  emphasis  on  climate  change 
and global warming? 

Dr. Freilich? 
Dr.  FREILICH.  Well,  sir,  let  me  say  that  in  the  FY08  budget  re-
quest  that  you’re  looking  at  right  now,  on  the  research  side  NASA 
will  be  launching  seven  research  missions—not  NPOESS,  but 
seven  research  missions—between  now  and  2013  to  address  many 
of  the  climate  science  questions  that  have  been  raised.  Among 
those  are  the  ocean  surface  topography  mission  to  measure—con-
tinue  the  measurements  of  global  sea-surface  elevation  and  sea- 
level rise; the orbiting carbon observatory, to make first-ever meas-
urements  of  sources  and  sinks  on  1,000  kilometer  sort  of  scales, 
globally; and several others. NPP is one of those—— 

Senator NELSON. All right. Well—— 
Dr.  FREILICH.—but  we  have  many  other  research  missions  that 

will be launched. 

Senator  NELSON.  All  right.  Let  me  ask  you  about  the  radar  al-
timeter.  This  is  a  sensor  that  would  provide  critical  data  on  the 
health  of  the  coastlines  and  prediction  sea-level  rise,  something 
that  the  two  Senators  here  have  a  considerable  interest  in  for  the 
people  that  live  along  the  coastline  of  this  country.  So,  could  you 
tell me why that sensor was decommissioned? 

Dr. FREILICH. I cannot say why it was decommissioned, in detail, 
for  NPOESS,  except  as  part  of  the  refocusing  of  NPOESS  on  its 
weather  focus.  However—again,  to  point  out—NASA  started  out 
with the TOPEX/Poseidon radar altimeter mission. We are now fly-
ing the Jason-1 radar altimeter mission. And, in June 2008, we will 
be  launching  the  follow-on  to  that,  the  ocean  surface  topography 
mission,  with  our  international  partner,  the  French  Space  Agency. 
So,  we  have  established,  and  continue  to  launch,  through  OSTM, 
these  high-precision  radar  altimeters  to  measure  global  sea-level 
rise. 

Senator CANTWELL. Mr. Chairman? 
Senator NELSON. Ms. Kicza, why was the radar altimeter decom-

missioned? 

Ms.  KICZA.  Dr.  Freilich  correctly  assessed  it,  we  kept  our  focus 

on maintaining weather continuity. 

I would like to add to what Dr. Freilich has indicated. This next 
mission  is  the  Ocean  Surface  Topography  Mission.  It’s  the  follow- 
on to Jason-1. NOAA, in fact, is a partner in that effort, and we’re 
supporting  the  ground  system  as  part  of  a  research-to-operations 
activity.  And  we’re  now  actively  engaged  with  EUMETSAT  for 
looking  at  Jason-3,  which  is  the  follow-on  to  the  OSTM  mission. 
And  that,  too,  is  part  of  the  dialogue  that  we’re  having  with  the 
Administration on continuity of this critical measurement. 

Senator NELSON. Senator Cantwell? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  I  just  wanted  to  jump  in  there  on  this 
question, because I heard Dr. Freilich’s testimony earlier, and we’re 
talking  about  different  information,  aren’t  we,  Dr.  Busalacchi?  I 
mean,  the  fact  that  you  would  say,  ‘‘OK,  we’re  going  to  solve  this 
problem  by  having,  a  measurement  on  a  certain  time  and  basis 
from these airplanes, versus the constant continuity of information 
on  temperature  over  a  long  period  of  time,  and  changes  to  that 
temperature,  is  what  is  essential  in  measuring  this  impact  of  cli-
mate  change  surface  temperature  on  sea  level  to  the  intensity.’’ 
That’s what we’re trying to measure. So, to think that you’re going 
to have some missions, which I think also have been underfunded, 
and  say  that  that  is  a  substitute  for  this,  I  think,  is  not  under-
standing, or not portraying the science in the right way. 

Senator  NELSON.  And  before  you  answer  that,  let  me  just  cor-
roborate  what  the  Senator  has  said.  The  President’s  budget  for 
NASA’s  Earth  Science  program  was  $1.5  billion  for  Fiscal  Year 
2008, the one that we’re planning for. That’s $500 million less than 
was recommended by the Earth Decadal Survey. 

Dr. BUSALACCHI. That is correct. 
As  I  said  in  my  written  testimony,  right  now  we  do  not  have  a 
single  agency  within  this  country  that  has  the  mandate,  nor  the 
budget, for operational climate monitoring, operational climate pre-
diction,  and  the  offering  of  operational  climate  services.  It’s  like 
during  World  War  II—coming  out  of  World  War  II  we  developed 
numerical  weather  prediction  and  operational  sense.  Within  the 
past 20 years, we’re moving into that direction for the country with 
respect to operational climate. 

Two  years  ago,  the  interim  report  of  the  Decadal  Survey  indi-
cated  that  this  system  of  environmental  satellites  is  at  risk  of  col-
lapse.  That  was  very  prescient.  That  was  1  year  in  advance  of  the 
Nunn-McCurdy certification process. Earlier this year, the Decadal 
Survey  stated  that,  in  the  short  period  since  this  interim  report, 
budgetary constraints and programmatic difficulties at NASA have 
greatly exacerbated this concern. At a time of unprecedented need, 
the  Nation’s  Earth  observation  programs,  once  the  envy  of  the 
world,  are  in  disarray.  And,  as  Senator  Nelson  pointed  out,  the 
FY08  budget  request  is  not  adequate  to  implement  the  rec-
ommendations of the Decadal Survey. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  But,  Dr.  Busalacchi,  I  was  being  more  spe-

cific. Are these planes a substitute? 

Dr.  BUSALACCHI.  As  Dr.  Holland  said,  we  need  to  look  at  the 
total  system.  It’s  not  either/or.  It’s  planes,  it’s  in  situ,  and  it’s  the 
satellites.  We  need  to  take  a  systems  approach,  and  we  haven’t 
been  doing  that.  That’s  part  of  the  national  strategy  that  we  need 
to have, that I was alluding to in my testimony. 

Senator NELSON. Well, I—— 
Senator CANTWELL. Well, I’ll—go ahead, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  NELSON.  Well,  I  want  to  ask  both  of  you—Dr.  Holland 
and Dr. Busalacchi—what is your opinion? Is politics driving some 
of  these  technical  decisions  that  is  lessening  the  emphasis  on  in-
struments that are measuring climate change? 

Dr.  BUSALACCHI.  Well,  I’ll—I’d  have  to  say  that  I  was  a  NASA 
employee  for  19  years,  and  moved  to  the  university  in  2000.  I’ve 
seen—since  I  joined  the  agency,  in  1982—since  I  joined  NASA,  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

1982,  I’ve  seen  a  distinct  change  in  the  emphasis  on  the  science. 
And whether or not you want to call it politics or not, clearly there 
has been a shift in the emphasis within the agency for exploration, 
turning  our  eyes  and  ears  of  satellites  to  outer  space,  and 
defocusing the emphasis on planet Earth. That is a stated fact. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Holland? 
Dr. HOLLAND. I think it’s fair to say that there are political deci-
sions  being  made  which  negatively  impact  our  capacity  to  under-
stand  the  weather  system.  Whether  that  is  a  deliberate  policy  or 
not, I’m not in a position to know. 

I  would,  however,  like  to  just  address  the  altimeter,  since  you 
also  addressed  that.  We’ve  focused  on  the  climate  side  of  things. 
That  altimeter  is  absolutely  crucial,  from  a  hurricane  forecasting 
point  of  view,  because  without  it  we  don’t  have  the  information  of 
the subsurface ocean energy which is critical to understanding and 
predicting,  in  particular,  the  rapid  intensification  of  hurricanes,  as 
we’ve  seen  in  the  last  few  years,  with  Hurricane  Rita  and  Hurri-
cane  Katrina,  moving  over  that  deep,  warm  pool  in  the  Gulf  of 
Mexico. 

Senator  NELSON.  That  was  the  radar  altimeter  that  you’re  talk-
ing  about.  That  begs  the  question;  the  decision  to  remove  those 
sensors,  that  would  have  increased  our  capability  to  monitor  cli-
mate  change  and  tracking  the  hurricanes.  What  do  you  think  we 
ought to do? 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  I  guess  I’m  a  fan  of  Satchel  Paige,  and  I  don’t 
think  we  should  spend  too  much  time  looking  backward,  because 
they  might  be  catching  up.  What  I’d  rather  say  is,  what  has  hap-
pened has happened, and I think it now behooves us to make sure 
that  we  take  the  best  possible  technical  and  scientific  decisions, 
without any political interference, to be able to move forward. 

Senator NELSON. Do you think, with all of these studies that are 
coming up, that we’re going to be in a position where we can make 
those decisions without political interference? 

Dr.  HOLLAND.  I  really  am  not  in  a  position  to  be  able  to  answer 
that. I think it behooves you and your colleagues to also make sure 
that  happens.  I  come  from  the  scientific  side.  All  I  can  say  is  that 
the  best  science  and  the  best  technology  is  not  being  applied  fully 
to the problem, at present. 

And I want to emphasize a point, here, and that is, it’s very easy 
to concentrate on a specific instrument or a specific type of instru-
ment.  What—there  are  significant  problems  with  the  entire  fore-
cast  and  warning  process,  and  that  it  is  like  a  chain.  And  if  one 
link  is  weakest,  that’s  where  the  chain  disappears.  And  I  think 
what  we  really  need  to  do—and  I’m  sure  we’re  not  doing  this,  at 
present—is  taking  a  proper  integrated  look  at  the  entire  process 
and how all of the relevant elements fit within that. 

Senator  NELSON.  Well,  hopefully  that  will  occur.  But,  in  case 
some  of  you  feel  like  we’ve  been  too  rough  on  you,  let  me  just  as-
sure  you,  there  is  a  lot  at  stake,  and  there  are  millions  of  people 
that  live  close  to  the  coast  in  this  country  that  are  depending  on 
the  U.S.  Government  to  get  it  right.  And  the  hard  questions  need 
to be asked, and they need to be answered. 

We’ll  go  back,  this  will  be  the  concluding  thought,  the  GAO, 
which  is  a  nonpolitical  and  it’s  not  only  a  bipartisan,  it’s  a  non-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

partisan  group  of  people  who  analyze  what  went  wrong  and  what 
to  do  about  it.  They’ve  clearly  stated,  and  we  see  some  evidence, 
since  there  is  still  slippage  in  this  program,  that  the  decision-
making has not been coalesced around a significant point, but that 
it’s still split up, which is part of the reason that GAO has testified 
that  it’s  gotten  us  into  the  fix  that  we’re  in,  in  the  first  place.  So, 
what  we  would  like  you  to  do,  since  we  have  the  responsibility  of 
looking over the shoulder of the Executive Branch, is to make sure 
that you report to us on how that’s been fixed, the new time sched-
ules  that  you’re  on,  what  instruments  are  going  to  be  ready  and 
when,  and  give  us  a  realistic  time  schedule,  as  well  as  a  cost  esti-
mate,  because  it’s  this  branch  of  government  that  has  to  appro-
priate  the  money.  And  then,  hopefully  we  can  get  this  problem 
straightened out. 

I  want  to  thank  you  all  for  your  testimony.  I  want  to  thank  you 
for  your  patience.  I  would  love  to  come  up  and  greet  you,  but  we 
are down to 7 minutes to vote. 

So, with that, the meeting is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 11:15 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Observations  from  our  weather  and  environmental  satellites  are  critically  impor-
tant  for  the  Nation’s  weather  forecasting  and  research,  as  well  as  climate  change 
science.  I  come  from  a  state  that  is  surrounded  by  the  ocean,  and  my  constituents 
rely on these eyes in the sky to provide accurate and timely information. 

Both  the  Central  Pacific  Hurricane  Center  in  Honolulu  and  the  National  Hurri-
cane Center in Miami rely on satellite data to improve storm watches and warnings. 
Hawaii  is  at  risk  for  hurricanes,  and  while  storm  frequency  seems  to  be  reduced 
when  compared  to  the  Atlantic,  it  only  takes  one  major  storm  to  wreak  havoc  on 
an island. 

These  two  centers  track  these  devastating  storms  from  start  to  finish  and  issue 

warnings for all our coastal communities that are at risk from landfall. 

Weather and environmental satellite observations also contribute to our increased 
understanding of the impacts of climate change—another topic of critical importance 
to the Nation. 

In  Hawaii,  satellite-derived  measurements  of  sea  surface  temperature,  for  exam-
ple,  can  be  used  to  predict  the  health  of  coral  reefs—particularly  coral  bleaching 
events. 

The  scientific  community  is  concerned  that  the  United  States  is  losing  key  sat-
ellite  observing  capabilities,  particularly  for  climate  research  and  accurate  weather 
forecasts.  A  number  of  satellite  programs  have  experienced  difficulties,  including 
cost overruns and schedule delays. 

We  need  to  be  proactive  in  addressing  these  problems  and  employing  the  tech-
nologies  necessary  to  ensure  accuracy  in  forecasting  and  research.  The  citizens  of 
Hawaii and other coastal states deserve no less. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE, U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  for  holding  this  hearing  on  the  state  of  our  Nation’s 
environmental  and  weather  satellite  infrastructure.  Given  that  satellites  provide 
over 90 percent of our Nation’s weather prediction capabilities, it is critical that we 
ensure  our  forecasters  have  nothing  less  than  the  best  available  data  so  they  can 
provide  precise,  advance  warnings  of  impending  storms.  Today’s  discussion  is  par-
ticularly timely, in light of this week’s leadership change at the National Hurricane 
Center  and  the  ongoing  debate  regarding  the  replacement  of  the  QuickSCAT  sat-
ellite. 

I  would  like  to  thank  our  witnesses,  Administrator  Kizca,  Mr.  Powner,  and  Doc-
tors Freilich, Holland, and Busalacchi, for appearing before this committee today to 
discuss  this  vital  concern.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  your  testimony  about  how  we 
can improve our Nation’s weather and environmental satellite systems and continue 
providing  accurate  and  timely  weather  and  climate  predictions  for  the  American 
people. 

This  hearing  coincides  with  a  change  in  leadership  at  the  National  Hurricane 
Center announced by NOAA just 2 days ago amid conflicting reports about the Cen-
ter’s  ability  to  continue  providing  precise  hurricane  tracking  and  other  vital  pre-
dictions.  I  look  forward  to  the  release  later  this  month  of  a  NOAA  report  detailing 
the  circumstances  that  led  to  this  decision,  and  in  the  meantime,  it  is  imperative 
not only that our forecasters have the tools they need to develop accurate hurricane 
track  projections,  but  also  that  the  public  has  enough  confidence  to  heed  those 
warnings once issued. We all saw the devastation wrought upon the Gulf Coast dur-
ing Hurricane Katrina nearly 2 years ago. We must not lose sight of the Hurricane 
Center’s  remarkable  precision  of  prediction  and  rapid  dissemination  of  information 
that  resulted  in  wide-scale  evacuations  and  preparations  that  saved  thousands  of 
lives during that terrible storm. 

(77) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

I commend NOAA’s scientists for their extraordinary accomplishments in improv-
ing the forecasts of hurricanes. Over the past 15 years our 2 day forecasts have im-
proved  by  50  percent—cutting  the  difference  between  the  forecast  and  the  actual 
landfall to an average of 111 miles. This is a reflection of the dedicated researchers 
throughout  NOAA.  Quite  frankly,  this  work  has  saved  resources  and  lives.  It  has 
been  estimated  that  each  mile  of  evacuated  coastline  costs  reach  $1  million  dollars 
and with the improved forecast state and Federal officials have been able to reduce 
the  economic  and  human  repercussions  of  hurricanes  both  before  they  hit,  and  in 
their aftermath. 

However, our instruments are aging, and development of their replacements—no-
tably  the  National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System,  or 
NPOESS  (EN-pose)—has  been  plagued  by  cost  overruns  and  setbacks  to  vital  in-
struments.  This  program,  initially  budgeted  at  $6.5  billion,  has  swelled  to  nearly 
twice that cost, reduced the number of satellites by a third, and suffered significant 
reductions  in  instrumentation.  If  the  trend  of  forecasting  improvements  is  to  con-
tinue as it has in the past several decades, we cannot allow these development set-
backs to continue. 

The next generation of satellites is capable of providing additional forecasting in-
formation  that  will  not  only  improve  our  Nation’s  weather  and  climate  forecasting, 
but also accrue societal benefits in agriculture, energy, and the mitigation of climate 
change.  Unfortunately,  the  investment  into  this  infrastructure  has  not  been  com-
mensurate  with  the  potential  dividends.  In  a  2007  report,  the  National  Research 
Council  of  the  National  Academies  stated  that,  ‘‘the  United  States’  extraordinary 
foundation  of  global  observations  is  at  great  risk.’’  Furthermore,  the  report  called 
it  ‘‘imperative’’  NOAA  fill  the  data  gap  that  would  result  from  the  demise  of  its 
QuikSCAT  satellite,  which  contributes  to  the  forecasting  of  hurricanes,  as  well  as 
other  storms  like  the  one  that  battered  the  Coast  of  Maine  on  Patriot’s  Day.  With 
the  failure  of  QuickSCAT’s  main  transmitter  last  year,  a  medium  and  long-term 
plan  must  be  established  to  replace  this  information  before  the  backup  transmitter 
fails as well. 

The GAO has suggested that NOAA must incorporate lessons from past mistakes 
in  developing  realistic  costs  and  schedules,  and  government  officials  must  provide 
unwavering oversight to hold the agency accountable. I strongly agree with this as-
sessment  and  look  forward  to  hearing  from  our  witnesses  today  to  determine  how 
our Nation’s environmental satellites can upgrade to the next generation in an effec-
tive and financially responsible manner. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

DR. MICHAEL H. FREILICH 

Question 1. What are the options for replacing QuikSCAT in terms of the various 
levels  of  capability  that  such  a  replacement  could  provide,  and  the  trade-offs  in 
terms of timing for making such a replacement operational? 

Answer. The National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA) is evalu-
ating several options for addressing its ocean vector wind requirements and has con-
tracted with NASA’s Jet Propulsion Laboratory (JPL) to support NOAA in these en-
deavors,  which  includes  examination  of  QuikSCAT  replacement  and  QuikSCAT  en-
hancement options. NASA stands ready to assist NOAA. 

Question 2. Do you have good cost estimates for such various options? 
Answer.  NASA  is  supporting  NOAA  in  the  development  of  the  options.  Cost  esti-
mates  on  the  preferred  option  will  be  developed  by  NASA’s  JPL  as  study  products 
and released by NOAA at the appropriate time. 

Question 3. When will NOAA and NASA make a decision regarding a replacement 

for QuikSCAT? 

Answer.  The  Decadal  Survey  identifies  a  sea  surface  wind  vector  scatterometry 
mission, the Extended Ocean Vector Winds Mission (XOVWM), as a mid-decadal pri-
ority for NOAA. NASA continues to work closely with NOAA to support an efficient 
transition  of  ocean  surface  vector  wind  measurements  from  research  to  operations. 
NOAA  will  make  the  decision  regarding  the  preferred  option  for  a  QuikSCAT  re-
placement based on its analysis of competing options and priorities. 

Question  4.  NASA  and  NOAA  released  a  report  in  January  of  this  year  with  rec-
ommendations for recovering from the descopes of the Nunn-McCurdy process. What 
are  your  two  agencies  doing  to  implement  those  recommendations  and  are  those 
plans part of your current operating plans and budgets? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

Answer.  NASA  is  a  member  of  the  NPOESS  Executive  Committee  (EXCOM)  and 
continues to participate in the management and oversight of the National Polar-or-
biting Operational Environmental Satellite System (NPOESS) program. From a pro-
grammatic standpoint, in the Agency’s support role to the NPOESS Program, NASA 
has provided five extra full-time technical staff to the NPOESS Integrated Program 
Office to lend increased monitoring support. 

In  April  2007,  NASA  and  NOAA  provided  resources  from  core  programs  to  allow 
the OMPS-Limb instrument to be re-manifested on NPP, thus restoring the full set 
of  nadir  total  ozone  measurements  and  the  limb  profiling  capabilities  for  NPP.  As 
the Earth Science Decadal Survey committee was finalizing its notional mission set 
and  sequence,  the  full  impact  of  the  removal  of  the  climate  sensors  from  the 
NPOESS program was just coming to light. NASA and NOAA, in consultation with 
the  National  Research  Council,  have  structured  a  follow-on  activity  wherein  a  sub-
set  of  the  Decadal  Survey  committee,  augmented  by  others  they  may  deem  nec-
essary,  would  hold  a  workshop  and  provide  input  on  how  the  agencies  might  miti-
gate  the  impact  of  the  changes  to  NPOESS.  The  NRC  workshop  was  held  in  June, 
in  time  to  provide  recommendations  useful  for  helping  to  determine  the  FY  2009 
budget requirements. 

Question  5.  NASA  has  a  satellite,  Deep  Space  Climate  Observatory  (DSCOVR), 
with  a  space  weather  monitoring  instrument.  DSCOVR  sits  in  a  storage  container 
at  the  Goddard  Space  Flight  Center  with  no  plans  for  flight.  Why  doesn’t  NASA 
make DSCOVR available to NOAA for its space weather mission? 

Answer.  Although  it  is  possible  to  refurbish  a  satellite  that  began  development 
9 years ago, there are certain hurdles to pursuing this course: (1) the DSCOVR pay-
load  does  not  provide  all  of  the  capabilities  needed  by  NOAA  for  operational  space 
weather  predictions;  (2)  the  DSCOVR  measurements  also  would  do  nothing  to  re-
place  the  de-manifested  NPOESS  climate  sensors  nor  satisfy  recommendations  of 
the Decadal Survey, and (3) refurbishment funding requirements are estimates only 
based  on  there  being  no  problems  with  a  stored,  decade-old  spacecraft  and  instru-
ments. We will now expand on these two issues. 

A  NASA  technical  study  conducted  from  mid-May  through  June  2007  examined 
the  documentation  related  to  the  state  of  the  DSCOVR  spacecraft  and  instruments 
when  placed  into  storage  in  November  2001,  the  tasks  required  to  refurbish  and 
launch  the  DSCOVR  mission  to  the  Earth-Sun  L1  point,  the  availability  of  people 
having  the  necessary  skills  to  conduct  the  refurbishment  activities  given  the  state 
of the available documentation, and the approximate durations of the refurbishment 
and  launch  campaign  activities.  The  study  concluded  that  refurbishment  of  the 
spacecraft could be completed within 15 months of initiation. The fifteen months re-
furbishment period estimate does not include time to acquire and accommodate the 
low  energy  ion  sensor,  which  was  not  part  of  the  original  DSCOVR  payload  and 
which  is  required  by  NOAA  for  space  weather  predictions.  The  study  assumed  no 
schedule or cost estimate for problems which might have occurred during the decade 
of storage. The cost was then estimated at $23 million in FY 2007 dollars for refur-
bishment alone. The study also estimated the mission operations and data analysis 
costs to be an additional $23 million for the baseline two-year mission. Launch vehi-
cle  costs  for  a  delivery  to  the  L1  orbit  are  estimated  to  be  approximately  $150  mil-
lion. 

Discussions  between  NASA  and  NOAA  through  much  of  July  identified  the  fact 
that  the  existing  DSCOVR  space  weather  instrument  suite  does  not  include  a  low- 
energy  ion  sensor  which  is  part  of  the  ACE  complement  and  which  is  required  by 
NOAA  for  their  operational  space  weather  predictions.  These  discussions  also  ad-
dressed  possible  mechanisms  for  transfer  of  the  DSCOVR  assets  from  NASA  to 
NOAA, and mechanisms for reimbursement of NASA for refurbishment of DSCOVR 
by the Goddard Space Flight Center development team. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

DR. MICHAEL H. FREILICH 

Question  1.  Will  the  loss  of  climate  science  sensors  have  a  significant  impact  on 

the goals of the U.S. Climate Change Science Program (CCSP)? 

Answer.  Absolutely.  The  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program  (CCSP)  is  criti-
cally dependent on the availability of long-term, stable data sets that allow it to ad-
dress  the  extent  to  which  the  Earth  system  is  changing  over  long  (multi-decadal) 
time periods. Any gaps or termination of data records will be critical. As an external 
verification, the recently released National Research Council (NRC) report reviewing 
CCSP, ‘‘Evaluating Progress of the U.S. Climate Change Science Program: Methods 
and  Preliminary  Results’’  (released  September  13,  2007)  says  the  following  in  its 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

summary (page 5): ‘‘The loss of existing and planned satellite sensors is perhaps the 
single greatest threat to the future success of CCSP.’’ 

80 

Question  2.  Will  the  loss  of  climate  science  sensors  have  a  significant  impact  on 

the goals of the International Panel on Climate Change? 

Answer.  Absolutely.  The  success  of  the  International  Panel  on  Climate  Change 
(IPCC) process is critically dependent on the availability of good data, especially the 
long-term  data  sets  needed  to  document  the  evolution  of  climate  forcing  and  Earth 
system  response.  Without  such  long-term  data  sets,  the  IPCC  scientists  will  have 
to  deal  with  less  certain  estimates  of  changes  in  Earth  system  forcing  as  well  as 
in overall response. 

Question 3. What data gaps do you expect and how will they affect climate change 
research  in  the  U.S.—particularly  with  regard  to  the  multi-decadal  data  sets  that 
are critical for understanding global warming? 

Answer.  NASA  and  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA) 

are looking for ways to minimize data gaps in several areas, as detailed below: 

• Total  Solar  Irradiance:  NASA’s  top  priority  for  data  continuity  is  to  maintain 
the 30-year record of total solar irradiance data. To that end, NASA will launch 
the  Total  Irradiance  Monitor  (TIM)  on  the  Glory  spacecraft  in  December  2008. 
Approximately  6–12  month  overlap  between  orbiting  solar  irradiance  instru-
ments  is  essential  for  consistent  mission-to-mission  calibration  and  the  result-
ing monitoring of solar input to the climate system. 

• Atmospheric  Ozone  Composition:  NASA  and  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmos-
pheric  Administration  (NOAA)  have  jointly  agreed  to  fund  the  Ozone  Mapping 
and  Profiling  Suite  (OMPS)-Limb  instrument  as  part  of  the  NPOESS  Pre-
paratory  Project  (NPP)  mission,  scheduled  for  launch  in  September  2009.  This 
addition will allow the first vertically resolved ozone measurements. 

• Moderate  Resolution  Land  Surface  Imagery:  The  currently  operational  Landsat 
7  spacecraft  is  expected  to  last  through  2010.  NASA  is  attempting  to  minimize 
the  gap  in  the  30-year  record  of  moderate  resolution  land  surface  imagery 
through the Landsat Data Continuity Mission (LDCM), scheduled for launch in 
July 2011. 

• Ocean  Altimetry:  Current  ocean  altimetry  data  is  provided  by  the  Topographic 
Experiment  for  ocean  circulation  (TOPEX)/Poseidon  and  Jason-1  missions.  Fu-
ture  data  will  be  acquired  by  the  Ocean  Surface  Topography  Mission  (OSTM), 
scheduled  to  launch  in  June  2008.  Plans  for  continuing  the  precision  measure-
ment  of  global  sea  level  change  beyond  the  Ocean  Surface  Topography  Mission 
(OSTM)  are  not  firm,  putting  the  presently  15-year  time  series  in  jeopardy  be-
yond the lifetime of OSTM. 

• Surface  Vector  Winds:  NASA’s  Quick  Scatterometer  (QuikSCAT)  satellite  has 
been on-orbit for over 8 years, 5 years longer than its baseline mission. Respon-
sibility  for  developing  an  operational  satellite  to  continue  these  measurements 
was  assigned  to  NOAA  in  the  recent  Earth  Science  Decadal  Survey.  NASA  is 
providing  its  expertise  to  support  NOAA  as  that  agency  makes  its  decisions 
about  a  follow-on  mission.  In  addition  to  contributions  to  weather  prediction 
and  marine  hazard  forecasting,  scatterometer  wind  measurements  are  funda-
mental  for  the  calculation  of  wind-forced  ocean  circulation  (ocean  transport  ac-
counts for approximately half of the total equator-to-pole meridional heat trans-
port on Earth). 

Question  4.  The  recertified  NPOESS  program  is  costing  more  to  do  less:  the  cost 
estimate  increased  from  $6.5  billion  to  $12.5  billion,  and  the  planned  acquisition  of 
6  spacecraft  was  reduced  to  4,  with  several  sensors  canceled  or  reduced  in  capa-
bility. Are you certain that the new cost of $12.5 billion is a realistic, firm estimate 
for the total cost of the program? 

Answer. The restructured NPOESS program was certified by the Under Secretary 
of  Defense  (Acquisition,  Technology,  and  Logistics).  Part  of  this  certification  is  that 
the  cost  estimates  for  the  program  are  reasonable.  The  Office  of  the  Secretary  of 
Defense  (OSD)  Cost  Analysis  Improvement  Group  (CAIG)  made  this  determination 
based  on  their  review  of  the  program  plans,  schedules,  and  program  risks.  NOAA 
and  the  Department  of  Defense  (DOD)  share  the  NPOESS  costs  equally  and  have 
developed  budgets  to  support  this  revised  estimate.  The  development  of  advanced 
remote sensing instruments and spacecraft will always contain some risk and uncer-
tainty  however,  based  on  the  insight  available  to  NASA,  the  budget  estimates 
should be considered reasonable. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

Question  5.  Can  you  guarantee  me  that  the  actual,  full  cost  of  the  NPOESS  sat-

ellites will be $12.5 billion? 

Answer.  NASA  will  provide  all  the  support  we  can  to  assist  the  U.S.  Air  Force 
and NOAA achieve the Nunn-McCurdy recertified NPOESS baseline of $12.5 billion. 
Question 6. What safeguards are in place to prevent costs from escalating further? 
Answer. NASA believes that the U.S. Air Force and NOAA have implemented the 
appropriate contractual safeguards to prevent cost escalation. In our support role to 
the NPOESS Program, NASA has provided extra technical staffing to the NPOESS 
Integrated  Program  Office  (IPO)  to  lend  increased  technical  monitoring  support. 
Further, the restructured contract has a decision point in 2010 on whether to award 
the option for the last two NPOESS satellites, C3 and C4. If the NPOESS Executive 
Committee  (EXCOM;  composed  of  the  Under  Secretary  of  Defense  (Acquisition, 
Technology,  and  Logistics),  the  Under  Secretary  of  Commerce  for  Oceans  and  At-
mosphere,  and  the  NASA  Administrator)  is  not  satisfied  with  the  contractor’s  tech-
nical,  cost,  or  schedule  performance,  there  will  be  an  opportunity  at  that  time  to 
make a change. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. KAY BAILEY HUTCHISON TO 

DR. MICHAEL H. FREILICH 

Question 1. Can you provide us with an update on your discussions with National 
Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  regarding  transferring  the  Deep 
Space  Climate  Observatory  (DSCOVR)  spacecraft  to  NOAA  to  meet  NOAA’s  solar 
wind requirements via a public/private partnership? 

Answer. NOAA and NASA technical and senior personnel met from May through 
July  2007  to  discuss  aspects  of  the  DSCOVR  spacecraft,  the  science  capabilities  of 
the mission in light of the National Research Council’s (NRC) Earth Science Decadal 
Survey recommendations for NASA and NOAA, and the scope and costs of technical 
and  programmatic  options  for  refurbishing  and  launching  the  DSCOVR  spacecraft. 
On  May  11,  2007,  NASA  organized  a  full-day  science  workshop  attended  by  more 
than  35  researchers  from  NASA,  NOAA,  the  Department  of  Energy,  private  indus-
try, and academia, including the DSCOVR Principal Investigator. The workshop as-
sessed  the  potential  contribution  of  DSCOVR  to  Earth/climate  science  in  the  areas 
of  aerosols  and  clouds;  ozone;  radiation  budget  studies;  and,  vegetation/ecosystem 
studies. The workshop concluded that while DSCOVR sensors at the Earth-Sun La-
grange 1 point have the potential to make innovative measurements that could pro-
vide valuable augmentation for other low-Earth orbit and geostationary orbit meas-
urement systems, the DSCOVR measurements would not replace the climate meas-
urements  that  would  have  been  made  by  the  de-manifested  National  Polar-orbiting 
Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS)  climate  sensors.  The 
DSCOVR  Workshop  report  had  a  finding:  ‘‘Sensors  on  the  DSCOVR  satellite  have 
the  potential  to  make  important  and  innovative  measurements  from  a  novel  per-
spective;  further,  measurements  enabled  by  the  DSCOVR  satellite  would  provide 
valuable  augmentation  to  a  substantial  number  of  other  measurements  systems  in-
cluding satellite remote sensing, suborbital and ground-based measurements.’’ 

In  addition,  the  DSCOVR  measurements  would  not  fulfill  climate  science  meas-
urements identified and recommended for flight by the NRC Earth Science Decadal 
Survey, and should not receive any funding priority over any possible Decadal Sur-
vey  missions.  NASA  and  NOAA  personnel  have  met  to  coordinate  communication, 
formats,  and  content  of  the  DSCOVR  technical  review  conducted  by  NASA  during 
May  and  June  2007.  Details  of  the  review  conclusions  are  presented  in  the  answer 
to question 2 below. Coordination insured that the results of the NASA review were 
presented  in  a  way  that  enabled  accurate  and  straightforward  comparisons  of 
NASA-estimated refurbishment costs with those from the original NOAA study con-
ducted  by  Lockheed  Martin.  The  fact  that  the  existing  DSCOVR  solar  wind  instru-
ment  suite  was  lacking  a  low-energy  ion  sensor  necessary  for  NOAA’s  operational 
solar  wind  predictions  was  discovered  as  a  result  of  these  discussions  following  the 
NASA  technical  study.  The  NOAA  study  did  include  a  cost  estimate  of  $3  million 
for adding the ion sensor. 

Currently the NOAA requirement to monitor space weather is being accomplished 
by  observations  from  NASA’s  Advanced  Composition  Explorer  (ACE)  mission.  ACE 
was  launched  in  August  1997  and  is  now  in  its  fourth  two-year  extended  mission 
cycle.  Based  on  the  current  rate  of  fuel  consumption,  NASA  is  optimistic  that  ACE 
will continue to operate through 2022. However the modification of its orbit to con-
serve  fuel  does  not  meet  NOAA’s  need  for  24/7  reception  of  its  data  and  this  effect 
will  worsen  during  solar  maximum.  Additionally,  three  of  the  four  ACE  space 
weather  sensors  currently  provide  degraded  data  during  strong  radiation  storms 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

and cannot be relied upon as the sole data source during solar maximum which will 
arrive  2011–2012.  Should  NOAA  still  feel  that  their  strategic  needs  are  served  by 
flying  the  DSCOVR  mission,  NASA  is  ready  to  support  NOAA  on  a  reimbursable 
basis  with  the  expertise  and  facilities  to  prepare  the  DSCOVR  satellite  for  launch 
and operations. NASA believes that the refurbishment could be accomplished within 
the parameters identified in response to question 2. 

Question 2. Has NASA completed an investigation as to the current status of the 

DSCOVR spacecraft? 

Answer. A technical study conducted from mid-May through June 2007 examined 
the  documentation  related  to  the  state  of  the  DSCOVR  spacecraft  and  instruments 
when  placed  into  storage  in  November  2001,  the  tasks  required  to  refurbish  and 
launch  the  DSCOVR  mission  to  the  Earth-Sun  Lagrange  1  (L1)  point,  the  avail-
ability  of  people  having  the  necessary  skills  to  conduct  the  refurbishment  activities 
given  the  state  of  the  available  documentation,  and  the  approximate  durations  of 
the  refurbishment  and  launch  campaign  activities.  The  study  concluded  that  refur-
bishment  of  the  spacecraft  could  be  completed  within  15  months  of  initiation,  for 
a cost of $32.2 million in FY 2007 dollars. The fifteen months refurbishment period 
estimate  does  not  include  time  to  acquire  and  accommodate  the  ION  sensor.  The 
study  also  estimated  the  mission  operations  and  data  analysis  costs  to  be  an  addi-
tional $23 million for the baseline two-year mission. A NOAA study had lower esti-
mates for these functions due to the use of existing NOAA facilities for mission oper-
ations  and  ground  systems.  Launch  vehicle  costs  for  a  delivery  to  the  L1  Lissajous 
orbit are estimated to be approximately $150 million. 

The  difference  between  the  NOAA  and  NASA  studies  was  the  cost  of  the  launch 
vehicle.  The  NOAA  study  baselined  a  commercial  partner  to  whom  the  DSCOVR 
would  be  competitively  transferred.  The  commercial  company  would  then  use  any 
suitable FAA-licensed vehicle for launch, cost estimated at $27–$35 million in 2006. 
The  NASA  study  baselined  a  government  reimbursable  mission  using  a  NASA  cer-
tified and acquired Evolved Expendable Launch Vehicle. 

Given  the  state  of  the  suspension  documentation  and  the  plans  that  were  pre-
pared  in  2001  outlining  the  necessary  tasks  for  return  to  flight  status,  the  study 
concluded  that  a  successful  refurbishment  could  only  be  conducted  with  the  active 
involvement  of  the  DSCOVR  development  team  at  NASA  Goddard  Space  Flight 
Center  (GSFC);  further,  the  study  determined  that  the  appropriate  individuals  still 
were  active  at  GSFC,  although  in  many  cases  they  would  have  to  be  released  from 
other  projects,  depending  on  when  the  refurbishment  activities  commenced.  The 
study  noted  that  an  initial  functional  ‘‘aliveness’’  test  (see  question  3  below)  is  re-
quired prior to commencing the spacecraft refurbishment activities. 

DSCOVR  has  been  stored  in  the  Hubble  Space  Telescope  clean  room  at  GSFC 
since November 2001, in its custom storage container and under continuous dry ni-
trogen  purge.  The  DSCOVR  parts  inventory  has  been  maintained  by  the  GSFC 
Solar  Dynamics  Observatory  project,  and  the  Ground  Support  Equipment  has  been 
determined  complete  at  GSFC.  The  Suspension  Plan  developed  when  the  nearly- 
complete spacecraft was placed into storage has been determined to still be relevant 
and comprehensive. 

Completion  of  the  DSCOVR  refurbishment  within  the  cost  and  schedule  defined 
above is contingent upon the successful outcome of the initial aliveness test. If that 
test is not fully successful, this schedule and budget will be insufficient. 

Question 3. Has a ‘‘plug-in’’ test been accomplished? 
Answer. No ‘‘aliveness’’ test has been conducted to verify the state of the DSCOVR 
spacecraft  and  science  payload  since  the  mission  was  placed  into  environmentally 
controlled storage in November 2001. This test would be required prior to initiating 
any  refurbishment  activities.  If  the  aliveness  test  were  to  be  conducted,  it  would 
need  to  be  conducted  immediately  prior  to  refurbishment  to  eliminate  the  need  for 
returning the spacecraft to storage followed by yet another aliveness test. 

Question 4. Will NASA be able to respond to NOAA’s request in a timely manner 
permitting NOAA to make budgetary decisions regarding use of the DSCOVR space-
craft? 

Answer.  Yes,  NASA  will  respond  to  NOAA’s  request  in  a  timely  manner  and  has 
initiated a number of activities to reach that goal. The NASA Science workshop held 
in  mid-May  2007  and  attended  by  NOAA  research  and  programmatic  personnel 
(among  many  others)  addressed  the  scientific  utility  of  DSCOVR  for  climate  re-
search.  The  NASA  technical  review  conducted  during  May–June  and  reported  out 
in July 2007 addresses all outstanding issues associated with the refurbishment and 
flight  of  the  DSCOVR  spacecraft  and  payload.  Discussions  between  NASA  and 
NOAA  through  much  of  July  addressed  possible  mechanisms  for  transfer  of  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

DSCOVR assets from NASA to NOAA, and mechanisms for reimbursement of NASA 
for refurbishment of DSCOVR by the GSFC development team. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO 

DR. MICHAEL H. FREILICH 

Question 1. As we all know, NASA’s QuickSCAT satellite system was not initially 
designed  to  be  a  component  to  our  national  hurricane  tracking  system.  Rather,  it 
was to be used primarily to monitor surface winds over the oceans for research pur-
poses. However, through the tenacious work of NOAA scientists the data was evalu-
ated  and  determined  to  be  of  great  use  elucidating  the  tracking  of  storms  further 
out  to  sea  and  estimating  the  potential  intensity  of  developing  tropical  storms.  The 
added ability of QuickSCAT to track tropical storms demonstrates that satellite sys-
tems provide additional benefits beyond their original missions. 

Please  explain  how  the  historical  benefits  of  our  environmental  and  weather  sat-

ellite systems justify the Federal investment in this infrastructure. 

Answer.  The  science  community’s  present  state  of  knowledge  about  global 
change—including many of the measurements and a significant fraction of the anal-
yses  which  serve  as  the  foundation  for  the  recent  report  of  the  Intergovernmental 
Panel  on  Climate  Change  (IPCC)—is  mostly  derived  from  the  NASA  and  National 
Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  operational  satellites  and  in  situ  data  ar-
chives. For example, using data from Earth observing satellites NASA-supported re-
searchers are: monitoring ice cover and ice sheet motions in the Arctic and the Ant-
arctic;  quantifying  the  short-term  and  long-term  changes  to  the  Earth’s  protective 
shield  of  stratospheric  ozone,  including  the  positive  impacts  of  the  Montreal  Proto-
cols;  discovering  robust  relationships  between  increasing  upper  ocean  temperature 
and  decreasing  primary  production  from  the  phytoplankton  that  form  the  base  of 
the  oceans’  food  chain;  and,  using  a  fleet  of  satellites  flying  in  formation  (the  ‘‘A- 
Train’’),  making  unique,  global,  near-simultaneous  measurements  of  aerosols, 
clouds, temperature and relative humidity profiles, and radiative fluxes. 

Our improved understanding of Earth System processes leads to improvements in 
sophisticated  weather  and  climate  models,  which,  in  turn—when  initialized  using 
the satellite data—can be used to predict natural and human-caused changes in the 
Earth’s environment over time scales of hours to years. 

Question  1a.  Do  you  believe  that  our  current  investment  in  environmental  sat-
ellites  is  satisfactory  in  order  to  maintain  our  current  satellite  capabilities  as  well 
as preserve our national leadership role in satellite technology? 

Answer. NASA is presently operating an impressive set of Earth observing space-
craft, and the President’s FY 2008 budget request includes funding for an additional 
seven identified (and one competitively selected) Earth observing missions to launch 
between 2008 and 2014. 

The  FY  2008  budget  also  contained  funding  for  unspecified  ‘‘future  missions.’’ 
These funds will be used to begin new efforts aimed at Earth Science issues. Shortly 
after  the  submission  of  the  FY  2008  budget  the  National  Research  Council  (NRC) 
published  the  Earth  Science  Decadal  Survey.  Although  too  late  to  impact  the  FY 
2008  President’s  Budget  Request  directly,  this  report  is  being  utilized  by  NASA  to 
shape the plans for the use of the future mission investment lines within the Earth 
Science  Division  and  to  assist  in  the  preparation  of  our  FY  2009  budget  request. 
NASA is presently operating 14 Earth-observing missions carrying over 50 instru-
ments.  While  11  of  these  missions  are  indeed  beyond  their  baseline  lifetime,  they 
continue to operate well and to provide high quality measurements for the research 
and  operational  communities.  From  February  to  April  2007,  NASA’s  Earth  Science 
Division conducted a ‘‘Senior Review,’’ the biennial process to examine Earth observ-
ing  missions  operating  beyond  their  baseline  mission.  Both  the  operations  and 
science  panels  in  the  Senior  Review  concluded  after  careful  technical  analyses  that 
all 11 of the operating missions were returning valuable data and were not suffering 
from  imminent  mission-threatening  technical  problems;  the  Senior  Review  rec-
ommended  that  NASA  continue  to  fund  operations  and  science  analyses  for  all  of 
these missions for at least two more years. 

The President’s FY 2008 budget request contains funding for the development and 

launch of seven new Earth observing missions between 2008 and 2014: 

• OSTM  (Ocean  Surface  Topography  Mission;  6/08  launch)  to  continue  the  time 
series of precision global ocean sea level measurements initiated by Topographic 
Experiment  for  ocean  circulation  (TOPEX)/Poseidon  in  1992  and  presently  ob-
tained by Jason-1; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

salinity; 

• OCO  (Orbiting  Carbon  Observatory;  12/08  launch)  to  initiate  global  measure-
ments of atmospheric carbon dioxide and to identify, for the first time, regional 
(1,000 km spatial scale) sources and sinks of CO2; 
• Glory (12/08–3/09 launch) to continue the 26-year consistent time series of solar 
irradiance  measurements  and  to  initiate  global  measurements  of  atmospheric 
aerosol concentration and scattering properties; 
• Aquarius (7/09 launch) to make first-ever, global measurements of ocean surface 
• NPP  (National  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellite  System 
(NPOESS) Preparatory Program; 9/09 launch) to continue the time series of key 
Earth  Observing  System  (EOS)  sensor  measurements,  and  to  provide  risk-re-
duction for the tri-agency NPOESS operational satellite system; 
• LDCM  (Landsat  Data  Continuity  Mission;  7/11  launch)  to  continue  the  30-year 
• GPM ((Global Precipitation Measurement) mission; 6/2013 and 6/2014 launches) 
to extend to the entire globe the present measurements of tropical precipitation 
from the presently operating Tropical Rainfall Mapping Mission (TRMM), allow-
ing accurate, global rainfall measurements every 3 hours. 

long record of moderate-resolution land imaging; and 

In  addition  to  these  seven  missions  comprising  eight  launches  between  2008  and 
2014,  the  FY  2008  budget  request  also  includes  funding  for  a  small–medium  Earth 
System Science Pathfinder (ESSP) mission which will be solicited for competitive se-
lection late in FY 2008 with flight in the 2014–2015 time frame. 

Question 2. The GAO report on the NPOESS program outlined staffing difficulties 
at  DOD,  NOAA  and  the  NPOESS  program.  The  GAO  suggested  that  staffing  dif-
ficulties  were  exacerbating  the  delay  in  implementing  the  project.  The  GAO  report 
stated  that,  ‘‘As  a  result  of  the  lack  of  a  program-wide  staffing  process,  there  has 
been  an  extended  delay  in  determining  what  staff  is  needed  and  in  bringing  those 
staff  on  board;  this  has  resulted  in  delays  in  performing  core  activities,  such  as  es-
tablishing the program office’s cost estimate and bringing in needed contracting ex-
pertise.’’  It  seems  clear  that  delayed  personnel  decisions  are  inhibiting  progress  on 
this critical project. What is the status of streamlining the process to hire additional 
staff  to  ensure  that  this  project  is  receiving  proper  contracting  and  management? 
Answer.  Since  the  writing  of  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  report, 
the NPOESS Integrated Program Office (IPO) has made great strides in their hiring 
and  program  staffing.  The  Systems  Program  Director  is  now  reporting  staffing  as 
‘‘green’’ in his monthly reporting to management. In addition, the IPO has developed 
a Human Capital Plan to address the difficulties in staffing a three-agency program 
office,  which  was  submitted  for  NASA’s  review  in  September  2007.  The  NPOESS 
Program Executive Officer requested five additional NASA personnel to supplement 
the  IPO  staff  after  the  Nunn-McCurdy  restructure  of  the  program  office.  All  NASA 
NPOESS positions are currently filled. 

Question  3.  This  past  January,  approximately  100  experts  at  the  National  Acad-
emies participated in a priority-setting 2007 National Research Council report as re-
quested by NOAA, NASA, and the USGS to come up with detailed recommendations 
to  restore  U.S.  leadership  in  Earth  science  and  application  and  avert  the  potential 
collapse  of  the  system  of  environmental  satellites.  Earlier  that  same  month,  NOAA 
and  NASA  briefed  the  White  House  Office  of  Science  and  Technology  Policy  about 
which  NPOESS  climate  instruments  should  be  ‘‘dismantled’’  and  which  should  fly 
on  satellites  due  to  be  launched  at  a  later  time.  What  would  you  say  is  the  reason 
for  such  a  difference  of  thinking  between  the  NRC  experts  and  the  NASA  decision- 
makers  as  to  which  climate  instruments  should  be  ‘‘dismantled’’  and  which  should 
go forward and as early as possible? 

Answer.  The  apparent  difference  in  thinking  is  really  a  matter  of  a  difference  in 
timing.  The  National  Research  Council  (NRC)  Decadal  Survey  report  and  the 
NPOESS  Nunn-McCurdy  Certification  happened  largely  in  parallel;  thus  the  NRC 
did not have the benefit of full knowledge of the impacts of changes in the NPOESS 
program in designing their recommended mission set. The NASA, the National Oce-
anic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA),  and  the  U.S.  Geological  Survey 
(USGS) asked the NRC in 2004 to conduct a Decadal Survey and develop consensus 
recommendations  relative  to  the  research  and  applications  programs  of  the  three 
participating  agencies.  An  interim  report  was  completed  in  April  2005  and  a  draft 
of the final report was released in January 2007. 

The Nunn-McCurdy Certification of the National Polar-orbiting Operational Envi-
ronmental  Satellite  System  (NPOESS)  occurred  in  June  5,  2006.  Due  to  overruns 
and  schedule  delays,  the  NPOESS  Program  had  exceeded  the  Nunn-McCurdy 
threshold  and  it  became  necessary  to  reduce  the  content  and  overall  risk  of  the  ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

85 

isting  NPOESS  Program  as  a  part  of  the  Nunn-McCurdy  process.  Early  in  the  cer-
tification  process,  the  NPOESS  Executive  Committee  decided  that  providing  unin-
terrupted  satellite  data  to  support  weather  forecasting  would  take  priority  over  cli-
mate measurements. As a result of this prioritization, five climate instruments were 
de-manifested from the certified NPOESS Program. 

In a meeting at the Office of Science and Technology Policy (OSTP) in June 2006, 
NASA  and  NOAA  agreed  to  develop  a  joint  assessment  of:  (1)the  impacts  of  the 
Nunn-McCurdy Certification on their combined climate goals, and (2) various alter-
natives for addressing those impacts. This joint assessment of impacts was delivered 
to OSTP on January 8, 2007 and was followed by additional dialogue on options for 
retaining these measurement capabilities. NASA and NOAA have worked diligently 
to  develop  practical  and  affordable  alternatives  to  address  the  potential  data  gaps 
attributable to the loss of these de-manifested climate sensors. 

Shortly  after  the  Nunn-McCurdy  Certification  had  occurred,  NASA  and  NOAA 
asked the NRC to address the de-manifested climate sensors in the ongoing Decadal 
Survey.  The  NRC  informed  us  that  the  writing  on  the  Decadal  Survey  was  com-
pleted and presently in review. Consequently, it would not be possible to make such 
an  assessment  a  part  of  the  Decadal  Survey.  However,  it  was  agreed  that  a  second 
NRC  group  with  overlapping  membership  with  the  Decadal  Survey  would  conduct 
a workshop to consider the impacts of the Nunn-McCurdy Certification. At this NRC 
workshop,  held  on  June  19–21,  2007,  NASA  and  NOAA  presented  the  alternatives 
that  they  had  been  studying.  A  final  report  with  specific  recommendations  is  due 
in early 2008. 

Question  3a.  Have  the  agencies  re-evaluated  their  satellite  science  programs  in 
light  of  the  NRC  report,  which  came  out  a  week  after  the  White  House  briefing? 
Answer.  NASA  is  using  the  NRC  Decadal  Survey  to  guide  future  mission  deci-
sions. Conceptual studies have been undertaken for all of the missions described in 
the NRC draft report and specific community workshops have been held for the first 
four missions mentioned in the Decadal Survey. 

Question  3b.  In  the  NRC’s  chapter  on  Climate  Variability  and  Change,  they  rec-
ommend restoration of five instruments essential for climate science that have been 
deleted  from  the  NPOESS  program.  Your  agencies  asked  for  these  NRC  rec-
ommendations,  but  you  do  not  appear  to  be  implementing  those  recommendations. 
If you are not reconsidering restoring these climate instruments, why not? 

Answer.  NASA  and  NOAA  have  been  considering  potential  options  to  restore  the 
de-manifested  climate  sensors  since  the  announcement  of  the  NPOESS  Nunn- 
McCurdy  Certification  in  June  2006.  In  April  2007,  the  two  agencies  announced 
plans  to  remanifest  the  Ozone  Mapping  and  Profiler  Suite  (OMPS)  Limb  on  the 
NPOESS Preparatory Project (NPP). NASA and NOAA continue to work on options, 
in coordination with OSTP, to restore these de-manifested climate sensors. 

Question 4. A 2005 interim report of the Committee on Earth Science and Applica-
tions  from  Space:  A  Community  Assessment  and  Strategy  for  the  Future  stated, 
‘‘Understanding the complex, changing planet on which we live, how it supports life, 
and how human activities affect its ability to do so in the future is one of the great-
est  intellectual  challenges  facing  humanity.  It  is  also  one  of  the  most  important 
challenges  for  society  as  it  seeks  to  achieve  prosperity,  health,  and  sustainability.’’ 
The 2007 NRC report strongly backed up this declaration. Do you believe your agen-
cy is living up to this statement? 

Answer.  The  NRC  statement  describes  a  national,  and  in  fact,  an  international 
challenge.  NASA  is  doing  its  part  by  providing  the  scientific  understanding  of  how 
the  Earth  as  a  planet  functions  and  changes.  Our  goal  in  Earth  science,  ‘‘Study 
planet  Earth  from  space  to  advance  scientific  understanding  and  meet  societal 
needs’’ well comports with the NRC’s vision. NASA’s expertise is primarily in those 
parts of the challenge that can best be addressed via remote sensing from space and 
use of that data in Earth system research and modeling. The agency has the largest 
such  program  in  the  world.  At  the  national  level,  NASA  is  the  largest  contributor 
to  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program,  and  is  an  active  partner  in  related 
forums addressing other aspects of the Earth system. NASA continues to work with 
its  interagency  partners  to  advance  the  Nation’s  understanding  of  climate  change 
and  the  Earth  system.  Internationally,  NASA  is  actively  engaged  in  a  wide  range 
of partnerships with other space programs and environmental research programs to 
mutually leverage our respective efforts. NASA is using the NRC’s report as a guide, 
as the agency plans our future Earth Science programs. 

Question 5. The Administration’s FY 2008 NASA budget shows a modest increase 
for  the  aerospace  agency—most  of  which  will  go  to  the  International  Space  Station 
the  Space  Shuttle  and  the  development  of  a  Shuttle  successor—while  the  funding 
for the science programs has will remain flat after years of cuts—now at 30 percent 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

since 2000. While we are all captivated by the thought of men and women exploring 
space,  I  am  very  concerned  that  NASA  is  sacrificing  research  programs  that  are 
vital  if  we  are  to  gain  a  more  comprehensive  knowledge  of  climate  change  on  our 
very own Earth. If we are going to prioritize for budgetary reason, I believe we must 
be the stewards of our own planet. The Senate appropriators of the FY 2008 NASA 
science programs funding have added $25 million to these programs and have stated 
in  their  report,  ‘‘The  Committee  is  concerned  that  the  strong,  balanced  science  pro-
gram that has served the Nation so successfully for many years is being left behind 
rather  than  being  nurtured  and  sustained.’’  Indeed,  NASA  Administrator  Michael 
Griffin  has  defended  the  budget  cuts  as  necessary  to  retool  the  agency  for  a  21st 
century focus on manned space travel to the Moon by 2020 and ultimately to Mars. 
He  has  also  stated  that  he  has  his  doubts  as  to  whether  mankind  should  address 
global warming. 

Can we expect continued erosion in NASA funding for climate change data collec-
tion,  monitoring,  and  research  from  NASA  satellites?  What  are  NASA  priorities  in 
relation  to  the  U.S.  Climate  Change  Science  Program?  It  appears  as  though  inves-
tigation of our own blue planet is becoming a poor stepchild to exploring other plan-
ets or the Moon. 

Answer.  NASA  studies  Earth  from  space  to  advance  scientific  understanding  and 
meet  the  needs  of  humankind.  NASA  is  committed  to  examining  Earth’s  many  fac-
ets from space in the same way the Agency has intensely surveyed the moon, plan-
ets and stars. From the launch of the world’s first experimental meteorological sat-
ellite  in  1960  to  the  14  Earth-observing  satellites  currently  in  orbit,  NASA  drives 
the  technological  and  scientific  advances  that  help  us  understand  our  home  planet. 
The  FY  2008  budget  request  for  the  Earth  Science  Division  is  $1.5  billion,  rep-
resenting  27  percent  of  the  total  funding  for  the  four  Science  Mission  Directorate 
divisions.  This  also  represents  an  increase  of  $32.8  million  over  the  FY  2007  re-
quest.  This  funding  enables  a  wide-ranging  and  balanced  program  of  activities,  in-
cluding: 

tions conducted by NASA and non-NASA researchers; 

• Developing, launching, and operating Earth-observing space missions; 
• Competitively  selecting  and  pursuing  research  and  analysis  science  investiga-
• Conducting Applied Science projects that help other Federal and regional agen-
cies and organizations to efficiently use products from NASA Earth research to 
advance their missions; 
• Soliciting  and  advancing  technology  development  efforts  to  enable  the  missions 
• Providing  education  and  public  outreach  programs  to  make  our  knowledge  of 

of the future; and 

the Earth accessible to the world. 

In  particular,  NASA  intends  to  launch  an  additional  seven  Earth-observing  sat-
ellites  before  2013,  adding  new  scientific  capabilities  and  maintaining  data  con-
tinuity  for  key  measurements.  Further,  NASA  has  been  and  will  continue  to  be  a 
major  supporter  of  numerous  Congressional  mandates  and  Presidential  initiatives 
in  the  area  of  climate  science.  For  example,  NASA  is  the  largest  contributor  to  the 
U.S. Climate Change Science Program (CCSP) and the agency’s commitment to the 
CCSP has not decreased. In addition, NASA along with other Federal agencies con-
tributes to U.S. leadership in such efforts as the U.S. Group on Earth Observations 
(USGEO) and the International Committee on Earth Observation Satellites (CEOS). 
Specific details on all of NASA’s priorities in the area of Earth Science are detailed 
in the recently released ‘‘Science Plan for NASA’s Science Mission Directorate 2007– 
2016’’. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

DAVID A. POWNER 

Question.  For  decades,  the  National  Aeronautics  and  Space  Administration 
(NASA)  and  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration  (NOAA)  had  a 
successful  partnership  whereby  NASA  built  and  launched  the  satellites  and  NOAA 
operated  them  and  analyzed  the  data.  Why  was  that  approach  changed  for  GOES- 
R and NPOESS and what lessons can be learned from the experience? 

Answer. Historically, the GOES programs relied on NASA to procure the satellites 
while  NOAA  managed  the  overall  program  and  operated  the  satellites.  However, 
NOAA found that a lesson learned on its GOES I–M series was that it needed more 
insight  into  NASA’s  activities.  Thus,  on  the  GOES-R  series,  NOAA  originally 
planned  to  take  more  of  a  leadership  role  and  to  rely  on  NASA  for  expertise  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

advice.  However,  after  an  independent  review  team  raised  concerns  with  this  ap-
proach, NOAA decided to return the program to the prior structure. Under the cur-
rent management structure for GOES-R, NOAA is responsible for program funding, 
procurement  of  the  ground  elements,  and  on-orbit  operation  of  the  satellites,  while 
NASA is responsible for the procurement of the spacecraft, instruments, and launch 
services. 

The  NPOESS  program  is  a  tri-agency  program  managed  by  NOAA,  the  Depart-
ment of Defense (DOD), and NASA. It began with a May 1994 Presidential Decision 
Directive which required NOAA and DOD to converge their two existing polar-orbit-
ing satellite programs into a single satellite program capable of satisfying both civil-
ian  and  military  requirements.1 To  manage  this  program,  DOD,  NOAA,  and  NASA 
formed  the  tri-agency  Integrated  Program  Office,  located  within  NOAA.  Within  the 
program  office,  each  agency  has  the  lead  on  certain  activities:  NOAA  has  overall 
program management responsibility for the converged system and for satellite oper-
ations;  DOD  has  the  lead  on  the  acquisition;  and  NASA  has  primary  responsibility 
for  facilitating  the  development  and  incorporation  of  new  technologies  into  the  con-
verged  system.  NOAA  and  DOD  share  the  costs  of  funding  NPOESS,  while  NASA 
funds  specific  technology  projects  and  studies,  including  a  demonstration  satellite 
known as the NPOESS Preparatory Project (NPP), which is planned to be launched 
in September 2009. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

DAVID A. POWNER 

Question  1.  GAO  has  done  significant  work  in  analyzing  the  problems  with  the 
NPOESS program. In your opinion, is the program truly back on track, or are there 
stil continuing risks, particularly with respect to the Federal Government’s manage-
ment of the procurement and meeting administrative deadlines? 

Answer.  As  we  noted  in  our  April  2007  report 2 and  July  2007  testimony,3 the 
NPOESS program office has made progress in restructuring the program. For exam-
ple,  we  noted  in  our  April  report  that  the  NPOESS  program  office  has  made 
progress in establishing an effective management structure by adding a program ex-
ecutive  officer  position  senior  to  the  program  director.  It  subsequently  revised  the 
program  office’s  organizational  framework,  realigning  division  managers  to  oversee 
key elements of the acquisition, as well as increasing staffing. Under this structure, 
the program office implemented more rigorous and frequent reviews, improved visi-
bility  into  risk  management,  and  institutionalized  the  use  of  earned  value  manage-
ment  techniques  to  monitor  contractor  performance.4 The  program  executive  officer 
implemented monthly program reviews—we observed that these briefings allow the 
executive  officer  to  have  direct  insight  into  the  challenges  and  workings  of  the  pro-
gram and allow risks to be appropriately escalated and addressed. Additionally, the 
NPOESS Executive Committee meets more often now than in the past. 

However,  significant  technical  challenges  and  risks  remain  in  the  program,  par-
ticularly  to  two  key  sensors,  the  Visible/Infrared  Imager  Radiometer  Suite  (VIIRS) 
and  the  Cross-track  Infrared  Sounder  (CrIS).  Both  sensors  are  to  be  flown  on  NPP 
in  2009  and  have  experienced  significant  developmental  failures  in  the  last  year— 
VIIRS  has  experienced  significant  problems  with  a  filter,  and  the  CrIS  instrument 
experienced a structural failure to its frame last fall. Until the sensors are delivered 
for integration to the satellite next spring, they remain high-risk developments. 

Additionally,  the  program  faces  continuing  risks  in  completing  key  acquisition 
documents. We had recommended that these documents be finalized before the con-
tract  negotiations  were  finalized.  However,  the  NPOESS  program  office  completed 
a  contract  modification  to  restructure  the  program  in  late  July  2007  even  though 
key acquisition documents remained outstanding. DOD’s Under Secretary for Acqui-
sition, Technology and Logistics extended the documents’ deadlines and the program 
office  is  working  to  complete  many  of  them.  Finalizing  these  documents  is  critical 
to  ensuring  interagency  agreement  and  will  allow  the  program  office  to  move  for-
ward in finishing other activities related to restructuring the program. 

1 Presidential Decision Directive NSTC–2, May 5, 1994. 
2 GAO,  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environmental  Satellites:  Restructuring  Is  Under  Way,  but 

Technical Challenges and Risks Remain, GAO–07–498 (Washington, D.C.: April 2007). 

3 GAO–07–1099T. 
4 The  earned  value  concept  is  applied  as  a  means  of  placing  a  dollar  value  on  project  status. 
It  is  a  technique  that  compares  budget  versus  actual  costs  versus  project  status  in  dollar 
amounts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

Question 2. Have the three Federal agencies responsible for this program—NOAA, 

NASA, and DOD—fully implemented all ofGAO’s recommendations? 

Answer. The three agencies have not yet implemented the recommendations made 
in  our  April  2007  report.5 In  that  report,  we  recommended  that  (1)  the  Air  Force 
delay reassigning a key NPOESS program executive; (2) all three agencies complete 
and  approve  key  acquisition  documents  related  to  program  restructuring  activities; 
(3)  NOAA  develop  and  implement  a  written  process  for  identifying  and  addressing 
human capital needs and for streamlining how the program handles different agen-
cies’ administrative procedures, and (4) NOAA establish a plan for immediately fill-
ing needed positions. 

The  Air  Force  disagreed  with  our  first  recommendation  and  decided  to  continue 
with its plans to reassign the program’s executive officer. However, over the last few 
years, we and others (including an independent review team and the Commerce In-
spector  General)  have  reported  that  ineffective  executive-level  oversight  helped  fos-
ter  the  NPOESS  program’s  cost  and  schedule  overruns.  We  remain  concerned  that 
reassigning  the  program  executive  at  a  time  when  NPOESS  is  still  facing  critical 
cost, schedule, and technical challenges places the program at further risk. 

At the time of the report, all three agencies agreed with the second recommenda-
tion and noted that they were working to complete these documents. Since then, the 
program  has  completed  its  contract  modification,  but  it  is  still  working  to  complete 
some  of  the  key  acquisition  documents.  We  remain  concerned  that  without  these 
documents  completed,  the  program  faces  increased  risk  that  unanticipated  changes 
in these documents could cause further contract modifications. 

The Department of Commerce recently stated that the NPOESS program is in the 
process of preparing a human capital plan in response to our third recommendation 
that it plans to complete by the end of 2007. 

Regarding the fourth recommendation, at the time of the completion of our review 
in April 2007, over 20 critical positions remained to be filled—the majority of which 
were to be provided by NOAA. NOAA officials noted that each of these positions was 
in  some  stage  of  being  filled  and  later  reported  that  they  had  identified  the  skill 
sets needed for NOAA positions and implemented an accelerated hiring model to fill 
them. Additionally, NOAA stated that it had placed filling NPOESS office positions 
as  a  top  priority  within  its  workforce  management  office  and  allocated  internal  re-
sources accordingly. As of our June 2007 testimony, the program office reported that 
11 positions remained unfilled. 

Question 3. The May 2006 IG report found that insufficient oversight—and in par-
ticular an unwillingness to challenge overly optimistic assessments—caused or exac-
erbated  many  of  the  problems  with  the  satellite  program.  Do  you  believe  that  an 
atmosphere  of  over-optimism  and  insufficient  oversight  still  exists  within  the  sat-
ellite programs? To what extent have the agencies addressed these issues? 

Answer.  Given  the  history  of  problems  on  the  program,  NPOESS  is  now  being 
managed with more realistic expectations and improved oversight. For example, we 
noted  in  our  April  report 6 that  the  NPOESS  program  office  had  recently  imple-
mented  more  rigorous  and  frequent  reviews,  improved  visibility  into  risk  manage-
ment, and institutionalized the use of earned value management techniques to mon-
itor contractor performance. We also noted that the program executive officer imple-
mented monthly program reviews; we observed that these briefings allow the execu-
tive  officer  to  have  direct  insight  into  the  challenges  and  workings  of  the  program 
and allow risks to be appropriately escalated and addressed. However, NPOESS still 
faces  technical  and  programmatic  challenges,  and  continued  program  oversight  is 
needed to ensure that these risks are effectively mitigated. 

In responding to these questions, we relied on information we previously reported 

on NPOESS and GOES.7 

5 GAO–07–498 
6 GAO–07–498. 
7 GAO–07–1099T;  GAO–07–498;  GAO–06–993;  GAO,  Polar-orbiting  Operational  Environ-
mental Satellites: Restructuring is Under Way, but Challenges and Risks Remain, GAO–07–910T 
(Washington, D.C.: June 7, 2007); Geostationary Operational Environmental Satellites: Steps Re-
main  in  Incorporating  Lessons  Learned  from  Other  Satellite  Programs,  GAO–06–993  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: Sept. 6, 2006); and Geostationary Operational Environmental Satellites: Additional 
Action  Needed  to  Incorporate  Lessons  Learned  from  Other  Satellite  Programs,  GAO–06–1129T 
(Washington, D.C.: Sept. 29, 2006). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

ANTONIO J. BUSALACCHI, JR., PH.D. 

Question 1. Of the two possibilities for replacing QuikSCAT—a faster replacement 
with the same capabilities as QuikSCAT, or a longer delay for a more capable, next- 
generation scatterometer—which is preferable? 

Answer. The scatterometer on the QuikSCAT spacecraft was developed in the late 
1990s;  it  is  no  longer  possible  to  ‘‘build  to  blueprint’’  a  new  copy  of  the  instrument. 
While there might be some time saved in building another QuikSCAT instead of the 
more  advanced  scatterometer,  it  would  not,  in  my  view,  be  wise.  With  a  relatively 
small increase in cost (roughly 10 percent according to estimates I have heard) and 
small  delay  in  development,  we  could  move  to  the  much  more  capable  dual-fre-
quency  scatterometer  of  the  type  recommended  in  the  NRC  Decadal  Survey  (the 
‘‘XOVWM,’’  advanced  Ocean  Vector  Wind  Mission).  The  benefits  of  an  advanced 
Ocean Vector Wind Mission be it in support of monitoring, understanding, and pre-
diction would far outweigh that of a short delay in coverage. The time to implement 
this mission is constrained by resources, not technology. 

Question  2.  There  is  an  active  debate  in  the  scientific  community  about  the  long- 
term  relationship  between  hurricane  frequency  and  intensity  and  climate  change? 
Could  any  of  the  sensors  that  were  decommissioned  on  NPOESS  and  GOES-R  pro-
vide data to help resolve that debate? 

Answer. One of the principal shortcomings contributing to this debate is the lack 
of comprehensive satellite coverage prior to the 1970s. The historical data on hurri-
cane intensity is not very good, but that is no longer the case. Looking to the future, 
three  classes  of  instruments  are  needed  to  understand  the  time  rate  of  change  of 
hurricane  intensity.  They  are  the  all-weather  scatterometer  surface  winds  observa-
tions for which the XOVWM would provide improved measurements, the all weather 
sea  surface  temperature  (SST)  observations  to  have  been  provided  by  CMIS  (but 
now in doubt) as SST provides the primary energy source to the hurricane, and the 
precision  altimeter  observations  of  sea  surface  height  which  provide  information  on 
the  heat  content  of  the  upper  ocean  that  can  influence  hurricane  growth  or  decay. 
Question  3.  Are  you  familiar  with  the  GIFTS  instrument,  and  would  it  be  an  ac-
ceptable alternative to the Hyperspectral Environmental Suite (HES) instrument on 
GOES-R? 

Answer.  In  my  opinion  it  is  premature  to  consider  GIFTS  as  an  acceptable  alter-
native to HES on GOES–R. One of the problems with NPOESS was that new tech-
nology  was  slated  for  an  operational  platform  without  an  adequate  demonstration 
of  the  technology.  Placing  GIFTS  on  NPOESS  would  be  repeating  the  sins  of  the 
past. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

ANTONIO J. BUSALACCHI, JR., PH.D. 

Question 1. From what you know of the climate sensor cuts, do you believe there 

will be data gaps? 

Answer.  Yes.  Changes  to  the  NPOESS  sensor  complement  will  affect  a  number 
of  important  measurements.  The  chart  below  summarizes  changes  to  the  climate- 
relevant sensors as a result of Nunn-McCurdy actions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

In  a  recent  presentation  to  an  NRC  study  committee  that  I  chair,  NOAA  stated 

that the measurements in danger as a result of these actions are: 

I am particularly concerned about gaps in measurements that could jeopardize the 
utility  of  the  entire  time-series.  An  outstanding  question  for  climate  science  is 
whether and to what degree variations in the Sun’s energy output contribute to the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e

.

2
q
a
s
u
b
1
1
7

s
p
e
.

1
q
a
s
u
b
1
1
7

91 

observed  global  warming.  To  answer  this  question  requires  monitoring  of  the  Sun’s 
brightness at all wavelengths—its total solar irradiance (TSI)—over several 11-year 
solar cycles (the Sun regularly brightens and dims with an amplitude of roughly 0.1 
percent over the course of its 11-year activity (sunspot) cycle). 

TSI  cannot  be  measured  from  the  ground  because  of  the  Earth’s  atmosphere  ab-
sorbs important components of the solar spectrum, the ultraviolet region being par-
ticularly  important.  However,  since  1978,  TSI  has  been  measured  from  space  using 
radiometers  placed  on  a  series  of  NASA  and  NOAA  spacecraft.  Because  spacecraft 
typically do not operate for periods longer than a solar cycle and because variations 
in  sensor  performance  from  one  spacecraft  to  the  next  are  larger  than  the  signals 
we are looking for, it is critical that there be many months of overlapping operation. 
Absent such overlap, it would be impossible to assemble a record of TSI that distin-
guishes  actual  changes  in  solar  output  versus  changes  in  sensor  performance  and/ 
or changes due to the natural solar cycle. 

There  is  a  similar,  but  lesser  concern  about  the  radiation  emitted  back  to  space, 

which is what is measured by the ERBS. 

As  we  noted  in  the  recent  workshop  report  from  my  NRC  committee,  although 
NOAA has prioritized the de-manifested sensors in its own way, it did not consider 
the  relative  priority  of  the  descoped/reduced  coverage  sensors.  This  should  not  be 
construed  as  a  de  facto  lower  prioritization.  The  sea  surface  temperature  record 
from CMIS, for example, is of very high priority and yet because CMIS was not en-
tirely demanifested, it does not appear on the NOAA priority list. 

Similarly, not all sensors which are prioritized are recommended for remanifesta-
tion  on  NPOESS.  For  example,  an  altimetry  measurement  is  of  very  high  priority 
to continue the sea level record, however the NPOESS orbit prohibits attaining the 
high precision needed to continue the record. Thus, to prevent a measurement gap, 
a new mission is required rather than restoration of the demanifested sensor. 

Our  recently  released  NRC  workshop  report  ‘‘Options  to  Ensure  the  Climate 
Record  from  the  NPOESS  and  GOES–R  Spacecraft:  A  Workshop  Report’’  goes  into 
more detail on these issues. 

Question  2.  Do  you  believe  that  the  currently-planned  satellites  and  sensors  are 

sufficient to meet our climate monitoring needs in the coming years? 

Answer. As alluded to above given the present NPOESS debacle, the short answer 
is an emphatic no! In addition, it is worth emphasizing that there remains no long- 
term plan for many of these measurements beyond the initial missions. There is no 
plan for long-term continuity of precision sea level, ocean vector winds etc. as noted 
in workshop report. Moreover, there needs to be formal coordination between NASA 
and  NOAA  regarding  the  climate-relevant  missions  proposed  by  the  NRC  Decadal 
Survey (see below) and the NPOESS remanifestation exercise. 

Table 2.1 Launch, orbit, and instrument specifications for the recommended NOAA missions. 

[Missions are listed in order of ascending cost within each launch time frame.] 

Mission description 

Orbit 

Instruments 

Timeframe: 2010–2013—Missions listed by cost 

LEO, SSO 

Broadband 
radiometer 

Rough cost 
estimate 

$65 M 

Decadal survey 

mission 

CLARREO 
(NOAA portion) 

GPSRO 

Solar and Earth radiation 

characteristics for un-
derstanding climate 
forcing. 

High accuracy, all-weath-
er temperature, water 
vapor, and electron 
density profiles for 
weather, climate and 
space weather. 

LEO 

GPS receiver 

$150 M 

Timeframe: 2013–2016 

XOVWM 

Sea surface wind vectors 
for weather and ocean 
ecosystems. 

LEO, SSO 

Backscatter radar 

$350 M 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

Table 2.2 Launch, orbit, and instrument specifications for the recommended NASA missions. 

[Missions are listed in order of ascending cost within each launch time frame.] 

Decadal survey 

mission 

Mission description 

Orbit 

Instruments 

Rough 
cost 

estimate 

Timeframe: 2010–2013—Missions listed by cost 

CLARREO 
(NASA portion) 

SMAP 

ICESat-II 

DESDynI 

Solar Radiation: spec-

trally resolved forcing 
and response of the 
climate system. 

Soil moisture and freeze/ 
thaw for weather and 
water cycle processes. 
Ice sheet height changes 

for climate change di-
agnosis. 

Surface and ice sheet 

deformation for under-
standing natural haz-
ards and climate; 
vegetation structure 
for ecosystem health. 

LEO, 
Precessing 

Absolute, spectrally- 
resolved interferometer 

$200 M 

LEO, SSO 

L-band radar 
L-band radiometer 

$300 M 

LEO, Non- 
SSO 

LEO, SSO 

Laser altimeter 

$300 M 

L-band InSAR 
Laser altimeter 

$700 M 

Timeframe: 2013–2016—Missions listed by cost 

HyspIRI 

ASCENDS 

SWOT 

GEO–CAPE 

ACE 

LIST 

PATH 

Land surface composi-
tion for agriculture 
and mineral charac-
terization; vegetation 
types for ecosystem 
health. 

Day/night, all-latitude, 

all-season CO2 column 
integrals for climate 
emissions. 

Ocean, lake, and river 

water levels for ocean 
and inland water dy-
namics. 

Atmospheric gas col-

umns for air quality 
forecasts; ocean color 
for coastal ecosystem 
health and climate 
emissions. 

Aerosol and cloud pro-
files for climate and 
water cycle; ocean 
color for open ocean 
biogeochemistry. 

LEO, SSO  Hyperspectral 
spectrometer 

$300 M 

LEO, SSO  Multifrequency laser 

$400 M 

$450 M 

$550 M 

LEO, SSO 

Ku-band radar 
Ku-band altimeter 
Microwave radiometer 

GEO 

High spatial resolution 

hyperspectral spec-
trometer 

Low spatial resolution 

imaging spectrometer 

IR correlation radiom-

eter 

LEO, SSO 

Backscatter lidar 
Multiangle polarimeter 
Doppler radar 

$800 M 

Timeframe: 2016–2020—Missions listed by cost 

LEO, SSO 

Laser altimeter 

$300 M 

GEO 

MW array spectrometer 

$450 M 

Land surface topography 

for landslide hazards 
and water runoff. 
High frequency, all- 

weather temperature 
and humidity sound-
ings for weather fore-
casting and SST.a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

93 

Table 2.2 Launch, orbit, and instrument specifications for the recommended NASA missions.— 

Continued 

[Missions are listed in order of ascending cost within each launch time frame.] 

Rough 
cost 

estimate 

$450 M 

$500 M 

$600 M 

Mission description 

Orbit 

Instruments 

LEO, SSO  Microwave or laser 

ranging system 

Snow accumulation for 

LEO, SSO 

Ku and X-band radars 
K and Ka-band 
radiometers 

LEO, SSO  UV spectrometer 
IR spectrometer 
Microwave limb sounder 

Decadal survey 

mission 

GRACE–II 

SCLP 

GACM 

3D-Winds 
(Demo) 

High temporal resolu-

tion gravity fields for 
tracking large-scale 
water movement. 

fresh water avail-
ability. 

Ozone and related gases 

for intercontinental 
air quality and strato-
spheric ozone layer 
prediction. 

Tropospheric winds for 
weather forecasting 
and pollution trans-
port. 

LEO, SSO 

Doppler lidar 

$650 M 

a Cloud-independent,  high  temporal  resolution,  lower  accuracy  SST  to  complement,  not  replace,  global  oper-

ational high accuracy SST measurement. 

Question  3.  Will  the  loss  of  these  sensors  hurt  our  ability  to  observe,  research, 

predict, and respond to climate change? 

Answer.  Without  any  doubt  the  answer  is  yes.  An  excellent  example  is  the  need 
for precision altimeter measurements that do not have a home on the NPOESS plat-
form.  These  measurements  of  sea  surface  height  are  absolutely  critical  for  moni-
toring sea level rise both globally and regionally, as well as providing a quantitative 
assessment as to whether or not sea level rise is accelerating. In addition, these ob-
servations  provide  key  input  to  today’s  operational  coupled  ocean-atmosphere  pre-
diction models that issue short-term climate forecasts on a time scale of seasons out 
to a year in advance. 

Question  4.  Out  of  the  climate  sensors  cut  from  the  NPOESS  and  GOES–R  sat-

ellites, what was the largest scientific loss? 

Answer. This is a difficult question to answer depending on the scientific perspec-
tive; i.e., monitoring, understating, prediction, or reducing uncertainty. Some might 
answer  the  loss  of  the  Advanced  Polarimeter  (APS)  given  the  present  uncertainty 
in aerosol forcing, or the reduced sounding coverage of the CrIS instrument and the 
reduced  diurnal  coverage  of  the  VIIRS  instrument  impacts  out-monitoring  capa-
bility, but overall I would point to the loss of the TSIS instrument given the impor-
tance of a stable, unbroken record of the solar radiative forcing of our planet. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  11:39 May 24, 2012 Jkt 074320 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\74320.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

